Table of Contents
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
☒ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended 30 September 2020
or
☐TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from _______________________ to ______________________  
Commission file number 001-04534
AIR PRODUCTS AND CHEMICALS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Delaware 23-1274455
(State or other jurisdiction of incorporation or organization) (I.R.S. Employer Identification No.)
7201 Hamilton Boulevard
Allentown, Pennsylvania 18195-1501
(Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code)
610-481-4911
(Registrant’s telephone number, including area code)
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class Trading Symbol(s) Name of each exchange on which registered
Common Stock, par value $1.00 per share APD New York Stock Exchange
0.375% Euro Notes due 2021 APD21B New York Stock Exchange
1.000% Euro Notes due 2025 APD25 New York Stock Exchange
0.500% Euro Notes due 2028 APD28 New York Stock Exchange
0.800% Euro Notes due 2032 APD32 New York Stock Exchange
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. Yes ☒ No ☐
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act. Yes ☐ No ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was
required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes ☒ No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be
submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such
shorter period that the registrant was required to submit such files). Yes ☒ No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a
smaller reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated
filer,” “smaller reporting company,” and "emerging growth company" in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act
Large accelerated filer ☒ Accelerated filer ☐ Non-accelerated filer ☐Smaller reporting company ☐Emerging growth company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition
period for complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the
Exchange Act. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of
the effectiveness of its internal control over financial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15
U.S.C.7262(b)) by the registered public accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit report.☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Act). Yes ☐ No ☒
The aggregate market value of the voting stock held by non-affiliates of the registrant on 31 March 2020 was approximately $44.0 billion. For
purposes of the foregoing calculations, all directors and/or executive officers have been deemed to be affiliates, but the registrant disclaims that any
such director and/or executive officer is an affiliate.
The number of shares of common stock outstanding as of 31 October 2020 was 221,026,592.
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
Portions of the registrant’s definitive Proxy Statement for the Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be held on 28 January 2021 are incorporated by
reference into Part III.
Table of Contents
AIR PRODUCTS AND CHEMICALS, INC.
ANNUAL  REPORT ON FORM 10-K
For the fiscal year ended 30 September 2020
TABLE OF CONTENTS
ITEM 1.BUSINESS 4
ITEM 1A.RISK FACTORS 9
ITEM 1B.UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS 16
ITEM 2.PROPERTIES 16
ITEM 3.LEGAL PROCEEDINGS 17
ITEM 4.MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES 17
ITEM 5.MARKET FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS, AND
ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES 18
ITEM 6.SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA 20
ITEM 7.MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF
OPERATIONS 21
ITEM 7A.QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK 48
ITEM 8.FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA 50
ITEM 9.CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND
FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE 118
ITEM 9A.CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES 119
ITEM 9B.OTHER INFORMATION 119
ITEM 10.DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE 119
ITEM 11.EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION 120
ITEM 12.SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND
RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS 120
ITEM 13.CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR
INDEPENDENCE 120
ITEM 14.PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES 120
ITEM 15.EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES 120
ITEM 16.FORM 10-K SUMMARY 120
INDEX TO EXHIBITS 121
SIGNATURES 125
2
Table of Contents
FOR WARD-LOOKING ST ATEMENTS
This Annual Report on Form 10-K contains “forward-looking statements” within the safe harbor provisions of the Private
Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements include all statements that do not relate solely to
historical or current facts and can generally be identified by words such as “anticipate,” “believe,” “could,” “estimate,”
“expect,” “forecast,” "future," “goal,” “intend,” “may,” “outlook,” “plan,” “positioned,” “possible,” “potential,” “project,”
“should,” “target,” “will,” “would,” and similar expressions or variations thereof, or the negative thereof, but these terms
are not the exclusive means of identifying such statements. Forward-looking statements are based on management’s
expectations and assumptions as of the date of this report and are not guarantees of future performance. You are
cautioned not to place undue reliance on our forward-looking statements.
Forward-looking statements may relate to a number of matters, including expectations regarding revenue, margins,
expenses, earnings, tax provisions, cash flows, pension obligations, share repurchases or other statements regarding
economic conditions or our business outlook; statements regarding plans, projects, strategies and objectives for our
future operations, including our ability to win new projects and execute the projects in our backlog; and statements
regarding our expectations with respect to pending legal claims or disputes. While forward-looking statements are
made in good faith and based on assumptions, expectations and projections that management believes are reasonable
based on currently available information, actual performance and financial results may differ materially from projections
and estimates expressed in the forward-looking statements because of many factors, including, without limitation:
•the duration and impacts of the novel coronavirus (“COVID-19”) global pandemic and efforts to contain its
transmission, including the effect of these factors on our business, our customers, economic conditions and
markets generally;
•changes in global or regional economic conditions, supply and demand dynamics in the market segments we
serve, or in the financial markets that may affect the availability and terms on which we may obtain financing;
•risks associated with having extensive international operations, including political risks, risks associated with
unanticipated government actions and risks of investing in developing markets;
•project delays, contract terminations, customer cancellations, or postponement of projects and sales;
•our ability to develop and operate large scale and technically complex projects, including gasification projects;
•the future financial and operating performance of major customers and joint venture partners;
•our ability to develop, implement, and operate new technologies;
•our ability to execute the projects in our backlog;
•tariffs, economic sanctions and regulatory activities in jurisdictions in which we and our affiliates and joint ventures
operate;
•the impact of environmental, tax or other legislation, as well as regulations affecting our business and related
compliance requirements, including legislation or regulations related to global climate change;
•changes in tax rates and other changes in tax law;
•the timing, impact, and other uncertainties relating to acquisitions and divestitures, including our ability to integrate
acquisitions and separate divested businesses, respectively;
•risks relating to cybersecurity incidents, including risks from the interruption, failure or compromise of our
information systems;
•catastrophic events, such as natural disasters, public health crises, acts of war, or terrorism;
•the impact on our business and customers of price fluctuations in oil and natural gas and disruptions in markets
and the economy due to oil and natural gas price volatility;
•costs and outcomes of legal or regulatory proceedings and investigations;
•asset impairments due to economic conditions or specific events;
3
Table of Contents
FOR WARD-LOOKING ST ATEMENTS (CONTINUED)
•significant fluctuations in interest rates and foreign currency exchange rates from those currently anticipated;
•damage to facilities, pipelines or delivery systems, including those we own or operate for third parties;
•availability and cost of raw materials; and
•the success of productivity and operational improvement programs.
In addition to the foregoing factors, forward-looking statements contained herein are qualified with respect to the risks
disclosed elsewhere in this document, including in Item 1A, Risk Factors, Item 7, Management’s Discussion and
Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations, and Item 7A, Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About
Market Risk. Any of these factors, as well as those not currently anticipated by management, could cause our results of
operations, financial condition or liquidity to differ materially from what is expressed or implied by any forward-looking
statement. Except as required by law, we disclaim any obligation or undertaking to update or revise any forward-looking
statements contained herein to reflect any change in assumptions, beliefs, or expectations or any change in events,
conditions, or circumstances upon which any such forward-looking statements are based.
PART I
Item 1. Business.
Air Products and Chemicals, Inc., a Delaware corporation originally founded in 1940, serves customers globally with a
unique portfolio of products, services, and solutions that include atmospheric gases, process and specialty gases,
equipment, and services. We are the world’s largest supplier of hydrogen and have built leading positions in growth
markets such as helium and liquefied natural gas ("LNG") process technology and equipment. We also develop,
engineer, build, own and operate some of the world’s largest industrial gas projects, including gasification projects that
sustainably convert abundant natural resources into syngas for the production of high-value power, fuels and
chemicals, carbon capture projects, and world-scale carbon-free hydrogen projects supporting global transportation
and the energy transition.
As used in this report, unless the context indicates otherwise, the terms “we,” “our,” “us,” the “Company,” "Air Products,"
or “registrant” include controlled subsidiaries, affiliates, and predecessors of Air Products and our controlled
subsidiaries and affiliates.
During the fiscal year ended 30 September 2020 (“fiscal year 2020”), we reported our continuing operations in five
reporting segments under which we managed our operations, assessed performance, and reported earnings: Industrial
Gases – Americas; Industrial Gases – EMEA (Europe, Middle East, and Africa); Industrial Gases – Asia; Industrial
Gases – Global; and Corporate and other.
Except as otherwise noted, the description of our business below reflects our continuing operations. Refer to Note 6,
Discontinued Operations, to the consolidated financial statements for activity associated with discontinued operations.
Industrial Gases Business
Our Industrial Gases business produces atmospheric gases, such as oxygen, nitrogen, and argon, process gases,
such as hydrogen, helium, carbon dioxide (CO), carbon monoxide, and syngas, and specialty gases. Atmospheric
gases are produced through various air separation processes of which cryogenic is the most prevalent. Process gases
are produced by methods other than air separation. For example, hydrogen, carbon monoxide and syngas are
produced by steam methane reforming of natural gas and by the gasification of liquid and solid hydrocarbons.
Hydrogen is produced by purifying byproduct sources obtained from the chemical and petrochemical industries; and
helium is produced as a byproduct of gases extracted from underground reservoirs, primarily natural gas, but also CO
purified before resale. The Industrial Gases business also develops, builds and operates equipment for the production
or processing of gases, such as air separation units and non-cryogenic generators.2
2
4
Table of Contents
Our Industrial Gases business is organized and operated regionally. The regional Industrial Gases segments
(Americas, EMEA, and Asia) supply gases and related equipment in the relevant region to diversified customers in
many industries, including those in refining, chemical, gasification, metals, electronics, manufacturing, and food and
beverage. Hydrogen is used by refiners to facilitate the conversion of heavy crude feedstock and lower the sulfur
content of gasoline and diesel fuels as well as in the developing mobility markets. The chemicals industry uses
hydrogen, oxygen, nitrogen, carbon monoxide, and syngas as feedstocks in the production of many basic chemicals.
The energy production industry uses nitrogen injection for enhanced recovery of oil and natural gas and oxygen for
gasification. Oxygen is used in combustion and industrial heating applications, including in the gasification, steel,
certain nonferrous metals, glass, and cement industries. Nitrogen applications are used in food processing for freezing
and preserving flavor and nitrogen for inerting is used in various fields, including the metals, chemical, and
semiconductor industries. Helium is used in laboratories and healthcare for cooling and in other industries for
pressurizing, purging, and lifting. Argon is used in the metals and other industries for its unique inerting, thermal
conductivity, and other properties. Industrial gases are also used in welding and providing healthcare and are utilized in
various manufacturing processes to make them more efficient and to optimize performance.
Industrial gases are generally produced at or near the point of use given the complexity and inefficiency with storing
molecules at low temperatures. Helium, however, is generally sourced globally, at long distances from point of sale. As
a result, we maintain an inventory of helium stored in our fleet of ISO containers as well as the U.S. Bureau of Land
Management underground storage facility in Amarillo, Texas.
We distribute gases to our sale of gas customers through different supply modes depending on various factors
including the customer's volume requirements and location. Our supply modes are as follows:
•Liquid Bulk—Product is delivered in bulk (in liquid or gaseous form) by tanker or tube trailer and stored, usually
in its liquid state, in equipment that we typically design and install at the customer’s site for vaporizing into a
gaseous state as needed. Liquid bulk sales are usually governed by three- to five-year contracts.
•Packaged Gases—Small quantities of product are delivered in either cylinders or dewars. We operate
packaged gas businesses in Europe, Asia, and Latin America. In the United States, our packaged gas business
sells products (principally helium) only for the electronics and magnetic resonance imaging industries.
•On-Site Gases—Large quantities of hydrogen, nitrogen, oxygen, carbon monoxide, and syngas (a mixture of
hydrogen and carbon monoxide) are provided to customers, principally in the energy production and refining,
chemical, gasification, and metals industries worldwide, that require large volumes of gases and have relatively
constant demand. Gases are produced at large facilities located adjacent to customers’ facilities or by pipeline
systems from centrally located production facilities and are generally governed by 15- to 20- year contracts. We
also deliver small quantities of product through small on-site plants (cryogenic or non-cryogenic generators),
typically either via a 10- to 15- year sale of gas contract or through the sale of the equipment to the customer.
Electricity is the largest cost component in the production of atmospheric gases. Steam methane reformers utilize
natural gas as the primary raw material and gasifiers use liquid and solid hydrocarbons as the principal raw material for
the production of hydrogen, carbon monoxide and syngas. We mitigate electricity, natural gas, and hydrocarbon price
fluctuations contractually through pricing formulas, surcharges, and cost pass-through and tolling arrangements. During
fiscal year 2020, no significant difficulties were encountered in obtaining adequate supplies of power and natural gas.
We obtain helium from a number of sources globally, including crude helium for purification from the U.S. Bureau of
Land Management's helium reserve.
The regional Industrial Gases segments also include our share of the results of several joint ventures accounted for by
the equity method, which are reported in our financial statements as income from equity affiliates. The largest of these
joint ventures operate in China, India, Italy, Mexico, Saudi Arabia, South Africa, and Thailand.
5
Table of Contents
Each of the regional Industrial Gases segments competes against three global industrial gas companies: Air Liquide
S.A., Messer and Linde plc (the successor to Praxair, Inc. and Linde AG, pursuant to a combination that became
effective on 31 October 2018), as well as regional competitors. Competition in Industrial Gases is based primarily on
price, reliability of supply, and the development of industrial gas applications. We derive a competitive advantage in
locations where we have pipeline networks, which enable us to provide reliable and economic supply of products to our
larger customers.
Overall regional industrial gases sales constituted approximately 94%, 96%, and 94% of consolidated sales in fiscal
years 2020, 2019, and 2018, respectively. Sales of atmospheric gases constituted approximately 47%, 46%, and 46%
of consolidated sales in fiscal years 2020, 2019, and 2018, respectively, while sales of tonnage hydrogen, syngas, and
related products constituted approximately 22%, 26%, and 25% of consolidated sales in fiscal years 2020, 2019, and
2018, respectively.
Industrial Gases Equipment
We design and manufacture equipment for air separation, hydrocarbon recovery and purification, natural gas
liquefaction, and liquid helium and liquid hydrogen transport and storage. The Industrial Gases – Global segment
includes activity related to the sale of cryogenic and gas processing equipment for air separation. The equipment is
sold worldwide to customers in a variety of industries, including chemical and petrochemical manufacturing, oil and gas
recovery and processing, and steel and primary metals processing. The Corporate and other segment includes three
global equipment businesses: our LNG equipment business, our Gardner Cryogenics business fabricating helium and
hydrogen transport and storage containers, and our Rotoflow business, which manufactures turboexpanders and other
precision rotating equipment. Steel, aluminum, and capital equipment subcomponents (compressors, etc.) are the
principal raw materials in the manufacturing of equipment. Raw materials for individual projects typically are acquired
under firm purchase agreements. Equipment is produced at our manufacturing sites with certain components being
procured from subcontractors and vendors. Competition in the equipment business is based primarily on technological
performance, service, technical know-how, price, and performance guarantees. Sale of equipment constituted
approximately 6%, 4%, and 6% of consolidated sales in fiscal years 2020, 2019, and 2018, respectively.
The backlog of equipment orders was approximately $1.6 billion on 30 September 2020 (as compared to a total
backlog of approximately $0.9 billion on 30 September 2019). We estimate that approximately 50% of the total
equipment sales backlog as of 30 September 2020 will be recognized as revenue during fiscal year 2021, dependent
on execution schedules of the relevant projects.
International Operations
Through our subsidiaries, affiliates, and joint ventures accounted for using the equity method, we conduct business in
53 countries outside the United States. Our international businesses are subject to risks customarily encountered in
foreign operations, including fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates and controls, tariffs, trade sanctions, and
import and export controls, and other economic, political, and regulatory policies of local governments described in Item
1A, Risk Factors, below.
We have majority or wholly owned foreign subsidiaries that operate in Canada; 18 European countries (including the
Netherlands, Spain, and the United Kingdom); 11 Asian countries (including China, South Korea, and Taiwan); seven
Latin American countries (including Brazil and Chile); six countries in the Middle East (including Saudi Arabia), and
three African countries. We also own less-than-controlling interests in entities operating in Europe, Asia, Latin America,
the Middle East, and Africa (including China, Germany, India, Italy, Mexico, Oman, Saudi Arabia, South Africa, and
Thailand).
Financial information about our foreign operations and investments is included in Note 8, Summarized Financial
Information of Equity Affiliates; Note 22, Income Taxes; and Note 25, Business Segment and Geographic Information,
to the consolidated financial statements included under Item 8, below. Information about foreign currency translation is
included under “Foreign Currency” in Note 1, Major Accounting Policies, and information on our exposure to currency
fluctuations is included in Note 13, Financial Instruments, to the consolidated financial statements, included under
Item 8, below, and in “Foreign Currency Exchange Rate Risk,” included under Item 7A, below.
6
Table of Contents
Technology Development
We pursue a market-oriented approach to technology development through research and development, engineering,
and commercial development processes. It conducts research and development principally in its laboratories located in
the United States (Trexlertown, Pennsylvania), the United Kingdom (Basingstoke and Carrington), Spain (Barcelona),
China (Shanghai), and Saudi Arabia (Dhahran). We also fund and cooperate in research and development programs
conducted by a number of major universities and undertake research work funded by others, including the United
States government.
Development of technology for use within the Industrial Gases business focuses primarily on new and improved
processes and equipment for the production and delivery of industrial gases and new or improved applications for
industrial gas products.
During fiscal year 2020, we owned approximately 850 United States patents, approximately 3,600 foreign patents, and
were a licensee under certain patents owned by others. While the patents and licenses are considered important, we
do not consider our business as a whole to be materially dependent upon any particular patent, patent license, or group
of patents or licenses.
Environmental Regulation
We are subject to various environmental laws and regulations in the countries in which we have operations.
Compliance with these laws and regulations results in higher capital expenditures and costs. In the normal course of
business, we are involved in legal proceedings under the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation,
and Liability Act ("CERCLA," the federal Superfund law); Resource Conservation and Recovery Act ("RCRA"); and
similar state and foreign environmental laws relating to the designation of certain sites for investigation or remediation.
Our accounting policy for environmental expenditures is discussed in Note 1, Major Accounting Policies, and
environmental loss contingencies are discussed in Note 17, Commitments and Contingencies, to the consolidated
financial statements, included under Item 8, below.
Some of our operations are within jurisdictions that have or are developing regulatory regimes governing emissions of
greenhouse gases (“GHG”), including CO. These include existing coverage under the European Union Emission
Trading System, the California cap and trade scheme, China’s Emission Trading Scheme and its nation-wide
expansion, and South Korea’s Emission Trading Scheme. In the Netherlands, a CO emissions tax will come into force
on 1 January 2021. In Canada, Alberta’s Technology Innovation and Emission Reduction (“TIER”) System went into
effect 1 January 2020. In Ontario, Environment & Climate Change Canada’s ("ECCC”) Output Based Pricing System
(“OBPS”) is currently in effect, however, on 20 September 2020, ECCC granted approval of Ontario’s GHG Emissions
Performance Standards program, which will be used in lieu of adherence to the OBPS, with the effective date to be
determined. In addition, the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (“EPA”) requires mandatory reporting of GHG
emissions and is regulating GHG emissions for new construction and major modifications to existing facilities. Some
jurisdictions have various mechanisms to target the power sector to achieve emission reductions, which often result in
higher power costs.
Increased public concern may result in more international, U.S. federal, and/or regional requirements to reduce or
mitigate the effects of GHG emissions. Although uncertain, these developments could increase our costs related to
consumption of electric power, hydrogen production and application of our gasification technology. We believe we will
be able to mitigate some of the increased costs through contractual terms, but the lack of definitive legislation or
regulatory requirements prevents an accurate estimate of the long-term impact these measures will have on our
operations. Any legislation that limits or taxes GHG emissions could negatively impact our growth, increase our
operating costs, or reduce demand for certain of our products.
Regulation of GHG may also produce new opportunities for us. We continue to develop technologies to help our
facilities and our customers lower energy consumption, improve efficiency and lower emissions. We see significant
opportunities for gasification, carbon capture technologies and hydrogen for mobility and energy transition.
We estimate that we spent approximately $4 million, $5 million, and $3 million in fiscal years 2020, 2019, and 2018,
respectively, on capital projects reflected in continuing operations to control pollution. Capital expenditures to control
pollution are estimated to be approximately $6 million in both fiscal years 2021 and 2022.
For additional information regarding environmental matters, refer to Item 7, “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of
Financial Condition and Results of Operations – Environmental Matters” and Note 17, Commitments and
Contingencies, to the consolidated financial statements.2
2
7
Table of Contents
Employees
We believe our employees are our most valuable asset and are critical to our success as an organization. Our goal is to
be the safest, most diverse and most profitable industrial gas company in the world, providing excellent service to our
customers. Integral to our success is the continued development of our 4S culture (Safety, Speed, Simplicity and Self-
Confidence) and creating a work environment where all employees feel that they belong and matter. Our talent related
initiatives, including employee recruitment and development, diversity and inclusion and compensation and benefit
programs, are focused on building and retaining the world-class and talented staff that is needed to meet our goals.
On 30 September 2020 we had approximately 19,275 employees, of whom approximately 19,000 were full-time and of
whom approximately 14,150 were located outside the United States. We have collective bargaining agreements with
unions at certain locations that expire on various dates over the next four years. We consider relations with our
employees to be good.
We value the contributions of our employees, particularly in the face of the challenges posed by the COVID-19
pandemic. Many of our employees are on the front line during the pandemic, keeping our plants running and delivering
to our customers the products they need. When possible, employees have been working from home to help maintain
their health and safety as well as business continuity. We have not laid off any of our employees or reduced their
salaries due to COVID-19.
In October 2020, we announced goals to further increase the percentage of women and U.S. minorities in professional
and managerial roles. By 2025, we aim to achieve at least 28 percent female representation in the professional and
managerial population globally, and at least 20 percent minority representation in that same population in the United
States. These measures are increases from 25 and 17 percent representation (2020 baseline), respectively. We
established these new targets following analysis of our global employee representation metrics and future talent needs,
as well as assessing industry benchmarks and peer companies.
Seasonality
Our businesses are not subject to seasonal fluctuations to any material extent.
Inventories
We maintain limited inventory where required to facilitate the supply of products to customers on a reasonable delivery
schedule. Inventory consists primarily of crude helium, industrial gas, and specialty gas inventories supplied to
customers through liquid bulk and packaged gases supply modes.
Customers
We do not have a homogeneous customer base or end market, and no single customer accounts for more than 10% of
our consolidated revenues. We do have concentrations of customers in specific industries, primarily refining, chemicals,
and electronics. Within each of these industries, we have several large-volume customers with long-term contracts. A
negative trend affecting one of these industries, or the loss of one of these major customers, although not material to
our consolidated revenue, could have an adverse impact on our financial results.
Governmental Contracts
Our business is not subject to a government entity’s renegotiation of profits or termination of contracts that would be
material to our business as a whole.
Available Information
All periodic and current reports, registration statements, proxy statements, and other filings that we are required to file
with the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC"), including our Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports
on Form 10-Q, Current Reports on Form 8-K, and amendments to those reports filed or furnished pursuant to
Section 13(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the "Exchange Act"), are available free of charge through our
website at www.airproducts.com. Such documents are available as soon as reasonably practicable after electronic filing
of the material with the SEC. All such reports filed during the period covered by this report were available on our
website on the same day as filing. In addition, our filings with the SEC are available free of charge on the SEC's
website, www.sec.gov.
8
Table of Contents
Our Executive Officers
Our executive officers and their respective positions and ages on 19 November 2020 follow. Information with respect to
offices held is stated in fiscal years.
Name Age Office
M. Scott Crocco 56Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer (became Executive Vice President
and Chief Financial Officer in 2016; Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer in
2013; and Vice President and Corporate Controller in 2008).
Seifi Ghasemi 76Chairman, President, and Chief Executive Officer (became Chairman, President and
Chief Executive Officer in 2014 and previously served as Chairman and Chief Executive
Officer of Rockwood Holdings, Inc. from 2001 to 2014). Mr. Ghasemi is a member and
Chairman of the Board of Directors and the Chairman of the Executive Committee of the
Board of Directors.
Sean D. Major 56Executive Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary (Executive Vice President and
General Counsel since May 2017 and Secretary since December 2017). Previously, Mr.
Major served as Executive Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary for Joy
Global Inc. from 2007 to 2017.
Dr. Samir J. Serhan 59Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer (Executive Vice President since
December 2016 and Chief Operating Officer since May 2020). Dr. Serhan served as
President, Global HyCO, from 2014 to 2016 for Praxair Inc. From 2000-2014, he worked
in leadership positions in the U.S. and Germany for The Linde Group, including as
Managing Director of Linde Engineering from 2008-2014.
Item 1A. Risk Factors.
Our operations are affected by various risks, many of which are beyond our control. In evaluating investment in the
Company and the forward-looking information contained in this Annual Report on Form 10-K or presented elsewhere by
management from time to time, you should carefully consider the risk factors discussed below. Any of these risks could
have a material adverse effect on our business, operating results, financial condition, and the actual outcome of
matters as to which forward-looking statements are made and could adversely affect the value of an investment in our
securities. In addition to the following risks, there may be additional risks and uncertainties that adversely affect our
business, performance, or financial condition in the future that are not presently known, are not currently believed to be
significant, or are not identified below because they are common to all businesses.
Risks Related to Economic Conditions
The COVID-19 global pandemic may materially and adversely impact our business, financial condition and results of
operations.
The COVID-19 global pandemic and efforts to reduce its spread have led to a significant decline of economic activity
and significant disruption and volatility in global markets. These factors have led to reduced demand for industrial gas
products, particularly in our merchant business. We expect demand to continue to be impacted as well as the timing of
certain planned maintenance activities. In addition, COVID-19 may result in reduced sales in our other businesses,
lower returns for certain of our projects, and the potential delay or cancellation of certain projects in our pipeline. In
addition, we are monitoring the health of our employees and many of our employees, including those based at our
headquarters, are working remotely in accordance with health safety guidance and applicable governmental orders.
Action by health or other governmental authorities requiring the closure of our facilities or recommending other physical
distancing measures could negatively impact our business and those of our service providers and customers. Although
we have business continuity and other safeguards in place, we cannot be certain that they will be fully effective for
extended periods of time. As the pandemic and responses to it continue to evolve we may experience further adverse
impacts on our operations and our ability to access capital on favorable terms, or at all, may be impaired. In addition,
we may face unpredictable increases in demand for certain of our products when restrictions on business and travel
end. If demand for our products exceeds our capacity, it could adversely affect our financial results and customer
relationships. Although the duration and ultimate impact of these factors is unknown at this time, the decline in
economic conditions due to COVID-19, or another disease-causing similar impacts, may adversely affect our business,
financial condition and results of operations and such impact may be material.
Further, to the extent COVID-19 adversely affects our business, financial condition, and results of operations and global
economic conditions more generally, it may also have the effect of heightening many of the other risks described
herein.
9
Table of Contents
Changes in global and regional economic conditions, the markets we serve, or the financial markets may adversely
affect our results of operations and cash flows.
Unfavorable conditions in the global economy or regional economies, the markets we serve or financial markets may
decrease the demand for our goods and services and adversely impact our revenues, operating results, and cash
flows.
Demand for our products and services depends in part on the general economic conditions affecting the countries and
markets in which we do business. Weak economic conditions in certain geographies and changing supply and demand
balances in the markets we serve have negatively impacted demand for our products and services in the past,
including most recently due to COVID-19, and may do so in the future. Reduced demand for our products and services
would have a negative impact on our revenues and earnings. In addition, reduced demand could depress sales, reduce
our margins, constrain our operating flexibility or reduce efficient utilization of our manufacturing capacity, or result in
charges which are unusual or nonrecurring. Excess capacity in our manufacturing facilities or those of our competitors
could decrease our ability to maintain pricing and generate profits.
In addition, our operating results in one or more segments may be affected by uncertain or deteriorating economic
conditions for particular customer markets within a segment. A decline in the industries served by our customers or
adverse events or circumstances affecting individual customers can reduce demand for our products and services, and
impair the ability of such customers to satisfy their obligations to us, resulting in uncollected receivables, unanticipated
contract terminations, project delays or the inability to recover plant investments, any of which may negatively impact
our financial results.
Weak overall demand or specific customer conditions may also cause customer shutdowns or defaults or other
inabilities to operate facilities profitably and may force sale or abandonment of facilities and equipment or prevent
projects from coming on-stream when expected. These or other events associated with weak economic conditions or
specific market, product, or customer events may require us to record an impairment on tangible assets, such as
facilities and equipment, or intangible assets, such as intellectual property or goodwill, which would have a negative
impact on our financial results.
Our extensive international operations can be adversely impacted by operational, economic, political, security, legal,
and currency translation risks that could decrease profitability.
In fiscal year 2020, over 60% of our sales were derived from customers outside the United States and many of our
operations, suppliers, and employees are located outside the United States. Our operations in foreign jurisdictions may
be subject to risks including exchange control regulations, import and trade restrictions, trade policy and other
potentially detrimental domestic and foreign governmental practices or policies affecting U.S. companies doing
business abroad. Changing economic and political conditions within foreign jurisdictions, strained relations between
countries, or the imposition of tariffs or international sanctions can cause fluctuations in demand, price volatility, supply
disruptions, or loss of property. The occurrence of any of these risks could have a material adverse impact on our
financial condition, results of operation, and cash flows.
Our growth strategies depend in part on our ability to further penetrate markets outside the United States, particularly in
markets such as China, India, Indonesia, and the Middle East, and involve significantly larger and more complex
projects, including gasification projects, some in regions where there is the potential for significant economic and
political disruptions. We are actively investing large amounts of capital and other resources, in some cases through
joint ventures, in developing markets, which we believe to have high growth potential. Our operations in these markets
may be subject to greater risks than those faced by our operations in mature economies, including political and
economic instability, project delay or abandonment due to unanticipated government actions, inadequate investment in
infrastructure, undeveloped property rights and legal systems, unfamiliar regulatory environments, relationships with
local partners, language and cultural differences and increased difficulty recruiting, training and retaining qualified
employees. In addition, our properties and contracts in these locations may be subject to seizure and cancellation,
respectively, without full compensation for loss. Successful operation of particular facilities or execution of projects may
be disrupted by civil unrest, acts of war, sabotage or terrorism, and other local security concerns. Such concerns may
require us to incur greater costs for security or require us to shut down operations for a period of time.
10
Table of Contents
Furthermore, because the majority of our revenue is generated from sales outside the United States, we are exposed
to fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates. Our business is primarily exposed to translational currency risk as
the results of our foreign operations are translated into U.S. dollars at current exchange rates throughout the fiscal
period. Our policy is to minimize cash flow volatility from changes in currency exchange rates. We choose not to hedge
the translation of our foreign subsidiaries’ earnings into dollars. Accordingly, reported sales, net earnings, cash flows,
and fair values have been, and in the future will be, affected by changes in foreign exchange rates. For a more detailed
discussion of currency exposure, see Item 7A, Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk, below.
Risks Related to Our Business
Operational and project execution risks, particularly with respect to our largest projects, may adversely affect our
operations or financial results.
A significant and growing portion of our business involves gasification and other large-scale projects that involve
challenging engineering, procurement and construction phases that may last up to several years. These projects are
technically complex, often reliant on significant interaction with government authorities and face significant financing,
development, operational and reputational risks. We may encounter difficulties in engineering, delays in designs or
materials provided by the customer or a third party, equipment and materials delivery delays, schedule changes,
customer scope changes, delays related to obtaining regulatory permits and rights-of-way, inability to find adequate
sources of labor in the locations where we are building new plants, weather-related delays, delays by customers'
contractors in completing their portion of a project, technical or transportation difficulties, cost overruns, supply
difficulties, geopolitical risks and other factors, many of which are beyond our control, that may impact our ability to
complete a project within the original delivery schedule. In some cases, delays and additional costs may be substantial,
and we may be required to cancel a project and/or compensate the customer for the delay. We may not be able to
recover any of these costs. In addition, in some cases we seek financing for large projects and face market risk
associated with the availability and terms of such financing. These financing arrangements may require that we comply
with certain performance requirements which, if not met, could result in default and restructuring costs or other losses.
All of these factors could also negatively impact our reputation or relationships with our customers, suppliers and other
third parties, any of which could adversely affect our ability to secure new projects in the future.
The operation of our facilities, pipelines, and delivery systems inherently entails hazards that require continuous
oversight and control, such as pipeline leaks and ruptures, fire, explosions, toxic releases, mechanical failures, or
vehicle accidents. If operational risks materialize, they could result in loss of life, damage to the environment, or loss of
production, all of which could negatively impact our ongoing operations, reputation, financial results, and cash flows. In
addition, our operating results are dependent on the continued operation of our production facilities and our ability to
meet customer requirements, which depend, in part, on our ability to properly maintain and replace aging assets.
We are subject to extensive government regulation in the jurisdictions in which we do business. Regulations
addressing, among other things, import/export restrictions, anti-bribery and corruption, and taxes, can negatively impact
our financial condition, results of operation, and cash flows.
We are subject to government regulation in the United States and in the foreign jurisdictions where we conduct
business. The application of laws and regulations to our business is sometimes unclear. Compliance with laws and
regulations may involve significant costs or require changes in business practices that could result in reduced
profitability. If there is a determination that we have failed to comply with applicable laws or regulations, we may be
subject to penalties or sanctions that could adversely impact our reputation and financial results. Compliance with
changes in laws or regulations can result in increased operating costs and require additional, unplanned capital
expenditures. Export controls or other regulatory restrictions could prevent us from shipping our products to and from
some markets or increase the cost of doing so. Changes in tax laws and regulations and international tax treaties could
affect the financial results of our businesses. Increasingly aggressive enforcement of anti-bribery and anti-corruption
requirements, including the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, the United Kingdom Bribery Act and the China Anti-
Unfair Competition Law, could subject us to criminal or civil sanctions if a violation is deemed to have occurred. In
addition, we are subject to laws and sanctions imposed by the U.S. and other jurisdictions where we do business that
may prohibit us, or certain of our affiliates, from doing business in certain countries, or restricting the kind of business
that we may conduct. Such restrictions may provide a competitive advantage to competitors who are not subject to
comparable restrictions or prevent us from taking advantage of growth opportunities.
11
Table of Contents
Further, we cannot guarantee that our internal controls and compliance systems will always protect us from acts
committed by employees, agents, business partners or that businesses that we acquire would not violate U.S. and/or
non-U.S. laws, including the laws governing payments to government officials, bribery, fraud, kickbacks and false
claims, pricing, sales and marketing practices, conflicts of interest, competition, export and import compliance, money
laundering, and data privacy. Any such improper actions or allegations of such acts could damage our reputation and
subject us to civil or criminal investigations in the U.S. and in other jurisdictions and related shareholder lawsuits, could
lead to substantial civil and criminal, monetary and non-monetary penalties, and could cause us to incur significant
legal and investigatory fees. In addition, the government may seek to hold us liable as a successor for violations
committed by companies in which we invest or that we acquire.
We may be unable to successfully identify, execute or effectively integrate acquisitions, or effectively disentangle
divested businesses.
Our ability to grow revenue, earnings, and cash flow at anticipated rates depends in part on our ability to identify,
successfully acquire and integrate businesses and assets at appropriate prices, and realize expected growth,
synergies, and operating efficiencies. We may not be able to complete transactions on favorable terms, on a timely
basis or at all. In addition, our results of operations and cash flows may be adversely impacted by the failure of
acquired businesses or assets to meet expected returns, the failure to integrate acquired businesses, the inability to
dispose of non-core assets and businesses on satisfactory terms and conditions, and the discovery of unanticipated
liabilities or other problems in acquired businesses or assets for which we lack adequate contractual protections or
insurance. In addition, we may incur asset impairment charges related to acquisitions that do not meet expectations.
We continually assess the strategic fit of our existing businesses and may divest businesses that are deemed not to fit
with our strategic plan or are not achieving the desired return on investment. These transactions pose risks and
challenges that could negatively impact our business and financial statements. For example, when we decide to sell or
otherwise dispose of a business or assets, we may be unable to do so on satisfactory terms within our anticipated time
frame or at all. In addition, divestitures or other dispositions may dilute our earnings per share, have other adverse
financial and accounting impacts, distract management, and give rise to disputes with buyers. In addition, we have
agreed, and may in the future agree, to indemnify buyers against known and unknown contingent liabilities. Our
financial results could be impacted adversely by claims under these indemnification provisions.
The security of our information technology systems could be compromised, which could adversely affect our ability to
operate.
We depend on information technology to enable us to operate efficiently and interface with customers as well as to
maintain our internal controls environment and financial reporting accuracy and efficiency. Our information technology
capabilities are delivered through a combination of internal and external services and service providers. If we do not
allocate and effectively manage the resources necessary to build and sustain the proper technology infrastructure, we
could be subject to transaction errors, processing inefficiencies, the loss of customers, business disruptions, or the loss
of or damage to our confidential business information due to a security breach. In addition, our information technology
systems may be damaged, disrupted or shut down due to attacks by computer hackers, computer viruses, employee
error or malfeasance, power outages, hardware failures, telecommunication or utility failures, catastrophes or other
unforeseen events, and in any such circumstances our system redundancy and other disaster recovery planning may
be ineffective or inadequate. Security breaches of our systems (or the systems of our customers, suppliers or other
business partners) could result in the misappropriation, destruction or unauthorized disclosure of confidential
information or personal data belonging to us or to our employees, partners, customers or suppliers, and may subject us
to legal liability.
As with most large systems, our information technology systems have in the past been, and in the future likely will be
subject to computer viruses, malicious codes, unauthorized access and other cyber-attacks, and we expect the
sophistication and frequency of such attacks to continue to increase. To date, we are not aware of any significant
impact on our operations or financial results from such attempts; however, unauthorized access could disrupt our
business operations, result in the loss of assets, and have a material adverse effect on our business, financial
condition, or results of operations. Any of the attacks, breaches or other disruptions or damage described above could:
interrupt our operations at one or more sites; delay production and shipments; result in the theft of our and our
customers’ intellectual property and trade secrets; damage customer and business partner relationships and our
reputation; result in defective products or services, legal claims and proceedings, liability and penalties under privacy
laws, or increased costs for security and remediation; or raise concerns regarding our internal controls environment and
internal controls over financial reporting. Each of these consequences could adversely affect our business, reputation
and our financial statements.
12
Table of Contents
Our business involves the use, storage, and transmission of information about our employees, vendors, and customers.
The protection of such information, as well as our proprietary information, is critical to us. The regulatory environment
surrounding information security and privacy is increasingly demanding, with the frequent imposition of new and
constantly changing requirements. We have established policies and procedures to help protect the security and
privacy of this information. We also, from time to time, export sensitive customer data and technical information to
recipients outside the United States. Breaches of our security measures or the accidental loss, inadvertent disclosure,
or unapproved dissemination of proprietary information or sensitive or confidential data about us or our customers,
including the potential loss or disclosure of such information or data as a result of fraud, trickery, or other forms of
deception, could expose us, our customers, or the individuals affected to a risk of loss or misuse of this information,
which could ultimately result in litigation and potential legal and financial liability. These events could also damage our
reputation or otherwise harm our business.
Interruption in ordinary sources of raw material or energy supply or an inability to recover increases in energy and raw
material costs from customers could result in lost sales or reduced profitability.
Hydrocarbons, including natural gas, are the primary feedstock for the production of hydrogen, carbon monoxide, and
syngas. Energy, including electricity, natural gas, and diesel fuel for delivery trucks, is the largest cost component of our
business. Because our industrial gas facilities use substantial amounts of electricity, energy price fluctuations could
materially impact our revenues and earnings. A disruption in the supply of energy, components, or raw materials,
whether due to market conditions, legislative or regulatory actions, natural events, or other disruption, could prevent us
from meeting our contractual commitments and harm our business and financial results.
Our supply of crude helium for purification and resale is largely dependent upon natural gas production by crude helium
suppliers. Lower natural gas production resulting from natural gas pricing dynamics, supplier operating or transportation
issues or other interruptions in sales from crude helium suppliers, can reduce our supplies of crude helium available for
processing and resale to customers.
We typically contract to pass-through cost increases in energy and raw materials to customers, but cost variability can
still have a negative impact on our results. We may be unable to raise prices as quickly as costs rise, or competitive
pressures may prevent full recovery of such costs. Increases in energy or raw material costs that cannot be passed on
to customers for competitive or other reasons may negatively impact our revenues and earnings. Even where costs are
passed through, price increases can cause lower sales volume.
New technologies create performance risks that could impact our financial results or reputation.
We are continually developing and implementing new technologies and product offerings. Existing technologies are
being implemented in products and designs or at scales beyond our experience base. These technological expansions
can create nontraditional performance risks to our operations. Failure of the technologies to work as predicted, or
unintended consequences of new designs or uses, could lead to cost overruns, project delays, financial penalties, or
damage to our reputation. In addition, large scale gasification projects may contain processes or technologies that we
have not operated at the same scale or in the same combination, and although such projects generally include
technologies and processes that have been demonstrated previously by others, such technologies or processes may
be new to us and may introduce new risks to our operations. Additionally, there is also a risk that our new technologies
may become obsolete and replaced by other market alternatives. Performance difficulties on these larger projects may
have a material adverse effect on our operations and financial results. In addition, performance challenges may
adversely affect our reputation and our ability to obtain future contracts for gasification projects.
Protecting our intellectual property is critical to our technological development and we may suffer competitive harm
from infringement on such rights.
As we develop new technologies, it is critical that we protect our intellectual property assets against third-party
infringement. We own a number of patents and other forms of intellectual property related to our products and services.
As we develop new technologies there is a risk that our patent applications may not be granted, or we may not receive
sufficient protection of our proprietary interests. We may also expend considerable resources in defending our patents
against third-party infringement. It is critical that we protect our proprietary interests to prevent competitive harm.
13
Table of Contents
Legal and Regulatory Risks
Legislative, regulatory and societal responses to global climate change create financial risk.
We are the world’s leading supplier of hydrogen, the primary use of which is the production of ultra-low sulfur
transportation fuels that have significantly reduced transportation emissions and helped improve human health. To
make the high volumes of hydrogen needed by our customers, we use steam methane reforming, which releases
carbon dioxide. In addition, although gasification enables the conversion of lower value feedstocks into cleaner energy
and value-added products, our gasification projects will increase our carbon footprint because the gasification process
produces carbon dioxide. Some of our operations are within jurisdictions that have or are developing regulatory
regimes governing GHG emissions, including CO, which may lead to direct and indirect costs on our operations.
Furthermore, some jurisdictions have various mechanisms to target the power sector to achieve emission reductions,
which often result in higher power costs.
Increased public concern and governmental action may result in more international, U.S. federal and/or regional
requirements to reduce or mitigate the effects of GHG emissions. Although uncertain, these developments could
increase our costs related to consumption of electric power, hydrogen production and application of our gasification
technology. We believe we will be able to mitigate some of the increased costs through contractual terms, but the lack
of definitive legislation or regulatory requirements prevents an accurate estimate of the long-term impact these
measures will have on our operations. Any legislation or governmental action that limits or taxes GHG emissions could
negatively impact our growth, increase our operating costs, or reduce demand for certain of our products.
Our financial results may be affected by various legal and regulatory proceedings, including antitrust, tax,
environmental, or other matters.
We are subject to litigation and regulatory investigations and proceedings in the normal course of business and could
become subject to additional claims in the future, some of which could be material. While we seek to limit our liability in
our commercial contractual arrangements, there are no guarantees that each contract will contain suitable limitations of
liability or that limitations of liability will be enforceable. Also, the outcome of existing legal proceedings may differ from
our expectations because the outcomes of litigation, including regulatory matters, are often difficult to predict reliably.
Various factors or developments can lead us to change current estimates of liabilities and related insurance
receivables, where applicable, or make such estimates for matters previously not susceptible to reasonable estimates,
such as a significant judicial ruling or judgment, a significant settlement, significant regulatory developments, or
changes in applicable law. A future adverse ruling, settlement, or unfavorable development could result in charges that
could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, results of operations, and cash flows in any particular
period.
Costs and expenses resulting from compliance with environmental regulations may negatively impact our operations
and financial results.
We are subject to extensive federal, state, local, and foreign environmental and safety laws and regulations concerning,
among other things, emissions in the air; discharges to land and water; and the generation, handling, treatment, and
disposal of hazardous waste and other materials. We take our environmental responsibilities very seriously, but there is
a risk of adverse environmental impact inherent in our manufacturing operations and in the transportation of our
products. Future developments and more stringent environmental regulations may require us to make additional
unforeseen environmental expenditures. In addition, laws and regulations may require significant expenditures for
environmental protection equipment, compliance, and remediation. These additional costs may adversely affect our
financial results. For a more detailed description of these matters, see Item 1, Business–Environmental Regulation,
above.2
14
Table of Contents
A change of tax law in key jurisdictions could result in a material increase in our tax expense.
The multinational nature of our business subjects us to taxation in the United States and numerous foreign jurisdictions.
Due to economic and political conditions, tax rates in various jurisdictions may be subject to significant change. Our
future effective tax rates could be affected by changes in the mix of earnings in countries with differing statutory tax
rates, changes in the valuation of deferred tax assets and liabilities, or changes in tax laws or their interpretation.
Changes to income tax laws and regulations in any of the jurisdictions in which we operate, or in the interpretation of
such laws, could significantly increase our effective tax rate and adversely impact our financial condition, results of
operations or cash flows. In December 2017, the U.S. enacted the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (the "Tax Act"), which
significantly revised the U.S. federal corporate income tax law by, among other things, lowering the corporate income
tax rate, implementing a territorial tax system, and imposing a one-time tax on accumulated, unremitted non-U.S.
earnings of foreign subsidiaries. Various levels of government are increasingly focused on tax reform and other
legislative action to increase tax revenue. Further changes in tax laws in the U.S. or foreign jurisdictions where we
operate could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations, or financial condition.
We could incur significant liability if the distribution of Versum common stock to our stockholders is determined to be a
taxable transaction.
We have received an opinion from outside tax counsel to the effect that the spin-off of Versum qualifies as a transaction
that is described in Sections 355(a) and 368(a)(1)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code. The opinion relies on certain facts,
assumptions, representations and undertakings from Versum and us regarding the past and future conduct of the
companies’ respective businesses and other matters. If any of these facts, assumptions, representations or
undertakings are incorrect or not satisfied, our shareholders and we may not be able to rely on the opinion of tax
counsel and could be subject to significant tax liabilities. Notwithstanding the opinion of tax counsel we have received,
the IRS could determine on audit that the spin-off is taxable if it determines that any of these facts, assumptions,
representations or undertakings are not correct or have been violated or if it disagrees with the conclusions in the
opinion. If the spin-off is determined to be taxable for U.S. federal income tax purposes, our shareholders that are
subject to U.S. federal income tax and we could incur significant U.S. federal income tax liabilities.
General Risk Factors
Catastrophic events could disrupt our operations or the operations of our suppliers or customers, having a negative
impact on our business, financial results, and cash flows.
Our operations could be impacted by catastrophic events outside our control, including severe weather conditions such
as hurricanes, floods, earthquakes, storms, epidemics, pandemics, acts of war and terrorism. Any such event could
cause a serious business disruption that could affect our ability to produce and distribute products and possibly expose
us to third-party liability claims. Additionally, such events could impact our suppliers, customers and partners, which
could cause energy and raw materials to be unavailable to us, or our customers to be unable to purchase or accept our
products and services. Any such occurrence could have a negative impact on our operations and financial results.
The United Kingdom’s (“UK”) exit from European Union (“EU”) membership could adversely affect our European
Operations.
The UK’s exit from EU membership may adversely affect customer demand, our relationships with customers and
suppliers and our European business. Although it is unknown what the terms of the United Kingdom’s future
relationship with the EU will be, it is possible that there will be greater restrictions on imports and exports between the
United Kingdom and EU members and increased regulatory complexities. Any of these factors could adversely affect
customer demand, our relationships with customers and suppliers, and our European business overall.
Inability to compete effectively in a segment could adversely impact sales and financial performance.
We face strong competition from large global competitors and many smaller regional competitors in many of our
business segments. Introduction by competitors of new technologies, competing products, or additional capacity could
weaken demand for, or impact pricing of our products, negatively impacting financial results. In addition, competitors’
pricing policies could affect our profitability or market share.
15
Table of Contents
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments.
We have not received any written comments from the Commission staff that remain unresolved.
Item 2. Properties.
Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. owns its principal administrative offices, which are the Company’s headquarters
located in Trexlertown, Pennsylvania; Hersham, England; Medellin, Colombia; and Santiago, Chile. We lease the
principal administrative offices in Shanghai, China; Pune, India; Vadodara, India; and Dhahran, Saudi Arabia. We lease
administrative offices in the United States, Canada, Spain, Malaysia, and China for our Global Business Support
organization. In addition, we are currently constructing new administrative offices and a co-located research and
development facility in Trexlertown, Pennsylvania in preparation for re-location of our principal offices to the nearby site.
Descriptions of the properties used by our five business segments are provided below. We believe that our facilities are
suitable and adequate for our current and anticipated future levels of operation.
Industrial Gases – Americas
This business segment currently operates from over 425 production and distribution facilities in North and South
America. Approximately 25% of these facilities are located on owned property and 10% are integrated sites that serve
dedicated customers as well as merchant customers. We have sufficient property rights and permits for the ongoing
operation of our pipeline systems in the Gulf Coast, California, and Arizona in the United States and Alberta and
Ontario, Canada. Management and sales support is based in our Trexlertown, Medellin, and Santiago offices referred
to above, and at 12 leased properties located throughout North and South America.
We built hydrogen fueling stations that support commercial markets in California and Japan as well as demonstration
projects in Europe and other parts of Asia.
Industrial Gases – EMEA
This business segment currently operates from over 200 production and distribution facilities in Europe, the Middle
East, India, and Africa, approximately one-third of which are on owned property. We have sufficient property rights and
permits for the ongoing operation of our pipeline systems in the Netherlands, the United Kingdom, Belgium, France,
and Germany. Management and sales support for this business segment is based in Hersham, England, referred to
above; Barcelona, Spain; and at 16 leased regional office sites and 15 leased local office sites, located throughout the
region.
Industrial Gases – Asia
This business segment currently operates from over 211 production and distribution facilities within Asia, approximately
25% of which are on owned property or long-duration term grants. We have sufficient property rights and permits for
the ongoing operation of our pipeline systems in China, South Korea, Taiwan, Malaysia, Singapore, and Indonesia.
Management and sales support for this business segment is based in Shanghai, China, and Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia,
and in 30 leased office locations throughout the region.
Industrial Gases – Global
Management, sales, and engineering support for this business segment is based in our principal administrative offices
noted above.
Equipment is manufactured in Missouri in the United States and Shanghai, China.
Research and development activities for this business segment are conducted at owned locations in the United States,
the United Kingdom, and Spain, and three leased locations in Europe and Asia.
Helium is processed at multiple sites in the United States and then distributed to and from transfill sites globally.
16
Table of Contents
Corporate and other
Corporate administrative functions are based in our administrative offices referred to above.
The LNG business operates a manufacturing facility in Florida in the United States with management, engineering, and
sales support based in the Trexlertown offices referred to above.
The Gardner Cryogenic business operates at facilities in Pennsylvania and Kansas in the United States.
The Rotoflow business operates manufacturing and service facilities in Texas and Pennsylvania in the United States
with management, engineering, and sales support based in the Trexlertown offices referred to above and a nearby
leased office.
Item 3. Legal Proceedings.
In the normal course of business, we and our subsidiaries are involved in various legal proceedings, including
commercial, competition, environmental, intellectual property, regulatory, product liability, and insurance matters.
Although litigation with respect to these matters is routine and incidental to the conduct of our business, such litigation
could result in large monetary awards, especially if compensatory and/or punitive damages are awarded. However, we
believe that litigation currently pending to which we are a party will be resolved without any material adverse effect on
our financial position, earnings, or cash flows.
From time to time, we are also involved in proceedings, investigations, and audits involving governmental authorities in
connection with environmental, health, safety, competition, and tax matters.
We are a party to proceedings under CERCLA, RCRA, and similar state and foreign environmental laws relating to the
designation of certain sites for investigation or remediation. Presently there are 31 sites on which a final settlement has
not been reached where we, along with others, have been designated a potentially responsible party by the
Environmental Protection Agency or is otherwise engaged in investigation or remediation, including cleanup activity at
certain of its current and former manufacturing sites. We do not expect that any sums we may have to pay in
connection with these environmental matters would have a material adverse impact on our consolidated financial
position. Additional information on our environmental exposure is included under Item 1, Business–Environmental
Regulation, and Note 17, Commitments and Contingencies, to the consolidated financial statements.
In September 2010, the Brazilian Administrative Council for Economic Defense ("CADE") issued a decision against our
Brazilian subsidiary, Air Products Brasil Ltda., and several other Brazilian industrial gas companies for alleged
anticompetitive activities. CADE imposed a civil fine of R$179.2 million (approximately $32 million at 30 September
2020) on Air Products Brasil Ltda. This fine was based on a recommendation by a unit of the Brazilian Ministry of
Justice, whose investigation began in 2003, alleging violation of competition laws with respect to the sale of industrial
and medical gases. The fines are based on a percentage of our total revenue in Brazil in 2003.
We have denied the allegations made by the authorities and filed an appeal in October 2010 to the Brazilian courts. On
6 May 2014, our appeal was granted and the fine against Air Products Brasil Ltda. was dismissed. CADE has appealed
that ruling and the matter remains pending. We, with advice of our outside legal counsel, have assessed the status of
this matter and have concluded that, although an adverse final judgment after exhausting all appeals is possible, such
a judgment is not probable. As a result, no provision has been made in the consolidated financial statements.
Other than the CADE matter discussed above, we do not currently believe there are any legal proceedings, individually
or in the aggregate, that are reasonably possible to have a material impact on our financial condition, results of
operations, or cash flows. However, a future charge for regulatory fines or damage awards could have a significant
impact on our net income in the period in which it is recorded.
Additional information on our legal proceedings can be found in Note 17, Commitments and Contingencies, to the
consolidated financial statements.
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures.
Not applicable.
17
Table of Contents
PART II
Item 5. Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases
of Equity Securities.
Our common stock is listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol "APD." As of 31 October 2020, there
were 4,957 record holders of our common stock.
Cash dividends on our common stock are paid quarterly. It is our expectation that we will continue to pay cash
dividends in the future at comparable or increased levels. The Board of Directors determines whether to declare
dividends and the timing and amount based on financial condition and other factors it deems relevant. Dividend
information for each quarter of fiscal years 2020 and 2019 is summarized below:
2020 2019
Fourth quarter $1.34 $1.16 
Third quarter $1.34 $1.16 
Second quarter $1.34 $1.16 
First quarter $1.16 $1.10 
Total $5.18 $4.58 
Purchases of Equity Securities by the Issuer
On 15 September 2011, the Board of Directors authorized the repurchase of up to $1.0 billion of our outstanding
common stock. This program does not have a stated expiration date. We repurchase shares pursuant to Rules 10b5-1
and 10b-18 under the Exchange Act through repurchase agreements established with one or more brokers. There were
no purchases of stock during fiscal year 2020. At 30 September 2020, $485.3 million in share repurchase authorization
remained. Additional purchases will be completed at our discretion while maintaining sufficient funds for investing in
businesses and growth opportunities.
18
Table of Contents
Performance Graph
The performance graph below compares the five-year cumulative returns of our common stock with those of the
Standard & Poor’s 500 Index ("S&P 500 Index") and the Standard & Poor’s 500 Materials Index ("S&P 500 Materials
Index"). The figures assume an initial investment of $100 and the reinvestment of all dividends.
Sept 2015Sept 2016Sept 2017Sept 2018Sept 2019Sept 2020
Air Products & Chemicals, Inc. 100 120 134 153 208 285
S&P 500 Index 100 115 137 161 168 194
S&P 500 Materials Index 100 122 148 154 158 178
19
Table of Contents
Item 6. Selected Financial Data.
(Millions of dollars, except for share and per share data) 2020 2019 2018 2017 2016
Sales $8,856  $8,919 $8,930 $8,188 $7,504 
Operating income 2,238  2,144 1,966 1,440 1,535 
Operating margin 25.3 % 24.0 % 22.0 % 17.6 % 20.5 %
Equity af filiates’  income 265 215 175 80 147 
Net income 1,931  1,809 1,533 3,021 662 
Net income margin 21.8 % 20.3 % 17.2 % 36.9 % 8.8 %
Income from continuing operations 1,945  1,809 1,491 1,155 1,122 
Basic earnings per common share from continuing operations 8.59 7.99 6.64 5.20 5.08 
Diluted earnings per common share from continuing
operations 8.55 7.94 6.59 5.16 5.04 
Adjusted diluted earnings per common share from continuing
operations $8.38  $8.21 $7.45 $6.31 $5.64 
Adjusted EBITDA 3,620  3,468 3,116 2,799 2,622 
Adjusted EBITDA  margin 40.9 % 38.9 % 34.9 % 34.2 % 34.9 %
Dividends declared per common share 5.18 4.58 4.25 3.71 3.39 
Total assets 25,169  18,943 19,178 18,467 18,029 
Total debt 7,908  3,326 3,813 3,963 5,211 
Fiscal year 2020 included a benefit of $34 related to legislation passed by the Indian government in the second quarter. Fiscal year 2018
included an expense of $29 related to the U.S. Tax Cuts and Jobs Act. Fiscal year 2017 included the impact of an other-than-temporary noncash
impairment charge of $80 on a 25%‑owned equity affiliate in Saudi Arabia.
Fiscal year 2017 included net income from discontinued operations of $1,866 primarily resulting from the sale of the Performance Materials
Division to Evonik Industries AG. Fiscal year 2016 included a net loss from discontinued operations of $465, which included an after-tax loss of
$847 related to the exit of Energy-from-Waste, partially offset by income from operations of the former Electronic Materials and Performance
Materials divisions.
A reconciliation of adjusted diluted earnings per common share from continuing operations to diluted earnings per common share from
continuing operations on a GAAP basis is presented on page 32. A reconciliation of adjusted EBITDA and adjusted EBITDA margin to net
income and net income margin on a GAAP basis, respectively, is presented on page 33.
Total assets as of 30 September 2020 was impacted by proceeds from the issuance of U.S. Dollar- and Euro-denominated fixed-rate notes in
the third quarter of fiscal year 2020. Total assets as of 30 September 2017 and 2016 included those associated with continuing and discontinued
operations.
Total debt includes long-term debt and current portion of long-term debt, including debt owed to related parties, and short-term borrowings as of
the end of the fiscal year for continuing operations. Long-term obligations increased in fiscal year 2020 due to the issuance of U.S. Dollar- and
Euro-denominated fixed-rate notes in the third quarter. Long-term obligations decreased in fiscal year 2017 primarily due to debt repayments
subsequent to the spin-off of the former Electronic Materials Division as Versum Materials, Inc.(A)
(B)
(C)
(C)
(C)
(D)
(E)
(A)
(B)
(C)
(D)
(E)
20
Table of Contents
Item 7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
Business Overview 22
2020 in Summary 22
2021 Outlook 24
Results of Operations 24
Reconciliations of Non-GAAP Financial Measures 31
Liquidity and Capital Resources 35
Contractual Obligations 38
Pension Benefits 40
Environmental Matters 41
Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements 41
Related Party Transactions 41
Inflation 41
Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates 42
New Accounting Guidance 48
This Management’s Discussion and Analysis contains “forward-looking statements” within the safe harbor provisions of
the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including statements about business outlook. These forward-
looking statements are based on management’s expectations and assumptions as of the date of this Annual Report
and are not guarantees of future performance. Actual performance and financial results may differ materially from
projections and estimates expressed in the forward-looking statements because of many factors not anticipated by
management, including, without limitation, those described in Forward-Looking Statements and Item 1A, Risk Factors,
of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
The discussion that follows includes a comparison of our results of operations and liquidity and capital resources for
fiscal years 2020 and 2019. For the discussion of changes from fiscal year 2018 to fiscal year 2019 and other financial
information related to fiscal year 2018, refer to Part II, Item 7, Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial
Condition and Results of Operations, of our Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended 30 September 2019. This document
was filed with the SEC on 26 November 2019.
The following discussion should be read in conjunction with the consolidated financial statements and the
accompanying notes contained in this Annual Report. Unless otherwise stated, financial information is presented in
millions of dollars, except for per share data. Except for net income, which includes the results of discontinued
operations, financial information is presented on a continuing operations basis.
The financial measures included in the discussion that follows are presented in accordance with U.S. generally
accepted accounting principles ("GAAP"), except as noted. We present certain financial measures on an "adjusted," or
"non-GAAP," basis because we believe such measures, when viewed together with financial results computed in
accordance with GAAP, provide a more complete understanding of the factors and trends affecting our historical
financial performance. For each non-GAAP financial measure, including adjusted diluted earnings per share ("EPS"),
adjusted EBITDA, adjusted EBITDA margin, and adjusted effective tax rate, we present a reconciliation to the most
directly comparable financial measure calculated in accordance with GAAP. These reconciliations and explanations
regarding the use of these measures are presented beginning on page 31.
In March 2020, the World Health Organization declared the novel strain of coronavirus, COVID-19, a global pandemic
and recommended containment and mitigation measures worldwide. In response to COVID-19, we implemented
certain health and safety policies to help keep our employees, contractors, customers, and communities safe while
continuing to run our facilities, which generally have been considered "essential" by local governments and public
health authorities. In compliance with government protocols, our non-essential employees were instructed to work from
home until government mandated restrictions allow for a return to the workplace. Those working and visiting our sites
are required to follow appropriate procedures, including completion of trainings and performance of self- and on-site
screenings, as well as adhere to our personal protective equipment, social distancing, and personal hygiene protocols.
21
Table of Contents
BUSINESS OVER VIEW
Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. is a world-leading industrial gases company that has been in operation for 80 years.
Focused on serving energy, environment and emerging markets, we provide essential industrial gases, related
equipment and applications expertise to customers in dozens of industries, including refining, chemical, metals,
electronics, manufacturing, and food and beverage. Air Products is also the global leader in the supply of liquefied
natural gas ("LNG") process technology and equipment. We develop, engineer, build, own and operate some of the
world's largest industrial gas projects, including gasification projects that sustainably convert abundant natural
resources into syngas for the production of high-value power, fuels and chemicals.
With operations in 50 countries, in fiscal year 2020 we had sales of $8.9 billion and assets of $25.2 billion.
Approximately 19,275 passionate, talented and committed full- and part-time employees from diverse backgrounds are
driven by Air Products’ higher purpose to create innovative solutions that benefit the environment, enhance
sustainability and address the challenges facing customers, communities, and the world.
As of 30 September 2020, our operations were organized into five reportable business segments:
•Industrial Gases – Americas;
•Industrial Gases – EMEA (Europe, Middle East, and Africa);
•Industrial Gases – Asia;
•Industrial Gases – Global; and
•Corporate and other
This Management’s Discussion and Analysis discusses our results based on these operations. Refer to Note 25,
Business Segment and Geographic Information, to the consolidated financial statements for additional details on our
reportable business segments.
2020 IN SUMMAR Y
In fiscal year 2020, our number one priority was the safety and well-being of our people. Since the beginning of the
COVID-19 pandemic, we have kept our global plants running, supplied critical products, and supported our local
communities during this time of need. We continued to win significant new growth projects around the world and serve
our customers, delivering stable results despite the significant health crisis facing the world. We also remained focused
on sustainability and our commitment to advancing diversity and inclusion. We set new goals that are aligned with Air
Products' business strategy and higher purpose to create innovative solutions that benefit the environment, enhance
sustainability, and address the challenges facing customers, communities, and the world.
Fiscal year 2020 results and highlights are summarized below:
•Sales of $8,856.3 decreased 1%, or $62.6, as 3% higher pricing and 2% favorable volumes were more than offset
by 4% lower energy and natural gas cost pass-through to customers, 1% unfavorable currency, and the 1% impact
of a contract modification to a tolling arrangement in India. We estimate that COVID-19 negatively impacted our
overall sales by approximately 4%, primarily driven by lower volumes in our merchant business in the regional
industrial gas segments.
•Operating income of $2,237.6 increased 4%, or $93.2, and operating margin of 25.3% increased 130 bp.
•Net income of $1,931.1 increased 7%, or $121.7, and net income margin of 21.8% increased 150 bp.
•Adjusted EBITDA of $3,619.8 increased 4%, or $151.8, and adjusted EBITDA margin of 40.9% increased 200 bp.
•Diluted EPS of $8.55 increased 8%, or $0.61, and adjusted diluted EPS of $8.38 increased 2%, or $0.17. We
estimate that COVID-19 negatively impacted our fiscal year 2020 EPS by approximately $0.60-$0.65 per share. A
summary table of changes in diluted EPS is presented below.
22
Table of Contents
Fiscal year 2020 results and highlights (continued):
•We increased our quarterly dividend by over 15% from $1.16 to $1.34 per share, representing the largest dividend
increase in our 80-year history. This is the 38 consecutive year that we have increased our quarterly dividend
payment.
•We successfully executed a debt offering of approximately $5 billion during the third quarter, supporting significant
opportunities to invest in high-return industrial gas projects and the repayment of upcoming debt maturities. The
issuance included both U.S. Dollar- and Euro-denominated fixed-rate notes.
Changes in Diluted EPS Attributable to Air Products
The per share impacts presented in the table below were calculated independently and may not sum to the total
change in diluted EPS due to rounding.
Increase
Year Ended 30 September 2020 2019 (Decrease)
Diluted EPS
Total Diluted EPS $8.49 $7.94 $0.55 
Less: Diluted EPS from loss from discontinued operations (0.06) — (0.06)
Diluted EPS From Continuing Operations $8.55 $7.94 $0.61 
Operating Impacts
Underlying business
Volume ($0.19)
Price, net of variable costs 0.77 
Other costs (0.38)
Currency (0.07)
Facility closure 0.10 
Company headquarters relocation income (expense) 0.12 
Cost reduction actions 0.08 
Gain on exchange of equity affiliate investments (0.13)
Total Operating Impacts $0.30 
Other Impacts
Equity affiliates' income $0.06 
Interest expense 0.10 
Other non-operating income (expense), net (0.13)
Change in effective tax rate, excluding discrete items below 0.04 
India Finance Act 2020 0.06 
Tax reform repatriation (0.06)
Tax reform adjustment related to deemed foreign dividends 0.26 
Noncontrolling interests 0.02 
Weighted average diluted shares (0.03)
Total Other Impacts $0.32 
Total Change in Diluted EPS From Continuing Operations $0.61 
 Includes an estimated negative impact of $0.60-$0.65 from COVID-19. This estimate includes impacts on our sales, costs, and
equity af filiates' income.th
(A)
(A)
23
Table of Contents
Increase
Year Ended 30 September 2020 2019 (Decrease)
Diluted EPS From Continuing Operations $8.55 $7.94 $0.61 
Facility closure — 0.10 (0.10)
Cost reduction actions — 0.08 (0.08)
Gain on exchange of equity affiliate investments — (0.13) 0.13 
Company headquarters relocation (income) expense (0.12) — (0.12)
India Finance Act 2020 (0.06) — (0.06)
Pension settlement loss — 0.02 (0.02)
Tax reform repatriation — (0.06) 0.06 
Tax reform adjustment related to deemed foreign dividends — 0.26 (0.26)
Adjusted Diluted EPS From Continuing Operations $8.38 $8.21 $0.17 
2021 OUTLOOK
As COVID-19 continues, we remain focused on the safety and well-being of our people. We are committed to safely
maintaining plant operations and ensuring business continuity, including providing financial security for employees,
reliably supplying critical products and services to our customers, and winning new opportunities for world-scale
projects.
We expect lower volumes from COVID-19 to continue into fiscal year 2021 with recovery in demand depending on the
duration of COVID-19 and measures implemented by governments, public health authorities and businesses to mitigate
its spread. Given the dynamic nature of these circumstances, the future impact on our ongoing business, results of
operations, and overall financial performance cannot be reasonably estimated.
Despite the uncertainty of the duration of COVID-19, we will continue to focus on pricing discipline in our merchant
business and expect our onsite business model, which represents approximately half of our business, to continue
generating stable cash flow. This will allow us to execute our strategic focus on our industrial gas business and the
creation of long-term shareholder value, including the ongoing growth of our dividend, continued execution of projects
in our backlog, and new investments in high-return industrial gas projects.
A long-term onsite customer in Asia delayed restarting their plant following a planned major maintenance turnaround
completed in September 2020. While we expect the plant to restart in fiscal year 2021, we are negotiating with the
customer regarding contract terms that could impact sales in our Industrial Gases – Asia segment.
The above guidance should be read in conjunction with the Forward-Looking Statements of this Annual Report on Form
10-K.
RESUL TS OF OPERA TIONS
Discussion of Consolidated Results
2020 2019$ Change Change
GAAP Measures
Sales $8,856.3 $8,918.9 ($62.6) (1)%
Operating income 2,237.6 2,144.4 93.2 4 %
Operating margin 25.3 % 24.0 % 130 bp
Equity affiliates’ income $264.8 $215.4 49.4 23 %
Net income 1,931.1 1,809.4 121.7 7 %
Net income margin 21.8 % 20.3 % 150  bp
Non-GAAP Measures
Adjusted EBITDA $3,619.8 $3,468.0 151.8 4 %
Adjusted EBITDA margin 40.9 % 38.9 % 200 bp
24
Table of Contents
Sales
Sales % Change from Prior Year
Volume 2 %
Price 3 %
Energy and natural gas cost pass-through (4)%
Currency (1)%
Other (1)%
Total Consolidated Sales Change (1)%
Includes the impact from the modification of a hydrogen supply contract to a tolling arrangement in India in December 2018 (the
"India contract modification").
Sales of $8,856.3 decreased 1%, or $62.6, as higher pricing of 3% and favorable volumes of 2% were more than offset
by lower energy and natural gas cost pass-through to customers of 4%, unfavorable currency of 1%, and the impact
from the India contract modification of 1%. The pricing improvement was attributable to our merchant business across
the regional segments. The volume growth exceeded the negative impacts from COVID-19 and was primarily driven by
acquisitions, new plants, and higher sale of equipment project activity. We estimate that COVID-19 negatively impacted
overall sales by approximately 4%, primarily driven by lower volumes in our merchant business across the regional
segments as our onsite business remained stable. Unfavorable currency impacts were driven by the Chilean Peso,
Chinese Renminbi, Euro, and South Korean Won.
Cost of Sales and Gross Margin
Cost of sales of $5,858.1 decreased 2%, or $146.4, from total cost of sales of $6,004.5 in the prior year, which included
the facility closure further discussed below. The decrease from the prior year was driven by lower energy and natural
gas cost pass-through to customers of $314, positive currency impacts of $73, the favorable impact from the India
contract modification of $41, and the prior year facility closure of $29, partially offset by higher costs attributable to
sales volumes of $250 and higher other costs, including planned maintenance, of $61. Gross margin of 33.9%
increased 120 bp from 32.7% in the prior year, primarily due to positive pricing, lower energy and natural gas cost pass-
through to customers, and the prior year facility closure, partially offset by unfavorable volume mix and net operating
costs.
Facility Closure
In fiscal year 2019, one of our customers was subject to a government enforced shutdown due to environmental
reasons. As a result, we recognized a charge of $29.0 ($22.1 after-tax, or $0.10 per share) primarily related to the
write-off of onsite assets. This charge was reflected as “Facility closure” on our consolidated income statements for the
fiscal year ended 30 September 2019 and was not recorded in segment results.
Selling and Administrative
Selling and administrative expense of $775.9 increased 3%, or $25.9, due to higher business development costs to
support our growth strategy and higher incentive compensation, partially offset by currency impacts and lower travel
expenses. Selling and administrative expense, as a percentage of sales, increased from 8.4% to 8.8%.
Research and Development
Research and development expense of $83.9 increased 15%, or $11.0, primarily due to higher product development
costs. Research and development expense as a percentage of sales increased from 0.8% to 0.9%.
Company Headquarters Relocation Income (Expense)
During the second quarter of fiscal year 2020, we sold property at our current corporate headquarters located in
Trexlertown, Pennsylvania, for net proceeds of $44.1. The sale was completed in anticipation of relocating our U.S.
headquarters and resulted in a gain of $33.8 ($25.6 after-tax, or $0.12 per share). This gain is reflected on our
consolidated income statements as "Company headquarters relocation income (expense)" for the fiscal year ended 30
September 2020 and was not recorded in segment results.(A)
(A)
25
Table of Contents
Cost Reduction Actions
In fiscal year 2019, we recognized an expense of $25.5 ($18.8 after-tax, or $0.08 per share) for severance and other
benefits associated with position eliminations, primarily within the Industrial Gases – EMEA and the Industrial Gases –
Americas segments. This expense was reflected as "Cost reduction actions" on our consolidated income statements for
the fiscal year ended 30 September 2019 and was not recorded in segment results. Refer to Note 5, Cost Reduction
Actions, to the consolidated financial statements for additional information.
Gain on Exchange of Equity Affiliate Investments
In fiscal year 2019, we recognized a net gain of $29.1 ($0.13 per share) resulting from the exchange of two 50%-owned
industrial gas joint ventures in China. The net gain was reflected as "Gain on exchange of equity affiliate investments"
on our consolidated income statements for the fiscal year ended 30 September 2019 and was not recorded in segment
results. Refer to Note 3, Acquisitions, to the consolidated financial statements for additional information.
Other Income (Expense), Net
Other income (expense), net of $65.4 increased 33%, or $16.1, primarily due to the adjustment of a benefit plan liability
resulting from a change in plan terms.
Operating Income and Margin
Operating income of $2,237.6 increased 4%, or $93.2, due to positive pricing, net of power and fuel costs, of $212,
income associated with the company headquarters relocation of $34, and prior year charges for a facility closure of $29
and cost reduction actions of $26, partially offset by higher net operating costs of $104, including planned maintenance,
unfavorable volume mix of $55, a gain on the exchange of equity affiliates of $29 in the prior year, and unfavorable
currency of $20.
Operating margin of 25.3% increased 130 bp, primarily due to positive pricing, lower energy and natural gas cost pass-
through to customers, the impact of income associated with the company headquarters relocation, and prior year
charges for a facility closure and cost reduction actions, partially offset by unfavorable volume mix, higher operating
costs, and a gain on the exchange of two equity affiliates in the prior year.
Equity Affiliates’ Income
Equity affiliates' income of $264.8 increased 23%, or $49.4, primarily due to a current year benefit of $33.8 for the
release of our share of accumulated dividend distribution taxes related to an Indian affiliate as a result of the enactment
of a tax law in India. Refer to Note 22, Income Taxes, to the consolidated financial statements for additional information.
The current year also includes higher income from affiliates in India, Italy, and Saudi Arabia, partially offset by negative
impacts from COVID-19.
Interest Expense
2020 2019
Interest incurred $125.2 $150.5 
Less: Capitalized interest 15.9 13.5 
Interest expense $109.3 $137.0 
Interest incurred decreased 17%, or $25.3. The prior year included an expense of $33.3 related to foreign currency
forward points and currency swap basis differences ("excluded components") of our cash flow hedges of intercompany
loans. As discussed in Note 2, New Accounting Guidance, to the consolidated financial statements, we adopted new
accounting guidance on hedging activities that changed the presentation of these items from "Interest expense, net" to
“Other non-operating income (expense), net” in fiscal year 2020. In addition to this presentation change, interest
incurred decreased due to lower expenses related to the Lu'An joint venture financing and a lower average interest rate
on the debt portfolio, partially offset by a higher debt balance due to the issuance of debt during the third quarter of
fiscal year 2020. Refer to Note 15, Debt, to the consolidated financial statements for additional information. We expect
interest expense to be higher in future periods due to this issuance. Capitalized interest increased 18%, or $2.4, due to
an increase in the carrying value of projects under construction.
26
Table of Contents
Other Non-Operating Income (Expense), Net
Other non-operating income of $30.7 decreased 54%, or $36.0, primarily due to an expense of $33.5 for the excluded
components of cash flow hedges of intercompany loans. These components were historically recorded in "Interest
expense" prior to the adoption of the guidance discussed above. The current year also included lower interest income
on cash and cash items. These factors were partially offset by higher non-service pension income due to lower interest
cost and higher expected asset returns, primarily for our U.S. pension plans. The prior year includes a settlement loss
of $5.0 ($3.8 after-tax, or $0.02 per share) associated with the U.S. Supplementary Pension Plan.
Discontinued Operations
During the second quarter of fiscal year 2020, we recorded a pre-tax loss from discontinued operations of $19.0 ($14.3
after-tax, or $0.06 per share) to increase our liability for retained environmental obligations associated with the sale of
our former Amines business in September 2006. Refer to the Pace discussion within Note 17, Commitments and
Contingencies, to the consolidated financial statements for additional information.
Net Income and Net Income Margin
Net income of $1,931.1 increased 7%, or $121.7, primarily due to higher pricing and income from the sale of property at
our current corporate headquarters. In addition, the prior year was negatively impacted by a facility closure, cost
reduction actions, and the U.S. Tax Cuts and Jobs Act. These factors were partially offset by higher costs, including the
after-tax loss from discontinued operations, unfavorable volume mix, and a gain on the exchange of two equity affiliates
in the prior year. Net income margin of 21.8% increased 150 bp, primarily due to the factors noted above as well as
lower energy and natural gas cost pass-through to customers.
Adjusted EBITDA and Adjusted EBITDA Margin
Adjusted EBITDA of $3,619.8 increased 4%, or $151.8, primarily due to higher pricing, partially offset by higher
operating costs. Adjusted EBITDA margin of 40.9% increased 200 bp, primarily due to the higher pricing and lower
energy and natural gas cost pass-through to customers, partially offset by unfavorable volume mix and higher operating
costs.
Effective Tax Rate
The effective tax rate equals the income tax provision divided by income from continuing operations before taxes. The
effective tax rate was 19.7% and 21.0% for the fiscal years ended 30 September 2020 and 2019, respectively.
The 2019 tax rate reflected a discrete net income tax expense of $43.8 related to impacts from the U.S. Tax Cuts and
Jobs Act (the “Tax Act”). The net expense included the reversal of a non-recurring $56.2 ($0.26 per share) benefit
recorded in 2018 related to the U.S. taxation of deemed foreign dividends. This was partially offset by a benefit of $12.4
($0.06 per share) to finalize our estimates of the impacts of the Tax Act and reduce the total expected costs of the
deemed repatriation tax. In addition, the net expense from the Tax Act was partially offset by benefits from changes in
valuation allowance recorded at various entities in 2019.
The lower current year rate reflects favorable impacts from higher benefits on the revaluation of deferred tax accounts
due to enacted changes in foreign tax law, changes in the tax profile of U.S. entities in various state jurisdictions, and
higher excess tax benefits on share-based compensation. These items were partially offset by the enactment of the
India Finance Act 2020 (the "India Finance Act"), which increased income tax expense by $20.3. The enactment also
increased equity affiliates' income by $33.8 for changes in the future tax costs of repatriated earnings. The overall
impact to net income resulting from the India Finance Act was a benefit of $13.5 ($0.06 per share).
The adjusted effective tax rate was 19.1% and 19.4% for the fiscal years ended 30 September 2020 and 2019,
respectively. The lower current year rate reflects favorable impacts from higher benefits on the revaluation of deferred
tax accounts due to enacted changes in foreign tax law, changes in the tax profile of U.S. entities in various state
jurisdictions, and higher excess tax benefits on share-based compensation. These items were partially offset by
benefits from changes in valuation allowances recorded at various entities in 2019.
Refer to Note 22, Income Taxes, to the consolidated financial statements for additional information.
27
Table of Contents
Segment Analysis
Industrial Gases – Americas
Year Ended 30 September 2020 2019$ Change Change
Sales $3,630.7 $3,873.5 ($242.8) (6)%
Operating income 1,012.4 997.7 14.7 1 %
Operating margin 27.9 % 25.8 % 210 bp
Equity affiliates’ income $84.3 $84.8 ($0.5) (1)%
Adjusted EBITDA 1,656.2 1,587.7 68.5 4 %
Adjusted EBITDA margin 45.6 % 41.0 % 460 bp
Sales % Change from Prior Year
Volume (1)%
Price 3 %
Energy and natural gas cost pass-through (6)%
Currency (2)%
Total Industrial Gases – Americas Sales Change (6)%
Sales of $3,630.7 decreased 6%, or $242.8, as lower energy and natural gas cost pass-through to customers of 6%, a
negative impact from currency of 2%, and lower volumes of 1% were partially offset by positive pricing of 3%. The
pricing improvement was driven by our merchant business. Lower volumes, particularly in our merchant business, were
primarily driven by COVID-19, which began impacting this segment at the end of March 2020 and continued through
the end of the fiscal year. The negative impact of COVID-19 was partially offset by positive contributions from the
commencement of a long-term hydrogen supply agreement with PBF Energy Inc. from assets we acquired in April. The
unfavorable currency impact was driven by the Chilean Peso.
Operating income of $1,012.4 increased 1%, or $14.7, due to higher pricing, net of power and fuel costs, of $95,
partially offset by higher net operating costs of $40, lower volumes of $33, and unfavorable currency impacts of $7.
Operating margin of 27.9% increased 210 bp, primarily due to positive pricing and lower energy and natural gas cost
pass-through to customers, partially offset by lower volumes and unfavorable net operating costs.
Equity affiliates’ income of $84.3 decreased 1%, or $0.5.
28
Table of Contents
Industrial Gases – EMEA
2020 2019$ Change Change
Sales $1,926.3 $2,002.5 ($76.2) (4)%
Operating income 473.3 472.4 0.9 — %
Operating margin 24.6 % 23.6 % 100 bp
Equity affiliates’ income $74.8 $69.0 $5.8 8 %
Adjusted EBITDA 744.0 730.9 13.1 2 %
Adjusted EBITDA margin 38.6 % 36.5 % 210 bp
Sales % Change from Prior Year
Volume — %
Price 3 %
Energy and natural gas cost pass-through (4)%
Currency (1)%
Other (2)%
Total Industrial Gases – EMEA Sales Change (4)%
Includes the impact from the modification of a hydrogen supply contract to a tolling arrangement in India in December 2018 (the
"India contract modification").
Sales of $1,926.3 decreased 4%, or $76.2, as lower energy and natural gas cost pass-through to customers of 4%, the
negative impact from the India contract modification of 2%, and unfavorable currency impacts of 1% were only partially
offset by positive pricing of 3%. The pricing improvement was attributable to our merchant business. Volumes were flat
versus the prior year as improvements from acquisitions and demand for hydrogen in our Rotterdam pipeline system
were offset by lower volumes from COVID-19, particularly in our merchant business. COVID-19 began impacting this
segment at the end of March 2020 and continued through the end of the fiscal year. The negative currency impact was
mainly driven by the Euro.
Operating income of $473.3 was flat as higher pricing, net of power and fuel costs, of $71 was offset by higher costs of
$41, unfavorable volume mix of $27, and unfavorable currency impacts of $3. Operating margin of 24.6% increased
100 bp, primarily due to favorable pricing, lower energy and natural gas cost pass-through to customers, and the India
contract modification, partially offset by higher costs and unfavorable volume mix.
Equity affiliates’ income of $74.8 increased 8%, or $5.8, primarily due to Jazan Gas Projects Company, which began to
contribute in the second half of fiscal year 2019, and higher income from an affiliate in Italy.(A)
(A)
29
Table of Contents
Industrial Gases – Asia
2020 2019$ Change Change
Sales $2,716.5 $2,663.6 $52.9 2 %
Operating income 870.3 864.2 6.1 1 %
Operating margin 32.0 % 32.4 % (40) bp
Equity affiliates’ income $61.0 $58.4 $2.6 4 %
Adjusted EBITDA 1,330.7 1,284.1 46.6 4 %
Adjusted EBITDA margin 49.0 % 48.2 % 80 bp
Sales % Change from Prior Year
Volume 1 %
Price 2 %
Energy and natural gas cost pass-through — %
Currency (1)%
Total Industrial Gases – Asia Sales Change 2 %
Sales of $2,716.5 increased 2%, or $52.9, as positive pricing of 2% and higher volumes of 1% were partially offset by
unfavorable currency impacts of 1%. Volume improvements from new plants were partially offset by negative impacts
from planned maintenance outages, completion of a short-term supply contract, and COVID-19, which began impacting
this segment in the second quarter and continued through the end of the fiscal year. The negative impact from COVID-
19 was primarily on our merchant volumes. Pricing improved across Asia, driven by our merchant business. The
unfavorable currency impact was primarily attributable to the Chinese Renminbi and the South Korean Won. Energy
and natural gas cost pass-through to customers was flat versus the prior year.
Operating income of $870.3 increased 1%, or $6.1, due to positive pricing, net of power and fuel costs, of $46 and
favorable net operating costs of $4, partially offset by unfavorable volume mix of $33 and currency impacts of
$11. Operating margin of 32.0% decreased 40 bp, as unfavorable volume mix more than offset positive pricing.
Equity affiliates’ income of $61.0 increased 4%, or $2.6.
Industrial Gases – Global
The Industrial Gases – Global segment includes sales of cryogenic and gas processing equipment for air separation
and centralized global costs associated with management of all the Industrial Gases segments.
2020 2019$ Change Change
Sales $364.9 $261.0 $103.9 40 %
Operating loss (40.0) (11.7) (28.3) (242)%
Adjusted EBITDA (19.5) 0.1 (19.6) N/M*
* Not meaningful
Sales of $364.9 increased 40%, or $103.9, primarily due to higher sale of equipment activity. Operating loss of $40.0
increased 242%, or $28.3, as higher project and product development costs were only partially offset by higher sale of
equipment and other project activity.
30
Table of Contents
Corporate and other
The Corporate and other segment includes our LNG, turbo machinery equipment and services, and distribution sale of
equipment businesses as well as our corporate support functions that benefit all segments. The results of the
Corporate and other segment also include income and expense that is not directly associated with the other segments,
such as foreign exchange gains and losses.
2020 2019$ Change Change
Sales $217.9 $118.3 $99.6 84 %
Operating loss (112.2) (152.8) 40.6 27 %
Adjusted EBITDA (91.6) (134.8) 43.2 32 %
Sales of $217.9 increased 84%, or $99.6, primarily due to higher LNG sale of equipment activity. Operating loss of
$112.2 decreased 27%, or $40.6, primarily due to the higher LNG sale of equipment activity, partially offset by higher
business development costs to support our growth strategy.
RECONCILIA TIONS OF NON-GAAP  FINANCIAL  MEASURES
(Millions of dollars unless otherwise indicated, except for per share data)
We present certain financial measures, other than in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles
("GAAP"), on an "adjusted" or "non-GAAP" basis. On a consolidated basis, these measures include adjusted diluted
earnings per share ("EPS"), adjusted EBITDA, adjusted EBITDA margin, and adjusted effective tax rate. On a segment
basis, these measures include adjusted EBITDA and adjusted EBITDA margin. In addition to these measures, we also
include certain supplemental non-GAAP financial measures that are presented below to help the reader understand the
impact that our non-GAAP adjustments have on the calculation of our adjusted diluted EPS. For each non-GAAP
financial measure, we present below a reconciliation to the most directly comparable financial measure calculated in
accordance with GAAP.
Our non-GAAP financial measures are not meant to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the most directly
comparable measure calculated in accordance with GAAP. We believe these non-GAAP financial measures provide
investors, potential investors, securities analysts, and others with useful information to evaluate the performance of our
business because such measures, when viewed together with financial results computed in accordance with GAAP,
provide a more complete understanding of the factors and trends affecting our historical financial performance and
projected future results.
In many cases, non-GAAP financial measures are determined by adjusting the most directly comparable GAAP
measure to exclude certain disclosed items, or “non-GAAP adjustments,” that we believe are not representative of
underlying business performance. For example, we previously excluded certain expenses associated with cost
reduction actions, impairment charges, and gains on disclosed transactions. The reader should be aware that we may
recognize similar losses or gains in the future. Readers should also consider the limitations associated with these non-
GAAP financial measures, including the potential lack of comparability of these measures from one company to
another.
The tax impact on our pre-tax non-GAAP adjustments reflects the expected current and deferred income tax impact of
our non-GAAP adjustments. These tax impacts are primarily driven by the statutory tax rate of the various relevant
jurisdictions and the taxability of the adjustments in those jurisdictions.
31
Table of Contents
ADJUSTED DILUTED EPS
The table below provides a reconciliation to the most directly comparable GAAP measure for each of the major
components used to calculate adjusted diluted EPS from continuing operations, which we view as a key performance
metric. We believe it is important for the reader to understand the per share impact of our non-GAAP adjustments as
management does not consider these impacts when evaluating underlying business performance. The per share
impact for each non-GAAP adjustment was calculated independently and may not sum to total adjusted diluted EPS
due to rounding.
Year Ended 30 SeptemberOperating
IncomeEquity
Affiliates'
IncomeIncome Tax
ProvisionNet Income
Attributable to Air
ProductsDiluted EPS
2020 GAAP $2,237.6 $264.8 $478.4 $1,901.0 $8.55 
2019 GAAP 2,144.4 215.4 480.1 1,760.0 7.94 
Change GAAP $141.0 $0.61 
% Change GAAP 8 % 8 %
2020 GAAP $2,237.6 $264.8 $478.4 $1,901.0 $8.55 
Company headquarters relocation (income) expense (33.8) — (8.2) (25.6) (0.12)
India Finance Act 2020 — (33.8) (20.3) (13.5) (0.06)
2020 Non-GAAP Measure ("Adjusted") $2,203.8 $231.0 $449.9 $1,861.9 $8.38 
2019 GAAP $2,144.4 $215.4 $480.1 $1,760.0 $7.94 
Facility closure 29.0 — 6.9 22.1 0.10 
Cost reduction actions 25.5 — 6.7 18.8 0.08 
Gain on exchange of equity affiliate investments (29.1) — — (29.1) (0.13)
Pension settlement loss — — 1.2 3.8 0.02 
Tax reform repatriation — — 12.4 (12.4) (0.06)
Tax reform adjustment related to deemed foreign dividends — — (56.2) 56.2 0.26 
2019 Non-GAAP Measure ("Adjusted") $2,169.8 $215.4 $451.1 $1,819.4 $8.21 
Change Non-GAAP Measure ("Adjusted") $42.5 $0.17 
% Change Non-GAAP Measure ("Adjusted") 2 % 2 %
Before-tax impact of $5.0 is reflected on the consolidated income statements within “Other non-operating income (expense), net.”
The table below provides a reconciliation of adjusted diluted EPS to GAAP diluted EPS for each fiscal year noted:
Year Ended 30 September 2020 2019 2018 2017 2016
Diluted EPS $8.55 $7.94 $6.59 $5.16 $5.04 
Change in inventory valuation method — — (0.08) — — 
Facility closure — 0.10 — — — 
Business separation costs — — — 0.12 0.21 
Tax (benefit) costs associated with business separation — — — (0.02) 0.24 
Cost reduction and asset actions — 0.08 — 0.49 0.11 
Goodwill and intangible asset impairment charge — — — 0.70 — 
Gain on exchange of equity affiliate investments — (0.13) — — — 
Company headquarters relocation (income) expense (0.12) — — — — 
Gain on land sale — — — (0.03) — 
India Finance Act 2020 (0.06) — — — — 
Equity method investment impairment charge — — — 0.36 — 
Pension settlement loss — 0.02 0.15 0.03 0.02 
Loss on extinguishment of debt — — — — 0.02 
Tax reform repatriation — (0.06) 2.16 — — 
Tax reform adjustment related to deemed foreign dividends — 0.26 (0.25) — — 
Tax reform rate change and other — — (0.96) — — 
Tax restructuring — — (0.16) — — 
Tax election benefit — — — (0.50) — 
Adjusted Diluted EPS $8.38 $8.21 $7.45 $6.31 $5.64 (A)
(A)
32
Table of Contents
ADJUSTED EBITDA AND ADJUSTED EBITDA MARGIN
We define adjusted EBITDA as net income less income (loss) from discontinued operations, net of tax, and excluding
non-GAAP adjustments, which we do not believe to be indicative of underlying business trends, before interest
expense, other non-operating income (expense), net, income tax provision, and depreciation and amortization
expense. Adjusted EBITDA and adjusted EBITDA margin provide useful metrics for management to assess operating
performance. Margins are calculated independently for each period by dividing each line item by consolidated sales for
the respective period and may not sum to total margin due to rounding.
Below is a presentation of consolidated sales and a reconciliation of net income on a GAAP basis to adjusted EBITDA
and net income margin on a GAAP basis to adjusted EBITDA margin:
Year Ended 30 September 2020 2019 2018 2017 2016
Sales $8,856.3 $8,918.9 $8,930.2 $8,187.6 $7,503.7
$ Margin $ Margin $ Margin $ Margin $ Margin
Net income and net income
margin $1,931.1 21.8 %$1,809.4 20.3 %$1,532.9 17.2 %$3,021.2 36.9 % $661.5 8.8 %
Less: (Loss) Income from
discontinued operations, net
of tax (14.3) (0.2)% — — % 42.2 0.5 % 1,866.0 22.8 % (460.5) (6.1)%
Add: Interest expense 109.3 1.2 % 137.0 1.5 % 130.5 1.5 % 120.6 1.5 % 115.2 1.5 %
Less: Other non-operating
income (expense), net 30.7 0.3 % 66.7 0.7 % 5.1 0.1 % 16.6 0.2 % (5.4) (0.1)%
Add: Income tax provision 478.4 5.4 % 480.1 5.4 % 524.3 5.9 % 260.9 3.2 % 432.6 5.8 %
Add: Depreciation and
amortization 1,185.0 13.4 % 1,082.8 12.1 % 970.7 10.9 % 865.8 10.6 % 854.6 11.4 %
Less: Change in inventory
valuation method — — % — — % 24.1 0.3 % — — % — — %
Add: Facility closure — — % 29.0 0.3 % — — % — — % — — %
Add: Business separation
costs — — % — — % — — % 32.5 0.4 % 50.6 0.7 %
Add: Cost reduction and asset
actions — — % 25.5 0.3 % — — % 151.4 1.8 % 34.5 0.4 %
Add: Goodwill and intangible
asset impairment charge — — % — — % — — % 162.1 2.0 % — — %
Less: Gain on exchange of
equity affiliate investments — — % 29.1 0.3 % — — % — — % — — %
Less: Company headquarters
relocation income (expense) 33.8 0.4 % — — % — — % — — % — — %
Less: Gain on land sale — — % — — % — — % 12.2 0.2 % — — %
Less: India Finance Act 2020 33.8 0.4 % — — % — — % — — % — — %
Add: Equity method
investment impairment charge — — % — — % — — % 79.5 1.0 % — — %
Add: Loss on extinguishment
of debt — — % — — % — — % — — % 6.9 0.1 %
Add: Tax reform repatriation -
equity method investment — — % — — % 28.5 0.3 % — — % — — %
Adjusted EBITDA and
adjusted EBITDA margin $3,619.8 40.9 %$3,468.0 38.9 %$3,115.5 34.9 %$2,799.2 34.2 %$2,621.8 34.9 %
Year Ended 30 September 2020 vs. 2019 2019 vs. 2018 2018 vs. 2017 2017 vs. 2016
Change GAAP
Net income $ change $121.7 $276.5 ($1,488.3) $2,359.7
Net income % change 7% 18% (49)% 357%
Net income margin change 150 bp 310 bp (1,970) bp 2,810 bp
Change Non-GAAP
Adjusted EBITDA $ change $151.8 $352.5 $316.3 $177.4
Adjusted EBITDA % change 4% 11% 11% 7%
Adjusted EBITDA margin
change 200 bp 400 bp 70 bp (70) bp
33
Table of Contents
Below is reconciliation of operating income and operating margin by segment to adjusted EBITDA and adjusted
EBITDA margin by segment:
Year Ended 30 SeptemberIndustrial
Gases–
AmericasIndustrial
Gases–
EMEAIndustrial
Gases–
AsiaIndustrial
Gases–
GlobalCorporate
and other Total
2020 GAAP Measures
Operating income (loss) $1,012.4 $473.3 $870.3 ($40.0) ($112.2) $2,203.8 
Operating margin 27.9 % 24.6 % 32.0 %
2019 GAAP Measures
Operating income (loss) $997.7 $472.4 $864.2 ($11.7) ($152.8) $2,169.8 
Operating margin 25.8 % 23.6 % 32.4 %
2020 vs. 2019
Operating income/loss change $14.7 $0.9 $6.1 ($28.3) $40.6 
Operating income/loss % change 1 % — % 1 % (242)% 27 %
Operating margin change 210  bp 100  bp (40) bp
2020 Non-GAAP Measures
Operating income (loss) $1,012.4 $473.3 $870.3 ($40.0) ($112.2) $2,203.8 
Add: Depreciation and amortization 559.5 195.9 399.4 9.6 20.6 1,185.0 
Add: Equity affiliates' income 84.3 74.8 61.0 10.9 — 231.0 
Adjusted EBITDA $1,656.2 $744.0 $1,330.7 ($19.5) ($91.6) $3,619.8 
Adjusted EBITDA margin 45.6 % 38.6 % 49.0 %
2019 Non-GAAP Measures
Operating income (loss) $997.7 $472.4 $864.2 ($11.7) ($152.8) $2,169.8 
Add: Depreciation and amortization 505.2 189.5 361.5 8.6 18.0 1,082.8 
Add: Equity affiliates' income 84.8 69.0 58.4 3.2 — 215.4 
Adjusted EBITDA $1,587.7 $730.9 $1,284.1 $0.1 ($134.8) $3,468.0 
Adjusted EBITDA margin 41.0 % 36.5 % 48.2 %
2020 vs. 2019
Adjusted EBITDA change $68.5 $13.1 $46.6 ($19.6) $43.2 
Adjusted EBITDA % change 4 % 2 % 4 % N/M* 32 %
Adjusted EBITDA margin change 460  bp 210  bp 80  bp
* Not meaningful
The table below reconciles consolidated operating income as reflected on our consolidated income statements to total operating income
disclosed in the table above for the years ended 30 September:
Operating Income 2020 2019
Consolidated operating income $2,237.6 $2,144.4 
Facility closure — 29.0 
Cost reduction actions — 25.5 
Gain on exchange of equity affiliate investments — (29.1)
Company headquarters relocation (income) expense (33.8) — 
Total $2,203.8 $2,169.8 
The table below reconciles consolidated equity affiliates' income as reflected on our consolidated income statements to total equity affiliates'
income disclosed in the table above for the years ended 30 September:
Equity Affiliates' Income 2020 2019
Consolidated equity affiliates' income $264.8 $215.4 
India Finance Act 2020 (33.8) — 
Total $231.0 $215.4 (A)
(A)
(A)
(B)
(A)
(B)
(A)
(B)
34
Table of Contents
ADJUSTED EFFECTIVE TAX RATE
The tax impact of our pre-tax non-GAAP adjustments reflects the expected current and deferred income tax expense
associated with each adjustment and is primarily dependent upon the statutory tax rate of the various relevant
jurisdictions and the taxability of the adjustments in those jurisdictions.
 Effective Tax Rate
Year Ended 30 September 2020 2019
Income Tax Provision $478.4 $480.1 
Income From Continuing Operations Before Taxes $2,423.8 $2,289.5 
Effective Tax Rate 19.7 % 21.0 %
Income Tax Provision $478.4 $480.1 
Facility closure — 6.9 
Cost reduction actions — 6.7 
Company headquarters relocation (8.2) — 
India Finance Act 2020 (20.3) — 
Pension settlement loss — 1.2 
Tax reform repatriation — 12.4 
Tax reform adjustment related to deemed foreign dividends — (56.2)
Adjusted Income Tax Provision $449.9 $451.1 
Income From Continuing Operations Before Taxes $2,423.8 $2,289.5 
Facility closure — 29.0 
Cost reduction actions — 25.5 
Gain on exchange of equity affiliate investments — (29.1)
Company headquarters relocation (income) expense (33.8) — 
India Finance Act 2020 - equity affiliate income impact (33.8) — 
Pension settlement loss — 5.0 
Adjusted Income From Continuing Operations Before Taxes $2,356.2 $2,319.9 
Adjusted Effective Tax Rate 19.1 % 19.4 %
LIQUIDITY  AND CAPIT AL RESOURCES
Our cash balance and cash flows from operations are our primary sources of liquidity and are generally sufficient to
meet our liquidity needs. In addition, we have the flexibility to access capital through a variety of financing activities,
including accessing the capital markets, drawing upon our credit facility, or alternatively, accessing the commercial
paper markets. During the third quarter of fiscal year 2020, we issued U.S. Dollar- and Euro-denominated fixed-rate
notes with aggregate principal amounts of $3.8 billion and €1.0 billion ($1.2 billion as of 30 September 2020),
respectively. We intend to use the majority of the proceeds to fund growth projects and repay debt maturities through
2021, including a €350.0 million Eurobond due in June 2021. At this time, we have not utilized, nor do we expect to
access, our credit facility for additional liquidity. In addition, we have considered the impacts of COVID-19 on our
liquidity and capital resources and do not expect it to impact our ability to meet future liquidity needs.
As of 30 September 2020, we had $1,376.6 of foreign cash and cash items compared to total cash and cash items of
$5,253.0. Since the enactment of the Tax Act, we do not expect that a significant portion of the earnings of our foreign
subsidiaries and affiliates will be subject to U.S. income tax upon repatriation to the U.S. Depending on the country in
which the subsidiaries and affiliates reside, the repatriation of these earnings may be subject to foreign withholding and
other taxes. However, since we have significant current investment plans outside the U.S., it is our intent to
permanently reinvest the majority of our foreign cash and cash items that would be subject to additional taxes outside
the U.S. 
35
Table of Contents
The table below summarizes our cash flows from operating, investing, and financing activities as reflected on the
consolidated statements of cash flows for the years ended 30 September:
Cash Provided by (Used for) 2020 2019
Operating activities $3,264.7 $2,969.9 
Investing activities (3,560.0) (2,113.4)
Financing activities 3,284.7 (1,370.5)
Operating Activities
For the fiscal year ended 30 September 2020, cash provided by operating activities was $3,264.7. Income from
continuing operations of $1,901.0 was adjusted for items including depreciation and amortization, deferred income
taxes, undistributed earnings of unconsolidated affiliates, gain on sale of assets and investments, share-based
compensation, noncurrent capital lease receivables, and certain other adjustments. We recorded a net benefit of $13.5
on our consolidated income statements related to a recently enacted tax law in India during the second quarter. This
net benefit, which is further discussed in Note 22, Income Taxes, to the consolidated financial statements, increased
"Undistributed earnings of unconsolidated affiliates" by $33.8 and increased "Deferred income taxes" by $20.3. The
"Gain on sale of assets and investments" of $45.8 includes a gain of $33.8 related to the sale of property at our current
corporate headquarters. Refer to Note 23, Supplemental Information, to the consolidated financial statements for
additional information. The working capital accounts were a use of cash of $40.1, primarily driven by other working
capital uses of $130.6, partially offset by a source of $84.4 from other receivables. The use of cash within "Other
working capital" was primarily due to timing of tax payments and a tax benefit as a result of the assets acquired in April
2020 from PBF Energy Inc. The source of cash within "Other receivables" was primarily driven by maturities of forward
exchange contracts.
For the fiscal year ended 30 September 2019, cash provided by operating activities was $2,969.9, including income
from continuing operations of $1,760.0. The gain on sale of assets and investments included a gain of $14.1
recognized on the disposition of our interest in High-Tech Gases (Beijing) Co., Ltd., a previously held equity investment
in our Industrial Gases - Asia segment. Refer to Note 3, Acquisitions, to the consolidated financial statements for
additional information. The working capital accounts were a use of cash of $25.3, primarily driven by $69.0 from trade
receivables and $41.8 from payables and accrued liabilities, partially offset by $79.8 from other receivables. The use of
cash within "Payables and accrued liabilities" was primarily driven by a $48.9 decrease in accrued utilities and a $30.3
decrease in accrued interest, partially offset by a $51.6 increase in customer advances primarily related to sale of
equipment activity. The decrease in accrued utilities was primarily driven by a contract modification to a tolling
arrangement in India and lower utility costs in the Industrial Gases – Americas segment. The source of cash from other
receivables of $79.8 was primarily due to the maturities of forward exchange contracts that hedged foreign currency
exposures and the collection of value added taxes.
Investing Activities
For the fiscal year ended 30 September 2020, cash used for investing activities was $3,560.0. Payments for additions
to plant and equipment, including long-term deposits, were $2,509.0. This includes the acquisition of five operating
hydrogen production plants from PBF Energy Inc. in Delaware and California for approximately $580 during the third
quarter. Additionally, acquisitions, less cash acquired, includes $183.3 for three businesses we acquired on 1 July
2020, the largest of which was a business in Israel that primarily offers merchant gas products. Refer to Note 3,
Acquisitions, to the consolidated financial statements for additional information. Purchases of investments of $2,865.5
relate to time deposits and treasury securities with terms greater than three months and less than one year and
exceeded proceeds from investments of $1,938.0. Proceeds from sale of assets and investments of $80.3 includes net
proceeds of $44.1 related to the sale of property at our current corporate headquarters in the second quarter.
For the fiscal year ended 30 September 2019, cash used for investing activities was $2,113.4. Payments for additions
to plant and equipment totaled $1,989.7. Cash paid for acquisitions, net of cash acquired, was $123.2. Refer to Note 3,
Acquisitions, to the consolidated financial statements for further details. Proceeds from investments of $190.5 resulting
from maturities of short-term instruments with original maturities greater than three months and less than one year
exceeded purchases of $172.1.
36
Table of Contents
Capital Expenditures
Capital expenditures is a non-GAAP measure that we define as cash flows for additions to plant and equipment,
acquisitions (less cash acquired), and investment in and advances to unconsolidated affiliates. A reconciliation of cash
used for investing activities to our reported capital expenditures is provided below:
2020 2019
Cash used for investing activities $3,560.0 $2,113.4 
Proceeds from sale of assets and investments 80.3 11.1 
Purchases of investments (2,865.5) (172.1)
Proceeds from investments 1,938.0 190.5 
Other investing activities 3.9 (14.3)
Capital Expenditures $2,716.7 $2,128.6 
The components of our capital expenditures are detailed in the table below:
2020 2019
Additions to plant and equipment $2,509.0 $1,989.7 
Acquisitions, less cash acquired 183.3 123.2 
Investments in and advances to unconsolidated affiliates 24.4 15.7 
Capital Expenditures $2,716.7 $2,128.6 
Capital expenditures in fiscal year 2020 totaled $2,716.7 compared to $2,128.6 in fiscal year 2019. The increase of
$588.1 was primarily due to the acquisition of the hydrogen production plants from PBF Energy Inc., as noted above.
Additions to plant and equipment also included support capital of a routine, ongoing nature, including expenditures for
distribution equipment and facility improvements.
2021 Outlook for Investing Activities
Due to the significant uncertainty that remains regarding the duration of COVID-19, the pace of recovery, and its
negative impact on the global economy, we are not providing capital expenditure guidance for fiscal year 2021. We are
monitoring our projects to determine whether capital spending and project onstream timing may be delayed for those
currently under construction.
We anticipate capital expenditures to be funded principally with our current cash balance and cash generated from
continuing operations. In addition, we intend to continue to evaluate (1) acquisitions of small- and medium-sized
industrial gas companies or assets from other industrial gas companies; (2) purchases of existing industrial gas
facilities from our customers to create long-term contracts under which we own and operate the plant and sell industrial
gases to the customer based on a fixed fee; and (3) investment in large industrial gas projects driven by demand for
more energy, cleaner energy, and emerging market growth.
Financing Activities
In fiscal year 2020, cash provided by financing activities was $3,284.7 as we successfully accessed the debt markets in
April 2020 to support opportunities for growth projects and repay upcoming debt maturities. Long-term debt proceeds of
$4,895.8, as further discussed below under "Financing and Capital Structure," were partially offset by dividend
payments to shareholders of $1,103.6 and payments on long-term debt of $406.6 primarily related to the repayment of
a 2.0% Eurobond of €300.0 million ($353.9) that matured on 7 August 2020. Other financing activities were a use of
cash of $80.1 and included financing charges associated with the third quarter debt issuance.
For the fiscal year ended 2019, cash used for financing activities was $1,370.5. This use of cash was largely
attributable to dividend payments to shareholders of $994.0 and payments on long-term debt of $428.6. Payments on
long-term debt primarily related to the repayment of a 4.375% U.S. Senior Note of $400.0 that matured on 21 August
2019.
37
Table of Contents
Financing and Capital Structure
Capital needs in fiscal year 2020 were satisfied primarily with cash from operations. Total debt increased from $3,326.0
at 30 September 2019 to $7,907.8 at 30 September 2020 due to the issuance of U.S. Dollar- and Euro-denominated
fixed-rate notes in the third quarter, partially offset by the repayment of a 2.0% Eurobond. For additional information,
refer to Note 15, Debt, to the consolidated financial statements. Similarly, cash and cash items and short-term
investments increased from $2,248.7 and $166.0, respectively, at the end of 2019 to $5,253.0 and $1,104.9,
respectively, at the end of 2020, primarily due to the issuance of the notes. The current year total debt balance includes
$338.5 of related party debt associated with the Lu'An joint venture.
We have a $2,300.0 five-year revolving credit agreement with a syndicate of banks (the "Credit Agreement”) maturing
31 March 2022. Under the Credit Agreement, senior unsecured debt is available to us and certain of our subsidiaries.
The Credit Agreement provides us a source of liquidity and supports our commercial paper program. Our only financial
covenant under the Credit Agreement is a maximum ratio of total debt to total capitalization, or total debt plus total
equity, no greater than 70%. Total debt as of 30 September 2020 and 30 September 2019, expressed as a percentage
of total capitalization was 38.9% and 22.6%, respectively. No borrowings were outstanding under the Credit Agreement
as of 30 September 2020.
There were no commitments maintained by our foreign subsidiaries at 30 September 2020.
As of 30 September 2020, we are in compliance with all of the financial and other covenants under our debt
agreements.
On 15 September 2011, the Board of Directors authorized the repurchase of up to $1,000 of our outstanding common
stock. We did not purchase any of our outstanding shares during fiscal years 2020 or 2019. As of 30 September 2020,
$485.3 in share repurchase authorization remains.
Dividends
Dividends are declared by the Board of Directors and are usually paid during the sixth week after the close of the fiscal
quarter. In 2020, the Board of Directors increased our quarterly dividend by over 15% from $1.16 to $1.34 per share,
representing the largest dividend increase in our 80-year history. This is the 38 consecutive year that we have
increased our quarterly dividend payment.
On 19 November 2020, the Board of Directors declared the first quarter 2021 dividend of $1.34 per share. The dividend
is payable on 8 February 2021 to shareholders of record as of 4 January 2021.
CONTRACTUAL  OBLIGA TIONS
We are obligated to make future payments under various contracts, such as debt agreements, lease agreements,
unconditional purchase obligations, and other long-term obligations. The following table summarizes our obligations on
a continuing operations basis as of 30 September 2020:
Total 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025Thereafter
Debt maturities $7,950 $470 $442 $456 $456 $416 $5,710 
Contractual interest on debt 1,772 155 141 129 121 102 1,124 
Operating leases 475 79 56 47 37 30 226 
Pension obligations 598 51 45 42 42 28 390 
Unconditional purchase obligations 9,556 1,460 460 450 455 454 6,277 
Deemed repatriation tax related to
the Tax Act211 21 21 21 39 50 59 
Obligation for future contribution to
an equity affiliate100 100 — — — — — 
Total Contractual Obligations $20,662 $2,336 $1,165 $1,145 $1,150 $1,080 $13,786 th
38
Table of Contents
Debt Obligations
Our debt obligations include the maturity payments of the principal amount of long-term debt, including the current
portion and amounts owed to related parties, and the related contractual interest obligations. Refer to Note 15, Debt, to
the consolidated financial statements for additional information on our debt obligations.
Contractual interest is the interest we are contracted to pay on our debt obligations without taking into account the
interest impact of interest rate swaps related to any of this debt, which at current interest rates would slightly decrease
contractual interest. We had approximately $632 of long-term debt subject to variable interest rates at 30 September
2020, excluding fixed-rate debt that has been swapped to variable-rate debt. The rate assumed for the variable interest
component of the contractual interest obligation was the rate in effect at 30 September 2020. Variable interest rates are
primarily determined by U.S. short-term tax-exempt interest rates and by interbank offer rates.
Leases
We are the lessee under various agreements for real estate, vehicles, aircraft, and other equipment. Refer to Note 12,
Leases, to the consolidated financial statements for additional information.
Pension Obligations
The amounts in the table above represent the current estimated cash payments to be made by us that, in total, equal
the recognized pension liabilities for our U.S. and international pension plans. For additional information, refer to Note
16, Retirement Benefits, to the consolidated financial statements. These payments are based upon the current
valuation assumptions and regulatory environment.
The total accrued liability for pension benefits may be impacted by interest rates, plan demographics, actual return on
plan assets, continuation or modification of benefits, and other factors. Such factors can significantly impact the amount
of the liability and related contributions.
Unconditional Purchase Obligations
We are obligated to make future payments under unconditional purchase obligations, which primarily relate to helium
and rare gases as well as commitments for purchases of plant and equipment. For additional information, refer to Note
17, Commitments and Contingencies, to the consolidated financial statements.
Income Tax Liabilities
Tax liabilities related to unrecognized tax benefits as of 30 September 2020 were $237.0. These tax liabilities are not
included in the table above as it is impractical to determine a cash impact by year given that payments will vary
according to changes in tax laws, tax rates, and our operating results. In addition, there are uncertainties in timing of
the effective settlement of our uncertain tax positions with respective taxing authorities. However, the table above
includes our accrued liability of approximately $211 for deemed repatriation tax that is payable through 2026 related to
the Tax Act. Refer to Note 22, Income Taxes, to the consolidated financial statements for additional information.
Obligation for Future Contribution to an Equity Affiliate
On 19 April 2015, a joint venture between Air Products and ACWA Holding entered into a 20-year oxygen and nitrogen
supply agreement to supply Saudi Aramco’s oil refinery and power plant being built in Jazan, Saudi Arabia. We
guaranteed the repayment of our 25% share of an equity bridge loan that has been provided to fund equity
commitments to the joint venture. In total, we expect to invest approximately $100 in this joint venture. As of 30
September 2020, our consolidated balance sheets included $94.4 reflected within "Payables and accrued liabilities" for
our obligation to make future equity contributions in 2021 based on our proportionate share of the advances received
by the joint venture under the loan.
Future Investment in Jazan Gas and Power Project
On 12 August 2018, Air Products entered an agreement to form a gasification/power joint venture ("JV") with Saudi
Aramco and ACWA in Jazan, Saudi Arabia. Air Products expects to own 51% of the JV, with Saudi Aramco and ACWA
Power owning the balance. In July 2020, we commenced the process to secure project financing with our partners for
the JV, which will purchase the gasification assets, power block, and the associated utilities from Saudi Aramco for
approximately $12 billion. Our future investment is not considered a contractual obligation until definitive agreements
have been signed; therefore, it is not included in the contractual obligations table above.
39
Table of Contents
PENSION BENEFITS
We and certain of our subsidiaries sponsor defined benefit pension plans and defined contribution plans that cover a
substantial portion of its worldwide employees. The principal defined benefit pension plans are the U.S. salaried
pension plan and the U.K. pension plan. These plans were closed to new participants in 2005, after which defined
contribution plans were offered to new employees. The shift to defined contribution plans is expected to continue to
reduce volatility of both plan expense and contributions.
The fair market value of plan assets for our defined benefit pension plans as of the 30 September 2020 measurement
date increased to $4,775.1 from $4,504.8 at the end of fiscal year 2019. The projected benefit obligation for these plans
was $5,373.5 and $5,145.6 at the end of fiscal years 2020 and 2019, respectively. The net unfunded liability decreased
$42.4 from $640.8 to $598.4, primarily due to favorable asset experience. Refer to Note 16, Retirement Benefits, to the
consolidated financial statements for additional disclosures on our postretirement benefits.
Pension Expense
2020 2019
Pension expense, including special items noted below $7.0 $27.6 
Settlements, termination benefits, and curtailments ("special items") 5.2 7.2 
Weighted average discount rate – Service cost 2.4 % 3.4 %
Weighted average discount rate – Interest cost 2.3 % 3.4 %
Weighted average expected rate of return on plan assets 6.3 % 6.4 %
Weighted average expected rate of compensation increase 3.4 % 3.5 %
Pension expense decreased from the prior year due to lower interest cost and higher total assets, partially offset by
higher actuarial loss amortization due to the impact of lower discount rates. Special items (settlements, termination
benefits, and curtailments) decreased from the prior year primarily due to lower pension settlement losses. In fiscal
year 2020, special items of $5.2 included pension settlement losses of $5.0 related to lump sum payouts from the U.S.
Supplementary Pension Plan. These amounts are reflected within "Other non-operating income (expense), net" on the
consolidated income statements. In fiscal year 2019, special items of $7.2 included pension settlement losses of $6.4
related to lump sum payouts from the U.S. Supplementary Pension Plan and $0.8 of termination benefits.
U.K. Lloyds Equalization Ruling
On 26 October 2018, the United Kingdom High Court issued a ruling related to the equalization of pension plan
participants’ benefits for the gender effects of Guaranteed Minimum Pensions. As a result of this ruling, we estimated
the impact of retroactively increasing benefits in our U.K. plan in accordance with the High Court ruling. We treated the
additional benefits as a prior service cost, which resulted in an increase to our projected benefit obligation and
accumulated other comprehensive loss of $4.7 during the first quarter of fiscal year 2019. We are amortizing this cost
over the average remaining life expectancy of the U.K. participants.
2021 Outlook
In fiscal year 2021, we expect pension income of approximately $25 to $35, which includes expected pension
settlement losses of $0 to $5, depending on the timing of retirements. The expected income range reflects lower
expected interest cost and higher total assets. In fiscal year 2021, we expect our net pension income to include
approximately $100 for amortization of actuarial losses.
In fiscal year 2020, pension expense included amortization of actuarial losses of $103.2. Net actuarial losses of $83.5
were recognized in accumulated other comprehensive income in fiscal year 2020. Actuarial (gains) losses are
amortized into pension expense over prospective periods to the extent they are not offset by future gains or losses.
Future changes in the discount rate and actual returns on plan assets different from expected returns would impact the
actuarial (gains) losses and resulting amortization in years beyond fiscal year 2021.
Pension Funding
Pension funding includes both contributions to funded plans and benefit payments for unfunded plans, which are
primarily non-qualified plans. With respect to funded plans, our funding policy is that contributions, combined with
appreciation and earnings, will be sufficient to pay benefits without creating unnecessary surpluses.
40
Table of Contents
In addition, we make contributions to satisfy all legal funding requirements while managing our capacity to benefit from
tax deductions attributable to plan contributions. With the assistance of third-party actuaries, we analyze the liabilities
and demographics of each plan, which help guide the level of contributions. During 2020 and 2019, our cash
contributions to funded plans and benefit payments for unfunded plans were $37.5 and $40.2, respectively.
For fiscal year 2021, cash contributions to defined benefit plans are estimated to be $45 to $55. The estimate is based
on expected contributions to certain international plans and anticipated benefit payments for unfunded plans, which are
dependent upon the timing of retirements. Actual future contributions will depend on future funding legislation, discount
rates, investment performance, plan design, and various other factors. We do not expect COVID-19 to impact our
contribution forecast for fiscal year 2021. Refer to the Contractual Obligations discussion on page 38 for a projection of
future contributions.
ENVIRONMENT AL MATTERS
As discussed above in Item 1, “Business–Environmental Regulation”, we are subject to various environmental laws and
regulations in the countries in which we have operations, which results in higher capital expenditures and costs. The
amounts charged to income from continuing operations related to environmental matters totaled $18.3 and $14.2 in
fiscal years 2020 and 2019, respectively. These amounts represent an estimate of expenses for compliance with
environmental laws and activities undertaken to meet our internal standards. We estimate that we spent approximately
$4 and $5, in fiscal years 2020 and 2019, respectively, on capital projects reflected in continuing operations to control
pollution. We expect that our capital expenditures to control pollution will be approximately $6 in both fiscal years 2021
and 2022.
Our accounting policy for environmental expenditures is discussed in Note 1, Major Accounting Policies, to the
consolidated financial statements, and environmental loss contingencies are discussed in Note 17, Commitments and
Contingencies, to the consolidated financial statements.
OFF-BALANCE SHEET ARRANGEMENTS
We have entered into certain guarantee agreements as discussed in Note 17, Commitments and Contingencies, to the
consolidated financial statements. In addition, we are not a primary beneficiary in any material variable interest entity.
Our off-balance sheet arrangements are not reasonably likely to have a material impact on financial condition, changes
in financial condition, results of operations, or liquidity.
RELA TED P ARTY  TRANSACTIONS
See Note 23, Supplemental Information, to the consolidated financial statements for information concerning activity with
our related parties.
INFLA TION
We operate in many countries that experience volatility in inflation and foreign exchange rates. The ability to pass on
inflationary cost increases is an uncertainty due to general economic conditions and competitive situations. It is
estimated that the cost of replacing our plant and equipment today is greater than its historical cost. Accordingly,
depreciation expense would be greater if the expense were stated on a current cost basis.
41
Table of Contents
CRITICAL  ACCOUNTING POLICIES AND ESTIMA TES
Note 1, Major Accounting Policies, to the consolidated financial statements describes our major accounting policies.
Judgments and estimates of uncertainties are required in applying our accounting policies in many areas. However,
application of the critical accounting policies discussed below requires management’s significant judgments, often as
the result of the need to make estimates of matters that are inherently uncertain. If actual results were to differ
materially from the estimates made, the reported results could be materially affected. Our management has reviewed
these critical accounting policies and estimates and related disclosures with our audit committee.
Depreciable Lives of Plant and Equipment
Net plant and equipment at 30 September 2020 totaled $11,964.7, and depreciation expense totaled $1,150.5 during
fiscal year 2020. Plant and equipment is recorded at cost and depreciated using the straight-line method, which
deducts equal amounts of the cost of each asset from earnings every year over its estimated economic useful life.
Economic useful life is the duration of time an asset is expected to be productively employed by us, which may be less
than its physical life. Assumptions on the following factors, among others, affect the determination of estimated
economic useful life: wear and tear, obsolescence, technical standards, contract life, market demand, competitive
position, raw material availability, and geographic location.
The estimated economic useful life of an asset is monitored to determine its appropriateness, especially when business
circumstances change. For example, changes in technology, changes in the estimated future demand for products,
excessive wear and tear, or unanticipated government actions may result in a shorter estimated useful life than
originally anticipated. In these cases, we would depreciate the remaining net book value over the new estimated
remaining life, thereby increasing depreciation expense per year on a prospective basis. Likewise, if the estimated
useful life is increased, the adjustment to the useful life decreases depreciation expense per year on a prospective
basis.
The regional Industrial Gases segments have numerous long-term customer supply contracts for which we construct an
on-site plant adjacent to or near the customer’s facility. These contracts typically have initial contract terms of 10 to 20
years. Depreciable lives of the production assets related to long-term supply contracts are matched to the contract
lives. Extensions to the contract term of supply frequently occur prior to the expiration of the initial term. As contract
terms are extended, the depreciable life of the associated production assets is adjusted to match the new contract
term, as long as it does not exceed the remaining physical life of the asset.
Our regional Industrial Gases segments also have contracts for liquid or gaseous bulk supply and, for smaller
customers, packaged gases. The depreciable lives of production facilities associated with these contracts are generally
15 years. These depreciable lives have been determined based on historical experience combined with judgment on
future assumptions such as technological advances, potential obsolescence, competitors’ actions, etc.
In addition, we may purchase assets through transactions accounted for as either an asset acquisition or a business
combination. Depreciable lives are assigned to acquired assets based on the age and condition of the assets, the
remaining duration of long-term supply contracts served by the assets, and our historical experience with similar
assets. Management monitors its assumptions and may potentially need to adjust depreciable life as circumstances
change.
42
Table of Contents
Impairment of Assets
While our results of operations have been negatively affected by COVID-19 as of and for the fiscal year ended 30
September 2020, there have been no triggering events that would require impairment testing for any of our asset
groups, reporting units that contain goodwill, indefinite-lived intangible assets, or equity method investments. As further
discussed below, we completed our annual impairment tests and concluded there were no indications of impairment.
We will continue to evaluate the nature and extent of COVID-19 impacts on our business and any impact they may
have on management's estimates, particularly those for our Latin America business. The duration and severity of the
COVID-19 outbreak and its long-term impact on our business is uncertain.
Impairment of Assets – Plant and Equipment
Plant and equipment meeting the held for sale criteria are reported at the lower of carrying amount or fair value less
cost to sell. Plant and equipment to be disposed of other than by sale may be reviewed for impairment upon the
occurrence of certain triggering events, such as unexpected contract terminations or unexpected foreign government-
imposed restrictions or expropriations. Plant and equipment held for use is grouped for impairment testing at the lowest
level for which there is identifiable cash flows. Impairment testing of the asset group occurs whenever events or
changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of the assets may not be recoverable. Such circumstances
would include a significant decrease in the market value of a long-lived asset grouping, a significant adverse change in
the manner in which the asset grouping is being used or in its physical condition, an accumulation of costs significantly
in excess of the amount originally expected for the acquisition or construction of the long-lived asset, a history of
operating or cash flow losses associated with the use of the asset grouping, or changes in the expected useful life of
the long-lived assets.
If such circumstances are determined to exist, an estimate of undiscounted future cash flows produced by that asset
group is compared to the carrying value to determine whether impairment exists. If an asset group is determined to be
impaired, the loss is measured based on the difference between the asset group’s fair value and its carrying value. An
estimate of the asset group’s fair value is based on the discounted value of its estimated cash flows.
The assumptions underlying the undiscounted future cash flow projections require significant management judgment.
Factors that management must estimate include industry and market conditions, sales volume and prices, costs to
produce, inflation, etc. The assumptions underlying the cash flow projections represent management’s best estimates
at the time of the impairment review and could include probability weighting of cash flow projections associated with
multiple potential future scenarios. Changes in key assumptions or actual conditions that differ from estimates could
result in an impairment charge. We use reasonable and supportable assumptions when performing impairment reviews
and cannot predict the occurrence of future events and circumstances that could result in impairment charges.
In fiscal year 2020, there was no need to test for impairment on any of our asset groupings as no events or changes in
circumstances indicated that the carrying amount of the asset groupings may not be recoverable.
Impairment of Assets – Goodwill
The acquisition method of accounting for business combinations requires us to make use of estimates and judgments
to allocate the purchase price paid for acquisitions to the fair value of the net tangible and identifiable intangible assets.
Goodwill represents the excess of the aggregate purchase price (plus the fair value of any noncontrolling interest and
previously held equity interest in the acquiree) over the fair value of identifiable net assets of an acquired entity.
Goodwill was $891.5 as of 30 September 2020. Disclosures related to goodwill are included in Note 10, Goodwill, to the
consolidated financial statements.
We review goodwill for impairment annually in the fourth quarter of the fiscal year and whenever events or changes in
circumstances indicate that the carrying value of goodwill might not be recoverable. The tests are done at the reporting
unit level, which is defined as being equal to or one level below the operating segment for which discrete financial
information is available and whose operating results are reviewed by segment managers regularly. We have five
reportable business segments, seven operating segments and ten reporting units, seven of which include a goodwill
balance. Refer to Note 25, Business Segment and Geographic Information, for additional information. Reporting units
are primarily based on products and subregions within each reportable segment. The majority of our goodwill is
assigned to reporting units within our regional Industrial Gases segments.
43
Table of Contents
As part of the goodwill impairment testing, we have the option to first assess qualitative factors to determine whether it
is more likely than not that the fair value of a reporting unit is less than its carrying value. However, we choose to
bypass the qualitative assessment and conduct quantitative testing to determine if the carrying value of the reporting
unit exceeds its fair value. An impairment loss will be recognized for the amount by which the carrying value of the
reporting unit exceeds its fair value, not to exceed the total amount of goodwill allocated to that reporting unit.
To determine the fair value of a reporting unit, we initially use an income approach valuation model, representing the
present value of estimated future cash flows. Our valuation model uses a discrete growth period and an estimated exit
trading multiple. The income approach is an appropriate valuation method due to our capital-intensive nature, the long-
term contractual nature of our business, and the relatively consistent cash flows generated by our reporting units. The
principal assumptions utilized in our income approach valuation model include revenue growth rates, operating profit
and/or adjusted EBITDA margins, discount rate, and exit multiple. Projected revenue growth rates and operating profit
and/or adjusted EBITDA assumptions are consistent with those utilized in our operating plan and/or revised forecasts
and long-term financial planning process. The discount rate assumption is calculated based on an estimated market-
participant risk-adjusted weighted-average cost of capital, which includes factors such as the risk-free rate of return,
cost of debt, and expected equity premiums. The exit multiple is determined from comparable industry transactions and
where appropriate, reflects expected long-term growth rates.
If our initial review under the income approach indicates there may be impairment, we incorporate results under the
market approach to further evaluate the existence of impairment. When the market approach is utilized, fair value is
estimated based on market multiples of revenue and earnings derived from comparable publicly-traded industrial gases
companies and/or regional manufacturing companies engaged in the same or similar lines of business as the reporting
unit, adjusted to reflect differences in size and growth prospects. When both the income and market approach are
utilized, we review relevant facts and circumstances and make a qualitative assessment to determine the proper
weighting. Management judgment is required in the determination of each assumption utilized in the valuation model,
and actual results could differ from the estimates.
During the fourth quarter of fiscal year 2020, we conducted our annual goodwill impairment test. We determined that
the fair value of all our reporting units substantially exceeded their carrying value except for our Latin America reporting
unit (LASA), which is further discussed below. Substantially all of the remaining goodwill balance related to reporting
units in which the fair value exceeded the carrying value by at least 100%.
The fair value of LASA exceeded its carrying value by 10%. Revenue growth and adjusted EBITDA margin
assumptions are two primary drivers of the fair value. We determined that, with other assumptions held constant, a
decrease in revenue growth rates of approximately 320 basis points or a decrease in adjusted EBITDA margin of
approximately 290 basis points would result in the fair value of the reporting unit being equal to its carrying value. As of
30 September 2020, the carrying value of LASA goodwill was $56.1, or less than 1% of consolidated total assets. The
carrying value of LASA's other material assets at 30 September 2020 included: Plant and equipment, net of $309.2;
customer relationships of $112.1; and trade names and trademarks of $38.2. The trade names and trademarks are
classified as indefinite-lived intangible assets.
Future events that could have a negative impact on the level of excess fair value over carrying value of the reporting
units include, but are not limited to: long-term economic weakness, decline in market share, pricing pressures, inability
to successfully implement cost improvement measures, increases to our cost of capital, changes in the strategy of the
reporting unit, and changes to the structure of our business as a result of future reorganizations or divestitures of
assets or businesses. Negative changes in one or more of these factors, among others, could result in impairment
charges.
44
Table of Contents
Impairment of Assets – Intangible Assets
Intangible assets, net with determinable lives at 30 September 2020 totaled $394.8 and consisted primarily of customer
relationships, purchased patents and technology, and land use rights. These intangible assets are tested for
impairment as part of the long-lived asset grouping impairment tests. Impairment testing of the asset group occurs
whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying value of the assets may not be recoverable.
See the impairment discussion above under "Impairment of Assets – Plant and Equipment" for a description of how
impairment losses are determined.
Indefinite-lived intangible assets at 30 September 2020 totaled $41.0 and consisted of trade names and trademarks.
Indefinite-lived intangibles are subject to impairment testing at least annually or more frequently if events or changes in
circumstances indicate that potential impairment exists. The impairment test for indefinite-lived intangible assets
involves calculating the fair value of the indefinite-lived intangible assets and comparing the fair value to their carrying
value. If the fair value is less than the carrying value, the difference is recorded as an impairment loss. To determine fair
value, we utilize the royalty savings method, a form of the income approach. This method values an intangible asset by
estimating the royalties avoided through ownership of the asset.
Disclosures related to intangible assets other than goodwill are included in Note 11, Intangible Assets, to the
consolidated financial statements.
In the fourth quarter of 2020, we conducted our annual impairment test of indefinite-lived intangibles which resulted in
no impairment.
Impairment of Assets – Equity Method Investments
Investments in and advances to equity affiliates totaled $1,432.2 at 30 September 2020. The majority of our
investments are non-publicly traded ventures with other companies in the industrial gas business. Summarized
financial information of equity affiliates is included in Note 8, Summarized Financial Information of Equity Affiliates, to
the consolidated financial statements. Equity investments are reviewed for impairment whenever events or changes in
circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of the investment may not be recoverable.
An impairment loss is recognized in the event that an other-than-temporary decline in fair value below the carrying
value of an investment occurs. Management’s estimate of fair value of an investment is based on the income approach
and/or market approach. We utilize estimated discounted future cash flows expected to be generated by the investee
under the income approach. For the market approach, we utilize market multiples of revenue and earnings derived from
comparable publicly-traded industrial gases companies. Changes in key assumptions about the financial condition of
an investee or actual conditions that differ from estimates could result in an impairment charge.
In fiscal year 2020, there was no need to test any of our equity affiliate investments for impairment, as no events or
changes in circumstances indicated that the carrying amount of the investments may not be recoverable.
Revenue Recognition – Cost Incurred Input Method
Revenue from equipment sale contracts is generally recognized over time as we have an enforceable right to payment
for performance completed to date and our performance under the contract terms does not create an asset with
alternative use. We use a cost incurred input method to recognize revenue by which costs incurred to date relative to
total estimated costs at completion are used to measure progress toward satisfying performance obligations. Costs
incurred include material, labor, and overhead costs and represent work contributing and proportionate to the transfer
of control to the customer.
Accounting for contracts using the cost incurred input method requires management judgment relative to assessing
risks and their impact on the estimate of revenues and costs. Our estimates are impacted by factors such as the
potential for incentives or penalties on performance, schedule and technical issues, labor productivity, the complexity of
work performed, the cost and availability of materials, and performance of subcontractors. When adjustments in
estimated total contract revenues or estimated total costs are required, any changes in the estimated profit from prior
estimates are recognized in the current period for the inception-to-date effect of such change. When estimates of total
costs to be incurred on a contract exceed estimates of total revenues to be earned, a provision for the entire estimated
loss on the contract is recorded in the period in which the loss is determined.
45
Table of Contents
In addition to the typical risks associated with underlying performance of project procurement and construction
activities, our sale of equipment projects within our Industrial Gases – Global segment require monitoring of risks
associated with schedule, geography, and other aspects of the contract and their effects on our estimates of total
revenues and total costs to complete the contract.
Changes in estimates on projects accounted for under the cost incurred input method, including the Jazan project,
favorably impacted operating income by approximately $7 and $37 in fiscal years 2020 and 2019, respectively. Our
changes in estimates would not have significantly impacted amounts recorded in prior years.
We assess the performance of our sale of equipment projects as they progress. Our earnings could be positively or
negatively impacted by changes to our forecast of revenues and costs on these projects.
Revenue Recognition – On-site Customer Contracts
For customers who require large volumes of gases on a long-term basis, we produce and supply gases under long-
term contracts from large facilities that we build, own and operate on or near the customer’s facilities. Certain of these
on-site contracts contain complex terms and provisions such as tolling arrangements, minimum payment requirements,
variable components and pricing provisions that require significant judgment to determine the amount and timing of
revenue recognition.
Income Taxes
We account for income taxes under the asset and liability method. Under this method, deferred tax assets and liabilities
are recognized for the tax effects of temporary differences between the financial reporting and tax bases of assets and
liabilities measured using enacted tax rates in effect for the year in which the differences are expected to be recovered
or settled. As of 30 September 2020, accrued income taxes, including the amount recorded as noncurrent, was $296.7,
and net deferred tax liabilities were $847.5. Tax liabilities related to uncertain tax positions as of 30 September 2020
were $237.0, excluding interest and penalties. Income tax expense for the fiscal year ended 30 September 2020 was
$478.4. Disclosures related to income taxes are included in Note 22, Income Taxes, to the consolidated financial
statements.
Management judgment is required concerning the ultimate outcome of tax contingencies and the realization of deferred
tax assets.
Actual income taxes paid may vary from estimates, depending upon changes in income tax laws, actual results of
operations, and the final audit of tax returns by taxing authorities. Tax assessments may arise several years after tax
returns have been filed. We believe that our recorded tax liabilities adequately provide for these assessments.
Deferred tax assets are recorded for operating losses and tax credit carryforwards. However, when we do not expect
sufficient sources of future taxable income to realize the benefit of the operating losses or tax credit carryforwards,
these deferred tax assets are reduced by a valuation allowance. A valuation allowance is recognized if, based on the
weight of available evidence, it is considered more likely than not that some portion or all of the deferred tax asset will
not be realized. The factors used to assess the likelihood of realization include forecasted future taxable income and
available tax planning strategies that could be implemented to realize or renew net deferred tax assets in order to avoid
the potential loss of future tax benefits. The effect of a change in the valuation allowance is reported in the income tax
expense.
A 1% increase or decrease in our effective tax rate may result in a decrease or increase to net income, respectively, of
approximately $24.
46
Table of Contents
Pension and Other Postretirement Benefits
The amounts recognized in the consolidated financial statements for pension and other postretirement benefits are
determined on an actuarial basis utilizing numerous assumptions. The discussion that follows provides information on
the significant assumptions and expense associated with the defined benefit plans.
Actuarial models are used in calculating the expense and liability related to the various defined benefit plans. These
models have an underlying assumption that the employees render service over their service lives on a relatively
consistent basis; therefore, the expense of benefits earned should follow a similar pattern.
Several assumptions and statistical variables are used in the models to calculate the expense and liability related to the
plans. We determine assumptions about the discount rate, the expected rate of return on plan assets, and the rate of
compensation increase. Note 16, Retirement Benefits, to the consolidated financial statements includes disclosure of
these rates on a weighted-average basis for both the U.S. and international plans. The actuarial models also use
assumptions about demographic factors such as retirement age, mortality, and turnover rates. Mortality rates are based
on the most recent U.S. and international mortality tables. We believe the actuarial assumptions are reasonable.
However, actual results could vary materially from these actuarial assumptions due to economic events and differences
in rates of retirement, mortality, and turnover.
One of the assumptions used in the actuarial models is the discount rate used to measure benefit obligations. This rate
reflects the prevailing market rate for high-quality, fixed-income debt instruments with maturities corresponding to the
expected timing of benefit payments as of the annual measurement date for each of the various plans. We measure the
service cost and interest cost components of pension expense by applying spot rates along the yield curve to the
relevant projected cash flows. The rates along the yield curve are used to discount the future cash flows of benefit
obligations back to the measurement date. These rates change from year to year based on market conditions that
affect corporate bond yields. A higher discount rate decreases the present value of the benefit obligations and results in
lower pension expense. A 50 bp increase or decrease in the discount rate may result in a decrease or increase to
pension expense, respectively, of approximately $26 per year.
The expected rate of return on plan assets represents an estimate of the long-term average rate of return to be earned
by plan assets reflecting current asset allocations. In determining estimated asset class returns, we take into account
historical and future expected long-term returns and the value of active management, as well as the interest rate
environment. Asset allocation is determined based on long-term return, volatility and correlation characteristics of the
asset classes, the profiles of the plans’ liabilities, and acceptable levels of risk. Lower returns on the plan assets result
in higher pension expense. A 50 bp increase or decrease in the estimated rate of return on plan assets may result in a
decrease or increase to pension expense, respectively, of approximately $22 per year.
We use a market-related valuation method for recognizing certain investment gains or losses for our significant pension
plans. Investment gains or losses are the difference between the expected return and actual return on plan assets. The
expected return on plan assets is determined based on a market-related value of plan assets. For equities, this is a
calculated value that recognizes investment gains and losses in fair value related to equities over a five-year period
from the year in which they occur and reduces year-to-year volatility. The market-related value for non-equity
investments equals the actual fair value. Expense in future periods will be impacted as gains or losses are recognized
in the market-related value of assets.
The expected rate of compensation increase is another key assumption. We determine this rate based on review of the
underlying long-term salary increase trend characteristic of labor markets and historical experience, as well as
comparison to peer companies. A 50 bp increase or decrease in the expected rate of compensation may result in an
increase or decrease to pension expense, respectively, of approximately $12 per year.
Loss Contingencies
In the normal course of business, we encounter contingencies, or situations involving varying degrees of uncertainty as
to the outcome and effect on our company. We accrue a liability for loss contingencies when it is considered probable
that a liability has been incurred and the amount of loss can be reasonably estimated. When only a range of possible
loss can be established, the most probable amount in the range is accrued. If no amount within this range is a better
estimate than any other amount within the range, the minimum amount in the range is accrued.
47
Table of Contents
Contingencies include those associated with litigation and environmental matters, for which our accounting policy is
discussed in Note 1, Major Accounting Policies, to the consolidated financial statements, and details are provided in
Note 17, Commitments and Contingencies, to the consolidated financial statements. Significant judgment is required to
determine both the probability and whether the amount of loss associated with a contingency can be reasonably
estimated. These determinations are made based on the best available information at the time. As additional
information becomes available, we reassess probability and estimates of loss contingencies. Revisions to the estimates
associated with loss contingencies could have a significant impact on our results of operations in the period in which an
accrual for loss contingencies is recorded or adjusted. For example, due to the inherent uncertainties related to
environmental exposures, a significant increase to environmental liabilities could occur if a new site is designated, the
scope of remediation is increased, a different remediation alternative is identified, or our proportionate share of the
liability increases. Similarly, a future charge for regulatory fines or damage awards associated with litigation could have
a significant impact on our net income in the period in which it is recorded.
NEW ACCOUNTING GUIDANCE
See Note 2, New Accounting Guidance, and Note 12, Leases, to the consolidated financial statements for information
concerning the implementation and impact of new accounting guidance.
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk.
Our earnings, cash flows, and financial position are exposed to market risks arising from fluctuations in interest rates
and foreign currency exchange rates. It is our policy to minimize our cash flow exposure to adverse changes in
currency exchange rates and to manage the financial risks inherent in funding with debt capital.
We address these financial exposures through a controlled program of risk management that includes the use of
derivative financial instruments. We have established counterparty credit guidelines and generally enter into
transactions with financial institutions of investment grade or better, thereby minimizing the risk of credit loss. All
instruments are entered into for other than trading purposes. For details on the types and use of these derivative
instruments and related major accounting policies, refer to Note 1, Major Accounting Policies, and Note 13, Financial
Instruments, to the consolidated financial statements. Additionally, we mitigate adverse energy price impacts through
our cost pass-through contracts with customers and price increases.
Our derivative and other financial instruments consist of long-term debt, including the current portion and amounts
owed to related parties; interest rate swaps; cross currency interest rate swaps; and foreign exchange-forward
contracts. The net market value of these financial instruments combined is referred to below as the "net financial
instrument position" and is disclosed in Note 14, Fair Value Measurements, to the consolidated financial statements.
Our net financial instrument position increased from a liability of $3,239.1 at 30 September 2019 to a liability of
$8,220.7 at 30 September 2020 due to the issuance of the $3.8 billion U.S. Dollar-denominated notes and €1.0 billion
Eurobonds in the third quarter of fiscal year 2020. See Note 15, Debt, for additional information.
The analysis below presents the sensitivity of the market value of our financial instruments to selected changes in
market rates and prices. Market values are the present values of projected future cash flows based on the market rates
and prices chosen. The market values for interest rate risk and foreign currency risk are calculated by us using a third-
party software model that utilizes standard pricing models to determine the present value of the instruments based on
market conditions as of the valuation date, such as interest rates, spot and forward exchange rates, and implied
volatilities.
Interest Rate Risk
Our debt portfolio as of 30 September 2020, including the effect of currency and interest rate swap agreements, was
composed of 89% fixed-rate debt and 11% variable-rate debt. Our debt portfolio as of 30 September 2019, including
the effect of currency and interest rate swap agreements, was composed of 74% fixed-rate debt and 26% variable-rate
debt. The increase in fixed rate debt is the result of the U.S. Dollar- and Euro-denominated notes issued during the
third quarter of fiscal year 2020.
The sensitivity analysis related to the interest rate risk on the fixed portion of our debt portfolio assumes an
instantaneous 100 bp parallel move in interest rates from the level at 30 September 2020, with all other variables held
constant. A 100 bp increase in market interest rates would result in a decrease of $711 and $75 in the net liability
position of financial instruments at 30 September 2020 and 2019, respectively. A 100 bp decrease in market interest
rates would result in an increase of $846 and $80 in the net liability position of financial instruments at 30
48
Table of Contents
September 2020 and 2019, respectively. The longer maturities and increased principal associated with the U.S. Dollar-
and Euro-denominated notes issued during the third quarter of fiscal year 2020 created a higher sensitivity to market
interest rates.
Based on the variable-rate debt included in our debt portfolio, including the interest rate swap agreements, a 100 bp
increase in interest rates would result in an additional $8 of interest incurred per year at 30 September 2020 and 2019.
A 100 bp decline in interest rates would lower interest incurred by $8 per year at 30 September 2020 and 2019.
Foreign Currency Exchange Rate Risk
The sensitivity analysis related to foreign currency exchange rates assumes an instantaneous 10% change in the
foreign currency exchange rates from their levels at 30 September 2020 and 2019, with all other variables held
constant. A 10% strengthening or weakening of the functional currency of an entity versus all other currencies would
result in a decrease or increase, respectively, of $360 and $326 in the net liability position of financial instruments at 30
September 2020 and 2019, respectively.
The primary currency pairs for which we have exchange rate exposure are the Euro and U.S. Dollar and Chinese
Renminbi and U.S. Dollar. Foreign currency debt, cross currency interest rate swaps, and foreign exchange-forward
contracts are used in countries where we do business, thereby reducing our net asset exposure. Foreign exchange-
forward contracts and cross currency interest rate swaps are also used to hedge our firm and highly anticipated foreign
currency cash flows. Thus, there is either an asset or liability or cash flow exposure related to all of the financial
instruments in the above sensitivity analysis for which the impact of a movement in exchange rates would be in the
opposite direction and materially equal to the impact on the instruments in the analysis.
The majority of our sales are denominated in foreign currencies as they are derived outside the United States.
Therefore, financial results will be affected by changes in foreign currency rates. The Chinese Renminbi and the Euro
represent the largest exposures in terms of our foreign earnings. We estimate that a 10% reduction in either the
Chinese Renminbi or the Euro versus the U.S. Dollar would lower our annual operating income by approximately $40
and $25, respectively.
COVID-19 Risks and Uncertainties
Refer to Item 1A. Risk Factors within this Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional discussion of current and potential
risks of COVID-19 on our business and financial performance.
49
Table of Contents
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
INDEX T O CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS
Management's Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting 51
Report of Deloitte & Touche LLP, Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 52
Report of KPMG LLP, Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 55
Consolidated Income Statements – Years Ended 30 September 2020, 2019, and 2018 56
Consolidated Comprehensive Income Statements – Years Ended 30 September 2020, 2019, and 2018 57
Consolidated Balance Sheets – 30 September 2020 and 2019 58
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows – Years Ended 30 September 2020, 2019, and 2018 59
Consolidated Statements of Equity – Years Ended 30 September 2020, 2019, and 2018 60
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements 61
50
Table of Contents
MANAGEMENT’S REPORT ON INTERNAL  CONTROL  OVER FINANCIAL  REPORTING
Air Products’ management is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial
reporting. Our internal control over financial reporting, which is defined in the following sentences, is a process
designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of our financial reporting and the preparation of
financial statements for external purposes in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles and
includes those policies and procedures that:
(i)pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and
dispositions of the assets of the Company;
(ii)provide reasonable assurance that the transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and
expenditures of the Company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and
directors of the Company; and
(iii)provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use or
disposition of the Company’s assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting can only provide reasonable assurance and
may not prevent or detect misstatements. Further, because of changes in conditions, the effectiveness of our internal
control over financial reporting may vary over time. Our processes contain self-monitoring mechanisms, and actions are
taken to correct deficiencies as they are identified.
Management has evaluated the effectiveness of its internal control over financial reporting based on criteria established
in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the
Treadway Commission (COSO). Based on this evaluation, management concluded that, as of 30 September 2020, the
Company’s internal control over financial reporting was effective.
Deloitte & Touche LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, has issued its opinion on the Company’s
internal control over financial reporting as of 30 September 2020 as stated in its report which appears herein.
/s/ Seifi Ghasemi /s/ M. Scott Crocco
Seifi Ghasemi M. Scott Crocco
Chairman, President, and Executive Vice President and
Chief Executive Officer Chief Financial Officer
19 November 2020 19 November 2020
51
Table of Contents
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the shareholders and the Board of Directors of Air Products and Chemicals, Inc.
Opinions on the Financial Statements and Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. and subsidiaries
(the "Company") as of September 30, 2020 and 2019, the related consolidated income statements, comprehensive
income statements, statements of equity, and statements of cash flows, for each of the two years in the period ended
September 30, 2020, and the related notes (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). We also have audited
the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of September 30, 2020, based on criteria established in
Internal Control — Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the
Treadway Commission (COSO).
In our opinion, the financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of
the Company as of September 30, 2020 and 2019, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the
two years in the period ended September 30, 2020, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the
United States of America. Also, in our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material respects, effective internal
control over financial reporting as of September 30, 2020, based on criteria established in Internal Control — Integrated
Framework (2013) issued by COSO.
Basis for Opinions
The Company’s management is responsible for these financial statements, for maintaining effective internal control
over financial reporting, and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included
in the accompanying Management’s Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to
express an opinion on these financial statements and an opinion on the Company’s internal control over financial
reporting based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company Accounting
Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in
accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and
Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and
perform the audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material
misstatement, whether due to error or fraud, and whether effective internal control over financial reporting was
maintained in all material respects.
Our audits of the financial statements included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of
the financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures to respond to those risks. Such
procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial
statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by
management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial statements. Our audit of internal control
over financial reporting included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the
risk that a material weakness exists, and testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal
control based on the assessed risk. Our audits also included performing such other procedures as we considered
necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinions.
52
Table of Contents
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding
the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies
and procedures that (1) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the
transactions and dispositions of the assets of the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are
recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of
management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely
detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that could have a material effect on
the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements.
Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become
inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may
deteriorate.
Critical Audit Matter
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current-period audit of the financial
statements that was communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relates to
accounts or disclosures that are material to the financial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging,
subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on
the financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matter below, providing
a separate opinion on the critical audit matter or on the accounts or disclosures to which it relates.
Revenue – On-site Industrial Gas Customer Contracts – Refer to Notes 1 and 4 to the financial statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
On-site industrial gas customer contracts involve large capital investments to construct facilities and serve customers
who require large volumes of gases and have relatively constant demand. The Company builds, owns and operates
facilities on or near the customer’s facilities to produce and supply the customer with gases under a long-term
arrangement. Typically, these contracts have 15 to 20-year terms and contain fixed monthly charges and/or minimum
purchase requirements. Revenue associated with these contracts is generally recognized over time during the period in
which the Company delivers or makes available the agreed upon quantity of gases. In addition, certain on-site industrial
gas contracts contain complex terms and provisions such as tolling arrangements, minimum payment requirements,
pricing provisions, and variable components that are specific to a customer arrangement, including certain contracts
with related parties. These arrangements may require greater judgment in determining when contractual requirements
have been met, impacting the timing and amount of revenue to be recorded.
We identified revenue recognition for certain on-site industrial gas customer contracts with complex terms and
provisions as a critical audit matter because of the judgments necessary for management to evaluate these contract
terms, including amendments, when determining the amount of revenue to be recognized. This required a high degree
of auditor judgment when performing procedures to audit management’s identification and assessment of contract
terms when determining the amount and timing of revenue recognition and evaluating the results of those procedures.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to revenue recognition for certain on-site industrial gas customer contracts with complex
terms and provisions included the following procedures, among others:
•We tested the effectiveness of the Company’s controls related to the amount and timing of revenue recognition,
including controls over the evaluation of complex terms and provisions in certain on-site industrial gas
customer contracts.
•We evaluated the terms included within original customer contracts and related amendments to assess the
accounting for provisions such as minimum payment requirements, pricing provisions, settlement terms, and
variable components that require management to apply judgment in determining revenue recognition
associated with the contract.
53
Table of Contents
•We tested the probability of collection of variable components, including penalties, which impacts the amount
and timing of revenue which the Company expects to collect.
•We inquired of personnel who oversee operations, customer relations, and revenue recognition as to the
presence of contract amendments, and interpretation of contract terms.
•We considered the nature of transactions with related parties and any potential impact on revenue recognition.
•We evaluated customer transactions and agreed the amount of revenue recognized to underlying contracts,
customer invoices, and cash receipts.
•We considered customer payment history, subsequent events, write-offs of customer receivables, collectability,
modification of contract terms, and other factors that could impact the amount and timing of revenue
recognition.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Philadelphia, Pennsylvania
November 19, 2020
We have served as the Company's auditor since 2018.
54
Table of Contents
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the Shareholders and Board of Directors of Air Products and Chemicals, Inc.:
Opinion on the Consolidated Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated statements of income, comprehensive income, cash flows and equity
of Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. and Subsidiaries (the Company) for the year ended 30 September 2018, and the
related notes (collectively, the consolidated financial statements). In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements
present fairly, in all material respects, the results of operations of the Company and its cash flows for the year ended 30
September 2018, in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles.
Basis for Opinion
These consolidated financial statements are the responsibility of the Company’s management. Our responsibility is to
express an opinion on these consolidated financial statements based on our audit. We are a public accounting firm
registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be
independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules
and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and
perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial statements are free of
material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. Our audit included performing procedures to assess the risks of
material misstatement of the consolidated financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing
procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the
amounts and disclosures in the consolidated financial statements. Our audit also included evaluating the accounting
principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the
consolidated financial statements. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
/s/ KPMG LLP
We served as the Company’s auditor from 2002 to 2018.
Philadelphia, Pennsylvania
November 20, 2018
55
Table of Contents
Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDA TED INCOME ST ATEMENTS
Year Ended 30 September (Millions of dollars, except for share and per share data) 2020 2019 2018
Sales $8,856.3 $8,918.9 $8,930.2 
Cost of sales 5,858.1 5,975.5 6,189.5 
Facility closure — 29.0 — 
Selling and administrative 775.9 750.0 760.8 
Research and development 83.9 72.9 64.5 
Cost reduction actions — 25.5 — 
Gain on exchange of equity affiliate investments — 29.1 — 
Company headquarters relocation income (expense) 33.8 — — 
Other income (expense), net 65.4 49.3 50.2 
Operating Income 2,237.6 2,144.4 1,965.6 
Equity affiliates' income 264.8 215.4 174.8 
Interest expense 109.3 137.0 130.5 
Other non-operating income (expense), net 30.7 66.7 5.1 
Income From Continuing Operations Before Taxes 2,423.8 2,289.5 2,015.0 
Income tax provision 478.4 480.1 524.3 
Income From Continuing Operations 1,945.4 1,809.4 1,490.7 
(Loss) Income from discontinued operations, net of tax (14.3) — 42.2 
Net Income 1,931.1 1,809.4 1,532.9 
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests of continuing operations 44.4 49.4 35.1 
Net Income Attributable to Air Products $1,886.7 $1,760.0 $1,497.8 
Net Income Attributable to Air Products
Net income from continuing operations $1,901.0 $1,760.0 $1,455.6 
Net (loss) income from discontinued operations (14.3) — 42.2 
Net Income Attributable to Air Products $1,886.7 $1,760.0 $1,497.8 
Per Share Data*
Basic EPS from continuing operations $8.59 $7.99 $6.64 
Basic EPS from discontinued operations (0.06) — 0.19 
Basic EPS Attributable to Air Products $8.53 $7.99 $6.83 
Diluted EPS from continuing operations $8.55 $7.94 $6.59 
Diluted EPS from discontinued operations (0.06) — 0.19 
Diluted EPS Attributable to Air Products $8.49 $7.94 $6.78 
Weighted Average Common Shares (in millions)
Basic 221.2 220.3 219.3 
Diluted 222.3 221.6 220.8 
*Earnings per share ("EPS") is calculated independently for each component and may not sum to total EPS due to rounding.
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
56
Table of Contents
Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDA TED COMPREHENSIVE INCOME ST ATEMENTS
Year ended 30 September (Millions of dollars) 2020 2019 2018
Net Income $1,931.1 $1,809.4 $1,532.9 
Other Comprehensive Income (Loss), net of tax:
Translation adjustments, net of tax of ($29.4), $25.1, and $1.1 233.4 (356.2) (244.6)
Net gain (loss) on derivatives, net of tax of $23.7, ($1.5), and $9.7 43.5 (44.1) 45.9 
Pension and postretirement benefits, net of tax of ($15.6), ($97.9), and $55.2 (68.2) (326.2) 179.4 
Reclassification adjustments:
   Currency translation adjustment — (2.6) 3.1 
Derivatives, net of tax of ($17.7), $4.5, and ($9.2) (57.7) 12.3 (30.4)
Pension and postretirement benefits, net of tax of $27.1, $20.5, and $44.9 82.5 63.2 133.1 
Total Other Comprehensive Income (Loss) 233.5 (653.6) 86.5 
Comprehensive Income 2,164.6 1,155.8 1,619.4 
Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests 44.4 49.4 35.1 
Other Comprehensive Loss Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests (2.0) (19.9) (19.0)
Comprehensive Income Attributable to Air Products $2,122.2 $1,126.3 $1,603.3 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
57
Table of Contents
Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDA TED BALANCE SHEETS
30 September (Millions of dollars, except for share and per share data) 2020 2019
Assets
Current Assets
Cash and cash items $5,253.0 $2,248.7 
Short-term investments 1,104.9 166.0 
Trade receivables, net 1,274.8 1,260.2 
Inventories 404.8 388.3 
Prepaid expenses 164.5 77.4 
Other receivables and current assets 482.9 477.7 
Total Current Assets 8,684.9 4,618.3 
Investment in net assets of and advances to equity affiliates 1,432.2 1,276.2 
Plant and equipment, net 11,964.7 10,337.6 
Goodwill, net 891.5 797.1 
Intangible assets, net 435.8 419.5 
Noncurrent lease receivables 816.3 890.0 
Other noncurrent assets 943.1 604.1 
Total Noncurrent Assets 16,483.6 14,324.5 
Total Assets $25,168.5 $18,942.8 
Liabilities and Equity
Current Liabilities
Payables and accrued liabilities $1,833.2 $1,635.7 
Accrued income taxes 105.8 86.6 
Short-term borrowings 7.7 58.2 
Current portion of long-term debt 470.0 40.4 
Total Current Liabilities 2,416.7 1,820.9 
Long-term debt 7,132.9 2,907.3 
Long-term debt – related party 297.2 320.1 
Other noncurrent liabilities 1,916.0 1,712.4 
Deferred income taxes 962.6 793.8 
Total Noncurrent Liabilities 10,308.7 5,733.6 
Total Liabilities 12,725.4 7,554.5 
Commitments and Contingencies - See Note 17
Air Products Shareholders’ Equity
Common stock (par value $1 per share; issued 2020 and 2019 - 249,455,584 shares) 249.4 249.4 
Capital in excess of par value 1,094.8 1,070.9 
Retained earnings 14,875.7 14,138.4 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (2,140.1) (2,375.6)
Treasury stock, at cost (2020 - 28,438,125 shares; 2019 - 29,040,322 shares) (2,000.0) (2,029.5)
Total Air Products Shareholders' Equity 12,079.8 11,053.6 
Noncontrolling Interests 363.3 334.7 
Total Equity 12,443.1 11,388.3 
Total Liabilities and Equity $25,168.5 $18,942.8 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
58
Table of Contents
Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
Year ended 30 September (Millions of dollars) 2020 2019 2018
Operating Activities
Net income $1,931.1 $1,809.4 $1,532.9 
Less: Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests of continuing operations 44.4 49.4 35.1 
Net income attributable to Air Products 1,886.7 1,760.0 1,497.8 
Loss (Income) from discontinued operations 14.3 — (42.2)
Income from continuing operations attributable to Air Products 1,901.0 1,760.0 1,455.6 
Adjustments to reconcile income to cash provided by operating activities:
Depreciation and amortization 1,185.0 1,082.8 970.7 
Deferred income taxes 165.0 57.6 (55.4)
Tax reform repatriation — 49.4 240.6 
Facility closure — 29.0 — 
Undistributed (earnings) losses of unconsolidated affiliates (161.9) (75.8) (59.8)
Gain on sale of assets and investments (45.8) (24.2) (6.9)
Share-based compensation 53.5 41.2 38.8 
Noncurrent lease receivables 91.6 94.6 97.4 
Other adjustments 116.4 (19.4) 131.6 
Working capital changes that provided (used) cash, excluding effects of acquisitions:
Trade receivables 43.2 (69.0) (42.8)
Inventories (5.2) (3.0) (64.2)
Other receivables 84.4 79.8 128.3 
Payables and accrued liabilities (31.9) (41.8) (277.7)
Other working capital (130.6) 8.7 (9.0)
Cash Provided by Operating Activities 3,264.7 2,969.9 2,547.2 
Investing Activities
Additions to plant and equipment, including long-term deposits (2,509.0) (1,989.7) (1,568.4)
Acquisitions, less cash acquired (183.3) (123.2) (345.4)
Investment in and advances to unconsolidated affiliates (24.4) (15.7) — 
Proceeds from sale of assets and investments 80.3 11.1 48.8 
Purchases of investments (2,865.5) (172.1) (530.3)
Proceeds from investments 1,938.0 190.5 748.2 
Other investing activities 3.9 (14.3) 5.5 
Cash Used for Investing Activities (3,560.0) (2,113.4) (1,641.6)
Financing Activities
Long-term debt proceeds 4,895.8 — 0.5 
Payments on long-term debt (406.6) (428.6) (418.7)
Net increase (decrease) in commercial paper and short-term borrowings (54.9) 3.9 (78.5)
Dividends paid to shareholders (1,103.6) (994.0) (897.8)
Proceeds from stock option exercises 34.1 68.1 76.2 
Other financing activities (80.1) (19.9) (41.5)
Cash Provided by (Used for) Financing Activities 3,284.7 (1,370.5) (1,359.8)
Discontinued Operations
Cash used for operating activities — — (12.8)
Cash provided by investing activities — — 18.6 
Cash provided by financing activities — — — 
Cash Provided by Discontinued Operations — — 5.8 
Effect of Exchange Rate Changes on Cash 14.9 (28.6) (33.9)
Increase (Decrease) in cash and cash items 3,004.3 (542.6) (482.3)
Cash and Cash items – Beginning of Year 2,248.7 2,791.3 3,273.6 
Cash and Cash Items – End of Period $5,253.0 $2,248.7 $2,791.3 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
59
Table of Contents
Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF EQUITY
Year ended 30 September
(Millions of dollars,
except for per share data)Common
StockCapital
in Excess
of Par
ValueRetained
EarningsAccumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)Treasury
StockAir Products
Shareholders’
EquityNon-
controlling
InterestsTotal
Equity
Balance 30 September 2017 $249.4 $1,001.1 $12,846.6 ($1,847.4)($2,163.5) $10,086.2 $99.3 $10,185.5 
Net income — — 1,497.8 — — 1,497.8 35.1 1,532.9 
Other comprehensive income (loss) — — — 105.5 — 105.5 (19.0) 86.5 
Dividends on common stock (per
share $4.25) — — (931.8) — — (931.8) — (931.8)
Dividends to noncontrolling interests — — — — — — (29.9) (29.9)
Share-based compensation — 38.1 — — — 38.1 — 38.1 
Issuance of treasury shares for stock
option and award plans — (11.3) — — 74.3 63.0 — 63.0 
Lu'An joint venture — — — — — — 227.4 227.4 
Other equity transactions — 1.4 (2.7) — — (1.3) 5.9 4.6 
Balance 30 September 2018 $249.4 $1,029.3 $13,409.9 ($1,741.9)($2,089.2) $10,857.5 $318.8 $11,176.3 
Net income — — 1,760.0 — — 1,760.0 49.4 1,809.4 
Other comprehensive income (loss) — — — (633.7) — (633.7) (19.9) (653.6)
Dividends on common stock (per
share $4.58) — — (1,008.3) — — (1,008.3) — (1,008.3)
Dividends to noncontrolling interests — — — — — — (12.2) (12.2)
Share-based compensation — 40.7 — — — 40.7 — 40.7 
Issuance of treasury shares for stock
option and award plans — 2.2 — — 59.7 61.9 — 61.9 
Cumulative change in accounting
principle — — (17.1) — — (17.1) — (17.1)
Other equity transactions — (1.3) (6.1) — — (7.4) (1.4) (8.8)
Balance 30 September 2019 $249.4 $1,070.9 $14,138.4 ($2,375.6)($2,029.5) $11,053.6 $334.7 $11,388.3 
Net income — — 1,886.7 — — 1,886.7 44.4 1,931.1 
Other comprehensive income (loss) — — — 235.5 — 235.5 (2.0) 233.5 
Dividends on common stock (per
share $5.18) — — (1,144.1) — — (1,144.1) — (1,144.1)
Dividends to noncontrolling interests — — — — — — (31.8) (31.8)
Share-based compensation — 44.2 — — — 44.2 — 44.2 
Issuance of treasury shares for stock
option and award plans — (14.1) — — 29.5 15.4 — 15.4 
Investments by noncontrolling
interests — — — — — — 17.1 17.1 
Other equity transactions — (6.2) (5.3) — — (11.5) 0.9 (10.6)
Balance 30 September 2020 $249.4 $1,094.8 $14,875.7 ($2,140.1)($2,000.0) $12,079.8 $363.3 $12,443.1 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
60
Table of Contents
AIR PRODUCTS AND CHEMICALS, INC. and Subsidiaries
NOTES T O CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS
(Millions of dollars unless otherwise indicated, except for share and per share data)
1.Major Accounting Policies 62
2.New Accounting Guidance 70
3.Acquisitions 71
4.Revenue Recognition 73
5.Cost Reduction Actions 76
6.Discontinued Operations 76
7.Inventories 76
8.Summarized Financial Information of Equity Affiliates 77
9.Plant and Equipment, net 78
10.Goodwill 78
11.Intangible Assets 79
12.Leases 80
13.Financial Instruments 82
14.Fair Value Measurements 87
15.Debt 89
16.Retirement Benefits 91
17.Commitments and Contingencies 97
18.Capital Stock 101
19.Share-Based Compensation 102
20.Accumulated Other Comprehensive Loss 105
21.Earnings Per Share 106
22.Income Taxes 106
23.Supplemental Information 112
24.Summary by Quarter (Unaudited) 114
25.Business Segment and Geographic Information 116
61
Table of Contents
1. MAJOR ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Basis of Presentation and Consolidation Principles
The accompanying consolidated financial statements of Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. were prepared in accordance
with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America (“GAAP”) and include the accounts of Air
Products and Chemicals, Inc. and those of its controlled subsidiaries (“we,” “our,” “us,” the “Company,” “Air Products,”
or “registrant”), which are generally majority owned. Intercompany transactions and balances are eliminated in
consolidation.
We consolidate all entities that we control. The general condition for control is ownership of a majority of the voting
interests of an entity. Control may also exist in arrangements where we are the primary beneficiary of a variable interest
entity ("VIE"). An entity that has both the power to direct the activities that most significantly impact the economic
performance of a VIE and the obligation to absorb losses or receive benefits significant to the VIE is considered the
primary beneficiary of that entity. We have determined that we are not a primary beneficiary of any material VIE.
The results of operations and cash flows for our discontinued operations have been segregated from the results of
continuing operations and segment results. The comprehensive income related to discontinued operations has not
been segregated and is included in the consolidated comprehensive income statements. There were no assets and
liabilities presented as discontinued operations on the consolidated balance sheets. Refer to Note 6, Discontinued
Operations, for additional information.
The notes to the consolidated financial statements, unless otherwise indicated, are on a continuing operations basis.
The term "total company" includes both continuing and discontinued operations.
Certain prior year information has been reclassified to conform to the fiscal year 2020 presentation.
Estimates and Assumptions
The preparation of the financial statements in conformity with GAAP requires management to make estimates and
assumptions that affect amounts reported in the financial statements and accompanying notes. Actual results could
differ from those estimates.
COVID-19 Risks and Uncertainties
In March 2020, the World Health Organization declared the novel strain of coronavirus, COVID-19, a global pandemic
and recommended containment and mitigation measures worldwide. COVID-19 had a negative impact on our operating
results in fiscal year 2020, primarily in the regional industrial gas segments. We continue to monitor its impact on our
operations; however, we are unable to predict the future impact that COVID-19 will have on our future financial position
and operating results due to numerous uncertainties, including the duration and severity of the outbreak.
Revenue Recognition
We recognize revenue when or as performance obligations are satisfied, which occurs when control is transferred to
the customer.
We determine the transaction price of our contracts based on the amount of consideration to which we expect to be
entitled to receive in exchange for the goods or services provided. Our contracts within the scope of revenue guidance
do not contain payment terms that include a significant financing component.
Sales returns and allowances are not a business practice in the industry.
Our sale of gas contracts are either accounted for over time during the period in which we deliver or make available the
agreed upon quantity of goods or at a point in time when the customer receives and obtains control of the product,
which generally occurs upon delivery. We generally recognize revenue from our sale of gas contracts based on the
right to invoice practical expedient.
62
Table of Contents
Our sale of equipment contracts are generally comprised of a single performance obligation as the individual promised
goods or services contained within the contracts are integrated with or dependent upon other goods or services in the
contract for a single output to the customer. Revenue from our sale of equipment contracts is generally recognized over
time as we have an enforceable right to payment for performance completed to date and our performance under the
contract terms does not create an asset with alternative use. We recognize these contracts using a cost incurred input
method by which costs incurred to date relative to total estimated costs at completion are used to measure progress
toward satisfying performance obligations.
Amounts billed for shipping and handling fees are classified as sales in the consolidated income statements. Shipping
and handling activities for our sale of equipment contracts may be performed after the customer obtains control of the
promised goods. In these cases, we have elected to apply the practical expedient to account for shipping and handling
as activities to fulfill the promise to transfer the goods. For our sale of gas contracts, control generally transfers to the
customer upon delivery.
Amounts billed for sales and use taxes, value-added taxes, and certain excise and other specific transactional taxes
imposed on revenue-producing transactions are presented on a net basis and excluded from sales in the consolidated
income statements.
For additional information, refer to Note 4, Revenue Recognition.
Cost of Sales
Cost of sales predominantly represents the cost of tangible products sold. These costs include labor, raw materials,
plant engineering, power, depreciation, production supplies and materials packaging costs, and maintenance costs.
Costs incurred for shipping and handling are also included in cost of sales.
Depreciation
Depreciation is recorded using the straight-line method, which deducts equal amounts of the cost of each asset from
earnings every year over its expected economic useful life. The principal lives for major classes of plant and equipment
are summarized in Note 9, Plant and Equipment, net.
Selling and Administrative
The principal components of selling and administrative expenses are compensation, advertising, and promotional
costs.
Postemployment Benefits
We provide termination benefits to employees as part of ongoing benefit arrangements and record a liability for
termination benefits when probable and estimable. These criteria are met when management, with the appropriate level
of authority, approves and commits to its plan of action for termination; the plan identifies the employees to be
terminated and their related benefits; and the plan is to be completed within one year. We do not provide material one-
time benefit arrangements.
Fair Value Measurements
We are required to measure certain assets and liabilities at fair value, either upon initial measurement or for
subsequent accounting or reporting. For example, fair value is used in the initial measurement of assets and liabilities
acquired in a business combination; on a recurring basis in the measurement of derivative financial instruments; and on
a nonrecurring basis when long-lived assets are written down to fair value when held for sale or determined to be
impaired. Refer to Note 14, Fair Value Measurements, and Note 16, Retirement Benefits, for information on the
methods and assumptions used in our fair value measurements.
63
Table of Contents
Financial Instruments
We address certain financial exposures through a controlled program of risk management that includes the use of
derivative financial instruments. The types of derivative financial instruments permitted for such risk management
programs are specified in policies set by management. Refer to Note 13, Financial Instruments, for further detail on the
types and use of derivative instruments into which we enter.
Major financial institutions are counterparties to all of these derivative contracts. We have established counterparty
credit guidelines and generally enter into transactions with financial institutions of investment grade or better.
Management believes the risk of incurring losses related to credit risk is remote, and any losses would be immaterial to
the consolidated financial results, financial condition, or liquidity.
We recognize derivatives on the balance sheet at fair value. On the date the derivative instrument is entered into, we
generally designate the derivative as either (1) a hedge of a forecasted transaction or of the variability of cash flows to
be received or paid related to a recognized asset or liability (cash flow hedge), (2) a hedge of a net investment in a
foreign operation (net investment hedge), or (3) a hedge of the fair value of a recognized asset or liability (fair value
hedge).
The following details the accounting treatment of our cash flow, fair value, net investment, and non-designated hedges:
•Changes in the fair value of a derivative that is designated as and meets the cash flow hedge criteria are
recorded in accumulated other comprehensive loss ("AOCL") to the extent effective and then recognized in
earnings when the hedged items affect earnings.
•Changes in the fair value of a derivative that is designated as and meets all the required criteria for a fair value
hedge, along with the gain or loss on the hedged asset or liability that is attributable to the hedged risk, are
recorded in current period earnings.
•Changes in the fair value of a derivative and foreign currency debt that are designated as and meet all the
required criteria for a hedge of a net investment are recorded as translation adjustments in AOCL.
•Changes in the fair value of a derivative that is not designated as a hedge are recorded immediately in
earnings.
We formally document the relationships between hedging instruments and hedged items, as well as our risk
management objective and strategy for undertaking various hedge transactions. This process includes relating
derivatives that are designated as fair value or cash flow hedges to specific assets and liabilities on the balance sheet
or to specific firm commitments or forecasted transactions. We also formally assess, at the inception of the hedge and
on an ongoing basis, whether derivatives are highly effective in offsetting changes in fair values or cash flows of the
hedged item. If it is determined that a derivative is not highly effective as a hedge, or if a derivative ceases to be a
highly effective hedge, we will discontinue hedge accounting with respect to that derivative prospectively.
Foreign Currency
Since we do business in many foreign countries, fluctuations in currency exchange rates affect our financial position
and results of operations.
In most of our foreign operations, the local currency is considered the functional currency. Foreign subsidiaries
translate their assets and liabilities into U.S. dollars at current exchange rates in effect as of the balance sheet date.
The gains or losses that result from this process are shown as translation adjustments in AOCL in the equity section of
the balance sheet.
The revenue and expense accounts of foreign subsidiaries are translated into U.S. dollars at the average exchange
rates that prevail during the period. Therefore, the U.S. dollar value of these items on the consolidated income
statements fluctuates from period to period, depending on the value of the U.S. dollar against foreign currencies. Some
transactions are made in currencies different from an entity’s functional currency. Gains and losses from these foreign
currency transactions are generally reflected in "Other income (expense), net" on our consolidated income statements
as they occur. Net foreign exchange losses reflected in "Other income (expense), net" were not material for the periods
presented. Refer to the Other Non-Operating Income (Expense), Net section below for discussion on other foreign
currency presentation.
64
Table of Contents
Environmental Expenditures
Accruals for environmental loss contingencies are recorded when it is probable that a liability has been incurred and the
amount of loss can be reasonably estimated. Remediation costs are capitalized if the costs improve our property as
compared with the condition of the property when originally constructed or acquired, or if the costs prevent
environmental contamination from future operations. We expense environmental costs related to existing conditions
resulting from past or current operations and from which no current or future benefit is discernible. The amounts
charged to income from continuing operations related to environmental matters totaled $18.3, $14.2, and $12.8 in fiscal
years 2020, 2019, and 2018, respectively. In addition, we recorded a pre-tax expense of $19.0 in results from
discontinued operations to increase our environmental accrual for the Pace facility in the second quarter of fiscal year
2020. Refer to the Pace discussion within Note 17, Commitments and Contingencies, for additional information.
The measurement of environmental liabilities is based on an evaluation of currently available information with respect
to each individual site and considers factors such as existing technology, presently enacted laws and regulations, and
prior experience in remediation of contaminated sites. An environmental liability related to cleanup of a contaminated
site might include, for example, a provision for one or more of the following types of costs: site investigation and testing
costs, remediation costs, post-remediation monitoring costs, natural resource damages, and outside legal fees. These
liabilities include costs related to other potentially responsible parties to the extent that we have reason to believe such
parties will not fully pay their proportionate share. They do not consider any claims for recoveries from insurance or
other parties and are not discounted.
As assessments and remediation progress at individual sites, the amount of projected cost is reviewed and the liability
is adjusted to reflect additional technical and legal information that becomes available. Management has an established
process in place to identify and monitor our environmental exposures. An environmental accrual analysis is prepared
and maintained that lists all environmental loss contingencies, even where an accrual has not been established. This
analysis assists in monitoring our overall environmental exposure and serves as a tool to facilitate ongoing
communication among our technical experts, environmental managers, environmental lawyers, and financial
management to ensure that required accruals are recorded and potential exposures disclosed.
Given inherent uncertainties in evaluating environmental exposures, actual costs to be incurred at identified sites in
future periods may vary from the estimates. Refer to Note 17, Commitments and Contingencies, for additional
information on our environmental loss contingencies.
The accruals for environmental liabilities are reflected in the consolidated balance sheets, primarily as part of other
noncurrent liabilities.
Litigation
In the normal course of business, we are involved in legal proceedings. We accrue a liability for such matters when it is
probable that a liability has been incurred and the amount of loss can be reasonably estimated. When only a range of
possible loss can be established, the most probable amount in the range is accrued. If no amount within this range is a
better estimate than any other amount within the range, the minimum amount in the range is accrued. The accrual for a
litigation loss contingency includes estimates of potential damages and other directly related costs expected to be
incurred. Refer to Note 17, Commitments and Contingencies, for additional information on our current legal
proceedings.
Share-Based Compensation
We have various share-based compensation programs, which include deferred stock units, stock options, and
restricted stock. We expense the grant-date fair value of these awards over the vesting period during which employees
perform related services. Expense recognition is accelerated for retirement-eligible individuals who would meet the
requirements for vesting of awards upon their retirement. Refer to Note 19, Share-Based Compensation, for additional
information regarding these awards and the models and assumptions used to determine the grant-date fair value of our
awards.
65
Table of Contents
Income Taxes
We account for income taxes under the asset and liability method. Under this method, deferred tax assets and liabilities
are recognized for the tax effects of temporary differences between the financial reporting and tax bases of assets and
liabilities using enacted tax rates in effect for the year in which the differences are expected to be recovered or settled.
A principal temporary difference results from the excess of tax depreciation over book depreciation because
accelerated methods of depreciation and shorter useful lives are used for income tax purposes. The cumulative impact
of a change in tax rates or regulations is included in income tax expense in the period that includes the enactment date.
We recognize deferred tax assets net of existing valuation allowances to the extent we believe that these assets are
more likely than not to be realized considering all available evidence.
A tax benefit for an uncertain tax position is recognized when it is more likely than not that the position will be sustained
upon examination based on its technical merits. This position is measured as the largest amount of tax benefit that is
greater than 50% likely of being realized. Interest and penalties related to unrecognized tax benefits are recognized as
a component of income tax expense. For additional information regarding our income taxes, refer to Note 22, Income
Taxes.
Other Non-Operating Income (Expense), net
Other non-operating income (expense), net includes interest income associated with our cash and cash items and
short-term investments, certain impacts from hedging activities, and non-service cost components of net periodic
pension and postretirement benefit cost. Our non-service costs primarily include interest cost, expected return on plan
assets, amortization of actuarial gains and losses, and settlements.
In fiscal year 2020, we adopted new accounting guidance on hedging activities that changed the income statement
presentation of excluded components (foreign currency forward points and currency swap basis differences) of our
cash flow hedges of intercompany loans. This activity is amortized on a straight-line basis within “Other non-operating
income (expense), net." In addition, gains and losses from the foreign currency remeasurement of balances associated
with intercompany and third-party financing transactions, related income tax assets and liabilities, and the impact of
related hedges are also reflected within “Other non-operating income (expense), net.” Refer to Note 2, New Accounting
Guidance, for additional information.
Cash and Cash Items
Cash and cash items include cash, time deposits, and treasury securities acquired with an original maturity of three
months or less.
Short-term Investments
Short-term investments include time deposits and treasury securities with original maturities greater than three months
and less than one year.
66
Table of Contents
Trade Receivables, net
Trade receivables comprise amounts owed to us through our operating activities and are presented net of allowances
for doubtful accounts. The allowances for doubtful accounts represent estimated uncollectible receivables associated
with potential customer defaults on contractual obligations. A provision for customer defaults is made on a general
formula basis when it is determined that the risk of some default is probable and estimable but cannot yet be
associated with specific customers. The assessment of the likelihood of customer defaults is based on various factors,
including the length of time the receivables are past due, historical experience, and existing economic conditions. The
allowance also includes amounts for certain customers where a risk of default has been specifically identified,
considering factors such as the financial condition of the customer and their inability to pay. The allowance excludes
amounts associated with customer disputes over contractual terms and conditions. Changes to the carrying amount of
the allowance for doubtful accounts are summarized below:
Balance at 30 September 2017 $22.6 
Provision for credit losses 11.2 
Write-offs charged against the allowance (7.2)
Currency translation and other (0.2)
Balance at 30 September 2018 $26.4 
Provision for credit losses 7.7 
Write-offs charged against the allowance (6.8)
Currency translation and other (2.5)
Balance at 30 September 2019 $24.8 
Provision for credit losses 7.7 
Write-offs charged against the allowance (8.3)
Currency translation and other (0.3)
Balance at 30 September 2020 $23.9 
Inventories
We carry inventory that is comprised of finished goods, work-in-process, raw materials and supplies. Refer to Note 7,
Inventories, for further detail.
Inventories on our consolidated balance sheets are stated at the lower of cost or net realizable value. We write down
our inventories for estimated obsolescence or unmarketable inventory based upon assumptions about future demand
and market conditions.
Effective 1 July 2018, we determine the cost of all our inventories on a first-in, first-out basis ("FIFO"). Prior to 1 July
2018, we determined the cost of our industrial gas inventories in the United States on a last-in, first-out basis ("LIFO").
We applied this accounting change as a cumulative effect adjustment to cost of sales in the fourth quarter of fiscal year
2018. This change decreased our cost of sales by $24.1 for the quarter and fiscal year ended 30 September 2018.
Equity Investments
The equity method of accounting is used when we exercise significant influence but do not have operating control,
generally assumed to be 20% – 50% ownership. Under the equity method, original investments are recorded at cost
and adjusted by our share of undistributed earnings or losses of these companies. We use the cumulative earnings
approach for determining cash flow presentation of cash distributions received from equity method investees. Equity
investments are reviewed for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying
amount of the investment may not be recoverable.
67
Table of Contents
Plant and Equipment, net
Plant and equipment, net is stated at cost less accumulated depreciation. Construction costs, labor, and applicable
overhead related to installations are capitalized. Expenditures for additions and improvements that extend the lives or
increase the capacity of plant assets are capitalized. The costs of maintenance and repairs of plant and equipment are
charged to expense as incurred.
Fully depreciated assets are retained in the gross plant and equipment and accumulated depreciation accounts until
they are removed from service. In the case of disposals, assets and related depreciation are removed from the
accounts, and the net amounts, less proceeds from disposal, are included in income. Refer to Note 9, Plant and
Equipment, net, for further detail.
Computer Software
We capitalize costs incurred to purchase or develop software for internal use. Capitalized costs include purchased
computer software packages, payments to vendors/consultants for development and implementation or modification to
a purchased package to meet our requirements, payroll and related costs for employees directly involved in
development, and interest incurred while software is being developed. Capitalized computer software costs are
reflected in "Plant and equipment, net" on the consolidated balance sheets and are depreciated over the estimated
useful life of the software, generally a period of three to five years.
Capitalized Interest
As we build new plant and equipment, we include in the cost of these assets a portion of the interest payments we
make during the year. The amount of capitalized interest was $15.9, $13.5, and $19.5 in fiscal years 2020, 2019, and
2018, respectively.
Leases
As lessee, we recognize a right-of-use ("ROU") asset and lease liability on the balance sheet for all leases with a term
in excess of 12 months. We determine if an arrangement contains a lease at inception. The arrangement contains a
lease when there is an identifiable asset, we obtain substantially all of the economic benefits from that asset, and we
direct how and for what purpose the asset is used during the term of the arrangement. If the initial term of an
arrangement is 12 months or less, we have made an accounting election to not assess if these arrangements contain a
lease for inclusion on our balance sheet.
ROU assets represent our right to use an underlying asset for the lease term and lease liabilities represent our
obligation to make lease payments arising from the lease. ROU assets and lease liabilities are recognized at the
commencement date based on the present value of lease payments over the lease term. Since our leases generally do
not provide an implicit discount rate, we use our incremental borrowing rates based on the information available at the
commencement date in determining the present value of lease payments. To determine the incremental borrowing rate,
we consider our unsecured borrowings and published market rates, and then adjust those rates to assume full
collateralization and to factor in the individual lease term, geography, and payment structure.
Our lease term includes periods covered by options to extend or terminate the lease when it is reasonably certain that
we will exercise an option to extend or not exercise an option to terminate. Lease payments consider our practical
expedient to combine amounts for lease and related non-lease components for all classes of underlying assets in which
we are lessee. Fixed payments and payments associated with escalation clauses based on an index are included in the
ROU asset and lease liability at commencement. Variable lease payments are excluded from the ROU assets and
lease liabilities and are recognized in the period in which the obligation for those payments is incurred. Our variable
lease payments primarily include the impact from escalation clauses that are not fixed or based on an index. Prepaid
lease payments are included in the recognition of ROU assets. Our lease agreements do not contain any material lease
incentives, residual value guarantees or restrictions or covenants.
Impairment of Long-Lived Assets
Long-lived assets are grouped for impairment testing at the lowest level for which there are identifiable cash flows that
are largely independent of the cash flows of other assets and liabilities and are evaluated for impairment whenever
events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of an asset group may not be recoverable. We
assess recoverability by comparing the carrying amount of the asset group to estimated undiscounted future cash flows
expected to be generated by the asset group. If an asset group is considered impaired, the impairment loss to be
recognized is measured as the amount by which the asset group’s carrying amount exceeds its fair value. Long-lived
assets meeting the held for sale criteria are reported at the lower of carrying amount or fair value less cost to sell.
68
Table of Contents
Asset Retirement Obligations
The fair value of a liability for an asset retirement obligation is recognized in the period in which it is incurred. The fair
value of the liability is measured using discounted estimated cash flows and is adjusted to its present value in
subsequent periods as accretion expense is recorded. The corresponding asset retirement costs are capitalized as part
of the carrying amount of the related long-lived asset and depreciated over the asset’s useful life. Our asset retirement
obligations are primarily associated with on-site long-term supply contracts under which we have built a facility on land
owned by the customer and are obligated to remove the facility at the end of the contract term. Our asset retirement
obligations totaled $241.4 and $208.2 at 30 September 2020 and 2019, respectively.
Goodwill
Business combinations are accounted for using the acquisition method. The purchase price is allocated to the assets
acquired and liabilities assumed based on their estimated fair values. Any excess purchase price (plus the fair value of
any noncontrolling interest and previously held equity interest in the acquiree) over the fair market value of the net
assets acquired, including identified intangibles, is recorded as goodwill. Preliminary purchase price allocations are
made at the date of acquisition and finalized when information about facts and circumstances that existed as of the
acquisition date needed to finalize underlying estimates is obtained or when we determine that such information is not
obtainable, within a maximum measurement period of one year.
Goodwill is subject to impairment testing at least annually. In addition, goodwill is tested more frequently if a change in
circumstances or the occurrence of events indicates that potential impairment exists. Refer to Note 10, Goodwill, for
further detail.
Intangible Assets
Intangible assets with determinable lives primarily consist of customer relationships, purchased patents and technology,
and land use rights. The cost of intangible assets with determinable lives is amortized on a straight-line basis over the
estimated period of economic benefit. No residual value is estimated for these intangible assets. Indefinite-lived
intangible assets consist of trade names and trademarks. Indefinite-lived intangibles are subject to impairment testing
at least annually. In addition, intangible assets are tested more frequently if a change in circumstances or the
occurrence of events indicates that potential impairment exists.
Customer relationships are generally amortized over periods of five to twenty-five years. Purchased patents and
technology and other finite-lived intangibles are generally amortized over periods of five to fifteen years. Other
intangibles includes land use rights, which are generally amortized over a period of fifty years. Amortizable lives are
adjusted whenever there is a change in the estimated period of economic benefit. Refer to Note 11, Intangible Assets,
for further detail.
Retirement Benefits
The cost of pension benefits is generally recognized over the employees’ service period. We use actuarial methods and
assumptions in the valuation of defined benefit obligations and the determination of expense. Differences between
actual and expected results or changes in the value of obligations and plan assets are not recognized in earnings as
they occur but, rather, are recognized systematically over subsequent periods. Refer to Note 16, Retirement Benefits,
for disclosures related to our pension and other postretirement benefits.
69
Table of Contents
2. NEW ACCOUNTING GUIDANCE
Accounting Guidance Implemented in Fiscal Year 2020
Leases
In February 2016, the FASB issued lease guidance (the "new lease guidance") that requires lessees to recognize a
right-of-use asset and lease liability on the balance sheet for all leases, including operating leases, with a term in
excess of 12 months. The guidance also expands the quantitative and qualitative disclosure requirements.
We are the lessee under various agreements for real estate, vehicles, aircraft, and other equipment that are accounted
for as operating leases.
We adopted this guidance in fiscal year 2020 using a modified retrospective approach with the election to apply the
guidance as of 1 October 2019, "the adoption date," instead of the earliest comparative period presented in the
consolidated financial statements.
We elected the following practical expedients provided by this guidance:
•The package of practical expedients, which allows us to carry forward the lease population and classification
existing as of the adoption date, among other things;
•The land easements practical expedient, which allows us to carry forward our accounting treatment for land
easements on agreements existing before the adoption date;
•The hindsight practical expedient, which is used to determine the reasonably certain lease term for existing
leases as of the adoption date;
•The component combination practical expedient, which allows us to account for lease and non-lease
components associated with that lease as a single component, if certain criteria are met; and
•The short-term leases practical expedient, which allows us to not record the related lease liabilities and right-of-
use assets for operating leases in which we are the lessee with a term of 12 months or less.
Adoption of the standard resulted in recognition of lease liabilities and right-of-use assets on our consolidated balance
sheets as of the adoption date of $375.3 and $332.3, respectively. The standard did not materially affect our retained
earnings, results of operations or liquidity. Refer to Note 12, Leases, for additional information.
Hedging Activities
In August 2017, the FASB issued guidance on hedging activities to expand the related presentation and disclosure
requirements, change how companies assess effectiveness, and eliminate the separate measurement and reporting of
hedge ineffectiveness. The guidance also enables more hedging strategies to become eligible for hedge accounting.
We adopted the new guidance on 1 October 2019 on a modified retrospective basis. The primary impact of adoption
was the presentation in the consolidated income statement of foreign currency forward points and currency swap basis
differences ("excluded components"), since these are excluded from the assessment of hedge effectiveness for our
hedges of intercompany loans. Historically, the impacts from changes in value of these components were recorded in
"Interest expense." In fiscal year 2020, excluded components of $33.5 were recognized in "Other non-operating income
(expense), net" consistent with the remeasurement of the intercompany loans. Interest expense of $33.3 and $42.6 in
fiscal years 2019 and 2018, respectively, has not been restated to conform to the 2020 presentation.
In accordance with the transition provisions of the guidance, the separate measurement of ineffectiveness for our cash
flow hedging instruments existing as of the date of adoption should be eliminated through a cumulative-effect
adjustment within equity. Ineffectiveness recognized for our cash flow hedging instruments existing as of the date of
adoption was not material to the consolidated financial statements.
70
Table of Contents
Retirement Benefit Disclosures
In August 2018, the FASB issued guidance which modifies the disclosure requirements for employers that sponsor
defined benefit pension or other postretirement plans. The guidance is effective in fiscal year 2021, with early adoption
permitted, and must be applied on a retrospective basis. We adopted this guidance in the fourth quarter of fiscal year
2020 and updated the disclosures contained in Note 16, Retirement Benefits, accordingly. Other than the modification
of certain disclosures, this guidance had no effect on our consolidated financial statements.
New Accounting Guidance to be Implemented
Credit Losses on Financial Instruments
In June 2016, the FASB issued guidance on the measurement of credit losses, which requires measurement and
recognition of expected credit losses for financial assets, including trade receivables and capital lease receivables, held
at the reporting date based on historical experience, current conditions, and reasonable and supportable forecasts. The
method to determine a loss is different from the existing guidance, which requires a credit loss to be recognized when it
is probable. We will adopt this guidance at the beginning of fiscal year 2021 under the modified retrospective approach
with an adjustment to retained earnings as of the effective date. This guidance will not have a material impact on our
consolidated financial statements upon adoption.
Cloud Computing Implementation Costs
In August 2018, the FASB issued guidance which aligns the capitalization requirements for implementation costs
incurred in a hosting arrangement that is a service contract with the existing capitalization requirements for
implementation costs incurred to develop or obtain internal-use software. We will adopt this guidance at the beginning
of fiscal year 2021. This guidance will not have a material impact on our consolidated financial statements upon
adoption.
Simplifying the Accounting for Income Taxes
In December 2019, the FASB issued an update to simplify the accounting for income taxes and improve consistent
application by clarifying or amending existing guidance. We will adopt this guidance at the beginning of fiscal year
2021. This guidance will not have a material impact on our consolidated financial statements upon adoption.
Reference Rate Reform
In March 2020, the FASB issued an update to provide practical expedients and exceptions for applying GAAP to
contracts, hedging relationships and other transactions affected by reference rate reform if certain criteria are met. This
update is primarily applicable to our contracts and hedging relationships that reference LIBOR. The
amendments may be applied to impacted contracts and hedges prospectively through 31 December 2022. To date, we
have had no impacts on our hedging relationships related to reference rate reform. We will continue to evaluate the
impact this guidance could have on our consolidated financial statements.
3.  ACQUISITIONS
Fiscal Year 2020
Asset Acquisition
On 17 April 2020, we acquired five operating hydrogen production plants from PBF Energy Inc. ("PBF") and
commenced contractual long-term supply of hydrogen from those plants to PBF's refineries. We accounted for the
transaction as an asset acquisition and recorded the aggregate purchase price of approximately $580 to plant and
equipment on our consolidated balance sheets.
Business Combinations
We completed three acquisitions on 1 July 2020 that were accounted for as business combinations. These acquisitions
had an aggregate purchase price, net of cash acquired, of $185.4. The largest of these acquisitions was the purchase
of Oxygen & Argon Works Ltd., the leading manufacturer and marketer of industrial gases in Israel, primarily offering
merchant gas products. We expect this acquisition to create growth opportunities in the region and allow us to leverage
synergies and operating efficiencies. The results of this business are consolidated within our Industrial Gases – EMEA
segment and did not materially impact our consolidated income statement.
71
Table of Contents
Our fiscal year 2020 business combinations resulted in the recognition of plant and equipment of $71.2, goodwill of
$71.1, and intangible assets of $50.7, partially offset by net liabilities acquired. The goodwill recognized on the
transactions, $8.1 of which is deductible for tax purposes, is attributable to expected growth and cost synergies. The
intangible assets recognized primarily resulted from acquired customer relationships, having a weighted-average useful
life of 19 years.
The acquired assets and liabilities resulting from our 2020 business combinations were recorded at their estimated fair
values, which were calculated based primarily on a preliminary purchase price allocation prepared by independent
valuation specialists. We may record adjustments to these assets and liabilities during the preliminary purchase price
allocation period, which could be up to one year from the acquisition date.
Fiscal Year 2019
As further discussed below, we completed three business combinations in fiscal year 2019.
Exchange of Equity Affiliate Investments
We previously held 50% ownership interests in High-Tech Gases (Beijing) Co., Ltd. ("High-Tech Gases") and WuXi Hi-
Tech Gas Co., Ltd. ("WuXi"), both of which were joint ventures with another industrial gas company in China. We
accounted for these arrangements as equity method investments in our Industrial Gases – Asia segment through
30 April 2019.
On 1 May 2019, we acquired our partner's 50% interest in WuXi in exchange for our 50% interest in High-Tech Gases.
The exchange resulted in a net gain of $29.1, of which $15.0 resulted from the revaluation of our previously held equity
interest in WuXi to its acquisition date fair value and $14.1 resulted from the disposition of our interest in High-Tech
Gases. The net gain was reflected as "Gain on exchange of equity affiliate investments" on our consolidated income
statements in fiscal year 2019 and was excluded from the results of the Industrial Gases – Asia segment.
We revalued our previously held 50% equity interest in WuXi based on an estimated acquisition date fair value of
$27.0. We calculated this fair value using a discounted cash flow analysis under the income approach, which required
estimates and assumptions regarding projected revenue growth, customer attrition rates, profit margin, and discount
rate.
The acquisition of the remaining interest in WuXi was accounted for as a business combination. The results of this
business are consolidated within our Industrial Gases – Asia segment.
Other Fiscal Year 2019 Business Combinations
The remaining business combinations completed in fiscal year 2019 had total consideration, net of cash acquired,
of $126.6. The largest of these business combinations was the acquisition of ACP Europe SA ("ACP"), the largest
independent carbon dioxide business in Continental Europe, which closed in the second quarter. The results of this
business are consolidated within our Industrial Gases – EMEA segment.
Fiscal Year 2018
Asset Acquisition
On 26 April 2018 ("the acquisition date"), we completed the formation of Air Products Lu An (Changzhi) Co., Ltd. (the
“JV”), a 60%-owned joint venture with Lu’An Clean Energy Company ("Lu’An"). The results of the JV are consolidated
within the Industrial Gases – Asia segment.
Air Products contributed four large air separation units to the JV, and the JV acquired gasification and syngas clean-up
assets from Lu’An. We accounted for the acquisition of the gasification and syngas clean-up assets as an asset
acquisition. In connection with closing the acquisition, we paid net cash of approximately 1.5 billion RMB ($235) and
issued equity of 1.4 billion RMB ($227) to Lu'An for their noncontrolling interest in the JV. In addition, Lu'An made a
loan of 2.6 billion RMB to the JV, and we established a liability for remaining cash payments. The issuance of equity to
Lu'An for their noncontrolling interest, the long-term debt, and the liability for the remaining cash payments were
noncash transactions that were excluded from the consolidated statement of cash flows for the fiscal year ended 30
September 2018. Refer to Note 15, Debt, for additional information on our related party debt.
72
Table of Contents
Business Combinations
We completed eight acquisitions that were accounted for as business combinations in fiscal year 2018. These
acquisitions had total consideration, net of cash acquired, of $355.4. The largest of the acquisitions was completed
during the first quarter of fiscal year 2018 and primarily consisted of three air separation units serving onsite and
merchant customers in China. The results of this business are consolidated within our Industrial Gases – Asia segment.
4. REVENUE RECOGNITION
Nature of Goods and Services
The principal activities from which we generate sales from our contracts with customers, separated between our
regional industrial gases businesses and industrial gases equipment businesses, are described below with their
respective revenue recognition policies. For an overall summary of these policies and discussion on payment terms
and presentation, refer to Note 1, Major Accounting Policies.
Industrial Gases – Regional
Our regional industrial gases businesses produce and sell atmospheric gases such as oxygen, nitrogen, and argon
(primarily recovered by the cryogenic distillation of air) and process gases such as hydrogen, helium, carbon dioxide,
carbon monoxide, syngas, and specialty gases. We distribute gases to our sale of gas customers through different
supply modes depending on various factors including the customer's volume requirements and location. Our supply
modes are as follows:
•On-site Gases—Supply mode associated with customers who require large volumes of gases and have
relatively constant demand. Gases are produced and supplied by large facilities we construct on or near the
customers’ facilities or by pipeline systems from centrally located production facilities. These sale of gas
contracts generally have 15- to 20- year terms. We also deliver smaller quantities of product through small on-
site plants (cryogenic or non-cryogenic generators), typically via 10- to 15- year sale of gas contracts. The
contracts within this supply mode generally contain fixed monthly charges and/or minimum purchase
requirements with price escalation provisions that are generally based on external indices. Revenue associated
with this supply mode is generally recognized over time during the period in which we deliver or make available
the agreed upon quantity of goods.
•Merchant Gases—Supply mode associated with liquid bulk and packaged gases customers. Liquid bulk
customers receive delivery of product in liquid or gaseous form by tanker or tube trailer. The product is stored,
usually in its liquid state, in equipment we typically design and install at the customer’s site for vaporizing into a
gaseous state as needed. Packaged gases customers receive small quantities of product delivered in either
cylinders or dewars. Both liquid bulk and packaged gases sales do not contain minimum purchase
requirements as they are governed by contracts and/or purchase orders based on the customer's
requirements. These contracts contain stated terms that are generally 5 years or less. Performance obligations
associated with this supply mode are satisfied at a point in time when the customer receives and obtains
control of the product, which generally occurs upon delivery.
The timing of revenue recognition for our regional industrial gases businesses is generally consistent with our right to
invoice the customer. Variable components of consideration that may not be resolved within the month, such as the
ability to earn an annual bonus or incur a penalty, are more relevant to on-site contracts and are considered
constrained as they can be impacted by a single significant event such as a plant outage, which could occur at the end
of a contract period. We consider contract modifications on an individual basis to determine appropriate accounting
treatment. However, contract modifications are generally accounted for prospectively as they relate to distinct goods or
services associated with future periods of performance.
We mitigate energy and natural gas price risk contractually through pricing formulas, surcharges, and cost pass-
through arrangements.
73
Table of Contents
Industrial Gases – Equipment
We design and manufacture equipment for air separation, hydrocarbon recovery and purification, natural gas
liquefaction, and liquid helium and liquid hydrogen transport and storage. The Industrial Gases – Global and the
Corporate and other segments serve our sale of equipment customers.
Our sale of equipment contracts are generally comprised of a single performance obligation as the individual promised
goods or services contained within the contracts are integrated with or dependent upon other goods or services in the
contract for a single output to the customer.
Revenue from our sale of equipment contracts is generally recognized over time as we have an enforceable right to
payment for performance completed to date and our performance under the contract terms does not create an asset
with alternative use. Otherwise, sale of equipment contracts are satisfied at the point in time the customer obtains
control of the equipment, which is generally determined based on the shipping terms of the contract. For contracts
recognized over time, we primarily recognize revenue using a cost incurred input method by which costs incurred to
date relative to total estimated costs at completion are used to measure progress toward satisfying performance
obligations. Costs incurred include material, labor, and overhead costs and represent work contributing and
proportionate to the transfer of control to the customer.
Since our contracts are generally comprised of a single performance obligation, contract modifications are typically
accounted for as part of the existing contract and are recognized as a cumulative adjustment for the inception-to-date
effect of such change. In addition, changes in estimates on projects accounted for under the cost incurred input method
are recognized as a cumulative adjustment for the inception-to-date effect of such change. Changes in estimates
favorably impacted operating income by approximately $7, $37, and $38 in fiscal years 2020, 2019, and 2018,
respectively. Our changes in estimates would not have significantly impacted amounts recorded in prior years.
Disaggregation of Revenue
The table below presents our consolidated sales for fiscal years 2020 and 2019 disaggregated by supply mode for
each of our reporting segments. We believe this presentation best depicts the nature, timing, type of customer, and
contract terms for our sales.
Industrial
Gases–
AmericasIndustrial
Gases–
EMEAIndustrial
Gases–
AsiaIndustrial
Gases–
GlobalCorporate
and other Total %
2020
On-site $2,040.2 $629.3 $1,652.8 $— $— $4,322.3 49 %
Merchant 1,590.5 1,297.0 1,063.7 — — 3,951.2 45 %
Sale of Equipment — — — 364.9 217.9 582.8 6 %
Total $3,630.7 $1,926.3 $2,716.5 $364.9 $217.9 $8,856.3 100 %
2019
On-site $2,230.6 $728.4 $1,622.6 $— $— $4,581.6 52 %
Merchant 1,642.9 1,274.1 1,041.0 — — 3,958.0 44 %
Sale of Equipment — — — 261.0 118.3 379.3 4 %
Total $3,873.5 $2,002.5 $2,663.6 $261.0 $118.3 $8,918.9 100 %
Remaining Performance Obligations
As of 30 September 2020, the transaction price allocated to remaining performance obligations is estimated to be
approximately $22 billion. This amount includes fixed-charge contract provisions associated with our on-site and sale of
equipment supply modes. We estimate that approximately half of this revenue will be recognized over approximately
the next five years and the balance thereafter.
Expected revenue associated with new on-site plants that are not yet onstream is excluded from this amount. In
addition, this amount excludes consideration associated with contracts having an expected duration of less than one
year, and variable consideration for which we recognize revenue at the amount to which we have the right to invoice,
including pass-through costs related to energy and natural gas.
74
Table of Contents
In the future, actual amounts will differ due to events outside of our control, including but not limited to inflationary price
escalations, currency exchange rates, and terminated or renewed contracts.
Contract Balances
The table below details balances arising from contracts with customers:
30 September Balance Sheet Location 2020 2019
Assets
Contract assets – current Other receivables and current assets $55.9 $64.3 
Contract fulfillment costs – current Other receivables and current assets 109.9 64.5 
Liabilities
Contract liabilities – current Payables and accrued liabilities 313.8 247.4 
Contract liabilities – noncurrent Other noncurrent liabilities 57.9 49.2 
Contract assets and liabilities result from differences in timing of revenue recognition and customer invoicing. These
balances are reported on the consolidated balance sheets on a contract-by-contract basis at the end of each reporting
period.
Contract assets primarily relate to our sale of equipment contracts for which revenue is recognized over time. These
balances represent unbilled revenue, which occurs when revenue recognized under the measure of progress exceeds
the amount invoiced to our customers. Our ability to invoice the customer for contract asset balances is not only based
on the passage of time, but also the achievement of certain contractual milestones.
Contract fulfillment costs primarily include deferred costs related to sale of equipment projects that cannot be
inventoried and for which we expect to recognize revenue upon transfer of control at project completion or costs related
to fulfilling a specific anticipated contract.
Costs to obtain a contract, or contract acquisition costs, are capitalized only after we have established a contract with
the customer. We elected to apply the practical expedient to expense these costs as they are incurred if the
amortization period of the asset that would have otherwise been recognized is one year or less. Our contract
acquisition costs capitalized as of 30 September 2020 and 2019 were not material.
Contract liabilities include advance payments or right to consideration prior to performance under the contract. Contract
liabilities are recognized as revenue when or as we perform under the contract. The increase in our contract liabilities –
current balance primarily relates to new sale of equipment projects as balances associated with our sale of gas
contracts are generally related to fixed charges and are relatively consistent period over period. During the fiscal year
ended 30 September 2020, we recognized approximately $145 in revenue associated with sale of equipment contracts
that was included within our contract liabilities as of 30 September 2019. Advanced payments from our customers do
not represent a significant financing component as these payments are intended for purposes other than financing,
such as to meet working capital demands or to protect us from our customer failing to meet its obligations under the
terms of the contract.
Changes in contract asset and liability balances during the fiscal year ended 30 September 2020 were not materially
impacted by any other factors.
75
Table of Contents
5.  COST REDUCTION ACTIONS
In fiscal year 2019, we recognized an expense of $25.5 for severance and other benefits associated with the
elimination or planned elimination of approximately 300 positions. These actions were taken to drive cost synergies
primarily within the Industrial Gases – EMEA and the Industrial Gases – Americas segments. The charge was not
recorded in segment results.
Liabilities associated with these actions are reflected on our consolidated balance sheets within "Payables and accrued
liabilities." The table below summarizes the carrying amount of the accrual as of 30 September 2020:
2019 Charge $25.5 
Cash expenditures (6.9)
Amount reflected in pension liability (0.3)
Currency translation adjustment (0.5)
30 September 2019 $17.8 
Cash expenditures (13.5)
Currency translation adjustment 0.4 
30 September 2020 $4.7 
6.  DISCONTINUED OPERA TIONS
In fiscal year 2020, loss from discontinued operations, net of tax, was $14.3. This resulted from a pre-tax loss of $19.0
recorded in the second quarter to increase our existing liability for retained environmental obligations associated with
the sale of our former Amines business in September 2006. Refer to the Pace discussion within Note 17, Commitments
and Contingencies, for additional information. The loss did not have an impact on our cash flows for the fiscal year
ended 30 September 2020.
In fiscal year 2018, income from discontinued operations, net of tax, was $42.2. This included an income tax benefit
of $25.6 resulting from the resolution of uncertain tax positions taken in conjunction with the disposition of our former
European Homecare business in fiscal year 2012 and an after-tax benefit of $17.6 resulting from the resolution of
certain post-closing adjustments associated with the sale of our former Performance Materials Division in fiscal year
2017. These benefits were partially offset by an after-tax loss of $1.0 associated with Energy-from-Waste project exit
activities.
7.  INVENT ORIES
The components of inventories are as follows:
30 September 2020 2019
Finished goods $134.5 $128.8 
Work in process 21.3 27.5 
Raw materials, supplies and other 249.0 232.0 
Inventories $404.8 $388.3 
76
Table of Contents
8. SUMMARIZED FINANCIAL  INFORMA TION OF EQUITY  AFFILIA TES
The summarized financial information below is on a combined 100% basis and has been compiled based on financial
statements of the companies accounted for by the equity method. The amounts presented include the accounts of the
following equity affiliates:
Abdullah Hashim Industrial Gases & Equipment Co., Ltd. (25%); INOX Air Products Private Limited (50%);
Air Products South Africa (Proprietary) Limited (50%); Jazan Gas Projects Company (26%);
Bangkok Cogeneration Company Limited (49%); Kulim Industrial Gases Sdn. Bhd. (50%);
Bangkok Industrial Gases Co., Ltd. (49%); Sapio Produzione Idrogeno Ossigeno S.r.l. (49%);
Chengdu Air & Gas Products Ltd. (50%); Tecnologia en Nitrogeno S. de R.L. de C.V. (50%);
Helios S.p.A. (49%); Tyczka Industrie-Gases GmbH (50%);
INFRA Group (40%); and principally, other industrial gas producers.
30 September   2020 2019
Current assets $1,943.5 $1,660.6 
Noncurrent assets 4,529.2 4,400.4 
Current liabilities 765.3 725.1 
Noncurrent liabilities  2,958.8 2,853.6 
Year Ended 30 September 2020 2019 2018
Net sales $2,809.1 $2,885.6 $2,663.1 
Sales less cost of sales 1,212.5 1,193.4 1,050.6 
Operating income 748.6 763.4 635.3 
Net income 567.8 492.4 388.0 
Dividends received from equity affiliates were $107.0, $144.3, and $122.5 in fiscal years 2020, 2019, and 2018,
respectively.
The investment in net assets of and advances to equity affiliates as of 30 September 2020 and 2019 included
investment in foreign affiliates of $1,431.3 and $1,275.4, respectively.
As of 30 September 2020 and 2019, the amount of investment in companies accounted for by the equity method
included equity method goodwill of $50.0 and $42.8, respectively.
India Finance Act 2020
For the fiscal year ended 30 September 2020, equity affiliates' income includes a benefit of $33.8 due to tax legislation
passed by the Indian government (the "India Finance Act"). This benefit relates to INOX Air Products Private Limited for
the release of our share of accumulated dividend distribution taxes and is included in the fiscal year 2020 net income
on a 100% basis in the table above. Refer to Note 22, Income Taxes, for additional information.
U.S. Tax Cuts and Jobs Act
For the fiscal year ended 30 September 2018, equity affiliates' income includes an expense of $28.5 for our
proportionate share of the impact of the U.S. Tax Cuts and Jobs Act primarily recorded during the first quarter of fiscal
year 2018. This expense is included in the fiscal year 2018 net income on a 100% basis in the table above. Refer to
Note 22, Income Taxes, for additional information.
77
Table of Contents
Jazan Gas Project Company
On 19 April 2015, a joint venture between Air Products and ACWA Holding entered into a 20-year oxygen and nitrogen
supply agreement to supply Saudi Aramco’s oil refinery and power plant being built in Jazan, Saudi Arabia. Air Products
owns 26% of the joint venture and guarantees the repayment of its share of an equity bridge loan. ACWA also
guarantees their share of the loan. We determined that the joint venture is a variable interest entity, for which we are
not the primary beneficiary. As of 30 September 2020, our consolidated balance sheets included $94.4 reflected within
"Payables and accrued liabilities" for our obligation to make future equity contributions in 2021 based on our
proportionate share of the advances received by the joint venture under the loan.
9. PLANT AND EQUIPMENT , NET
The major classes of plant and equipment are as follows:
30 SeptemberUseful Life
in years 2020 2019
Land $296.8 $281.5 
Buildings 30 997.8 946.8 
Production facilities 10to20 17,289.7 15,602.1 
Distribution and other machinery and equipment 5to25 4,807.7 4,491.9 
Construction in progress 1,784.2 1,011.4 
Plant and equipment, at cost 25,176.2 22,333.7 
Less: Accumulated depreciation 13,211.5 11,996.1 
Plant and equipment, net $11,964.7 $10,337.6 
Depreciable lives of production facilities related to long-term customer supply contracts are matched to the contract lives.
The depreciable lives for various types of distribution equipment are: 10 to 25 years for cylinders, depending on the nature
and properties of the product; 20 years for tanks; 7.5 years for customer stations; and 5 to 15 years for tractors and trailers.
Depreciation expense was $1,150.5, $1,049.7, and $940.7 in fiscal years 2020, 2019, and 2018, respectively.
10.  GOODWILL
Changes to the carrying amount of consolidated goodwill by segment are as follows:
Industrial
Gases–
AmericasIndustrial
Gases–
EMEAIndustrial
Gases–
AsiaIndustrial
Gases–
GlobalCorporate
and other Total
Goodwill, net at 30 September 2018 $162.1 $424.4 $171.9 $20.1 $10.4 $788.9 
Acquisitions — 38.5 10.1 — — 48.6 
Currency translation and other (5.8) (30.6) (3.5) (0.5) — (40.4)
Goodwill, net at 30 September 2019 $156.3 $432.3 $178.5 $19.6 $10.4 $797.1 
Acquisitions — 66.6 — — 4.5 71.1 
Currency translation and other (3.7) 25.2 1.9 (0.1) — 23.3 
Goodwill, net at 30 September 2020 $152.6 $524.1 $180.4 $19.5 $14.9 $891.5 
30 September 2020 2019 2018
Goodwill, gross $1,230.2 $1,162.2 $1,194.7 
Accumulated impairment losses (338.7) (365.1) (405.8)
Goodwill, net $891.5 $797.1 $788.9 
Accumulated impairment losses include the impacts of currency translation. These losses are attributable to our Latin America
reporting unit ("LASA") within the Industrial Gases – Americas segment.(A)
(B)
(A)
(B)
(A)
(A)
78
Table of Contents
We review goodwill for impairment annually in the fourth quarter of the fiscal year and whenever events or changes in
circumstances indicate that the carrying value of goodwill might not be recoverable. The impairment test for goodwill
involves calculating the fair value of each reporting unit and comparing that value to the carrying value. If the fair value
of the reporting unit is less than its carrying value, the difference is recorded as a goodwill impairment charge, not to
exceed the total amount of goodwill allocated to that reporting unit. During the fourth quarter of fiscal year 2020, we
conducted our annual goodwill impairment test and determined that the fair value of all our reporting units exceeded
their carrying value.
11.  INTANGIBLE ASSETS
The table below summarizes the major classes of our intangible assets:
2020 2019
30 September GrossAccumulated
Amortization/
Impairment Net GrossAccumulated
Amortization/
Impairment Net
Customer relationships $538.0 ($209.9) $328.1 $487.9 ($179.8) $308.1 
Patents and technology 39.1 (16.3) 22.8 39.0 (13.3) 25.7 
Other 77.6 (33.7) 43.9 75.0 (33.4) 41.6 
Total finite-lived intangible
assets 654.7 (259.9) 394.8 601.9 (226.5) 375.4 
Trade names and trademarks
(indefinite-lived) 52.2 (11.2) 41.0 56.2 (12.1) 44.1 
Total Intangible Assets $706.9 ($271.1) $435.8 $658.1 ($238.6) $419.5 
The increase in net intangible assets in fiscal year 2020 was primarily attributable to intangible assets acquired through
business combinations, partially offset by amortization.
Amortization expense for intangible assets was $34.5, $33.1, and $30.0 in fiscal years 2020, 2019, and 2018,
respectively. Refer to Note 1, Major Accounting Policies, for the amortization periods for each major class of intangible
assets. The table below details projected annual amortization expense for intangible assets as of 30 September 2020:
2021 $36.6 
2022 34.1 
2023 33.0 
2024 31.8 
2025 30.7 
Thereafter 228.6 
Total $394.8 
Indefinite-lived intangible assets are subject to impairment testing at least annually or more frequently if events or
changes in circumstances indicate that potential impairment exists. The impairment test for indefinite-lived intangible
assets involves calculating the fair value of the indefinite-lived intangible assets and comparing the fair value to their
carrying value. If the fair value is less than the carrying value, the difference is recorded as an impairment loss. During
the fourth quarter of fiscal year 2020, we conducted our annual impairment test of indefinite-lived intangible assets and
determined that the fair value of all our intangible assets exceeded their carrying value.
79
Table of Contents
12.  LEASES
As discussed in Note 2, New Accounting Guidance, we adopted the new lease guidance in fiscal year 2020 using a
modified retrospective approach with the election to apply the guidance as of 1 October 2019. For adoption, we elected
the package of practical expedients permitted under the transition guidance to carry forward the historical lease
populations as well as their classifications existing as of the adoption date (i.e. contracts having a lease
commencement date prior to 1 October 2019). Refer to Note 1, Major Accounting Policies, and Note 2, New Accounting
Guidance, for additional information on our adoption and related policies under the new lease standard.
Lessee Accounting
We are the lessee under various agreements for real estate, vehicles, aircraft, and other equipment that are accounted
for as operating leases. Our finance leases principally relate to the right to use machinery and equipment and are not
material.
The operating lease expense for fiscal year 2020 was $80.1. This amount excludes short-term and variable lease
expenses, which were not material.
Amounts associated with operating leases and their presentation on our consolidated balance sheets as of our most
recent balance sheet date and our adoption date are as follows:
30 September 2020 1 October 2019
Operating lease ROU asset
Other noncurrent assets $376.8 $332.3 
Operating lease liabilities
Payables and accrued liabilities 70.7 68.6 
Other noncurrent liabilities 335.8 306.7 
Total Operating Lease Liabilities $406.5 $375.3 
The difference between the ROU assets and lease liabilities recorded upon adoption primarily relate to the land lease
associated with our former Energy-from-Waste business in which an ROU asset was not recognized.
30 September 2020
Weighted-average remaining lease term (in years) 15.7
Weighted-average discount rate 2.1 %
Calculated on the basis of the remaining lease term and the lease liability balance for each lease as of the reporting date.
Calculated on the basis of the discount rate used to calculate the lease liability for each lease and the remaining balance of the
lease payments for each lease as of the reporting date.
At 30 September 2020, the maturity analysis of lease liabilities, showing the undiscounted cash flows, were as follows:
Operating
Leases
2021 $78.5 
2022 55.7 
2023 46.5 
2024 37.5 
2025 30.5 
Thereafter 226.0 
Total Undiscounted Lease Payments 474.7 
Imputed interest (68.2)
Present Value of Lease Liability Recognized on the Balance Sheet $406.5 (A)
(B)
(A)
(B)
80
Table of Contents
As previously disclosed in our 2019 Form 10-K, at 30 September 2019, prior to our adoption of the new lease guidance,
our rent expense under operating leases, including month-to-month agreements was $87.0 and $82.7 in fiscal years
2019 and 2018, respectively. In addition, minimum payments due under leases were as follows:
Operating
Leases
2020 $75.1 
2021 62.6 
2022 44.4 
2023 35.9 
2024 28.6 
Thereafter 171.4 
Total Undiscounted Lease Payments $418.0 
The impacts associated with our operating leases on the consolidated statements of cash flows are reflected within
"Other adjustments" within operating activities. This includes the non-cash operating lease expense of $80.1 as well as
a use of cash of $90.0 for payments on amounts included in the measurement of the lease liability for fiscal year 2020.
In addition to the ROU assets established upon adoption, we recorded $110 of non-cash additions during fiscal year
2020.
We have additional operating leases that have not yet commenced as of 30 September 2020 having lease payments
totaling approximately $60.
Lessor Accounting
Historically, certain contracts associated with facilities that are built to provide product to a specific customer were
accounted for as leases. As noted above, we elected the package of practical expedients permitted under the transition
guidance to carry forward these lease determinations as of 30 September 2019. As we generally control the operations
and maintenance of the assets that provide the supply of gas to our customers, there have been no new arrangements
that qualified as a lease in fiscal year 2020.
In cases where operating lease treatment is appropriate, there is no difference in revenue recognition over the life of
the contract as compared to accounting for the contract under a sale of gas agreement. Under the new lease standard,
these contracts qualify for a practical expedient available to lessors to combine the lease and non-lease components
and account for the combined component in accordance with the accounting treatment for the predominant component.
We elected to apply this practical expedient and have accounted for the combined component as product sales under
the revenue standard as we control the operations and maintenance of the assets that provide the supply of gas to our
customers.
In cases where sales-type lease treatment is appropriate, revenue and expense are recognized up front for the sale of
equipment component of the contract as compared to revenue recognition over the life of the arrangement under
contracts not qualifying as sales-type leases. Additionally, a portion of the revenue representing interest income from
the financing component of the lease receivable is reflected as sales over the life of the contract. During fiscal year
2020, we recognized interest income of $71.2 on our lease receivables.
Our contracts generally do not have the option to extend or terminate the lease or provide the customer the right to
purchase the asset at the end of the contract term. Instead, renewal of such contracts requires negotiation of mutually
agreed terms by both parties. Unless the customer terminates within the required notice period, the contract will go into
evergreen. Given the long-term duration of our contracts, there is no assumed residual value for the assets at the end
of the lease term.
Lease receivables, net, primarily relate to sales-type leases and are mostly included within "Noncurrent lease
receivables" on our consolidated balance sheets, with the remaining balance in "Other receivables and current assets."
As of 30 September 2020 and 2019, the credit quality of lease receivables did not require a material allowance for
credit losses.
81
Table of Contents
Lease payments collected in fiscal years 2020, 2019, and 2018 were $162.8, $171.6, and $182.7, respectively. These
payments reduced the lease receivable balance by $91.6, $94.6, and $97.4 in fiscal years 2020, 2019, and 2018,
respectively.
At 30 September 2020, minimum lease payments expected to be collected, which reconciles to lease receivables, net,
were as follows:
2021 $153.9 
2022 147.0 
2023 142.5 
2024 136.2 
2025 130.7 
Thereafter 608.5 
Total 1,318.8 
Unearned interest income (415.8)
Lease Receivables, net $903.0 
As previously disclosed in our 2019 Form 10-K, at 30 September 2019, prior to our adoption of the new lease guidance,
minimum lease payments expected to be collected were as follows:
2020 $162.5 
2021 156.9 
2022 145.7 
2023 139.4 
2024 133.2 
Thereafter 715.5 
Total 1,453.2 
Unearned interest income (472.3)
Lease Receivables, net $980.9 
Other than lease payments received during fiscal year 2020 and the impact of currency, there have been no significant
changes to our minimum lease payments expected to be collected since those disclosed as of 30 September 2019 in
our 2019 Form 10-K.
13.  FINANCIAL  INSTRUMENTS
Currency Price Risk Management
Our earnings, cash flows, and financial position are exposed to foreign currency risk from foreign currency-
denominated transactions and net investments in foreign operations. It is our policy to seek to minimize our cash flow
volatility from changes in currency exchange rates. This is accomplished by identifying and evaluating the risk that our
cash flows will change in value due to changes in exchange rates and by executing strategies necessary to manage
such exposures. Our objective is to maintain economically balanced currency risk management strategies that provide
adequate downside protection.
Forward Exchange Contracts
We enter into forward exchange contracts to reduce the cash flow exposure to foreign currency fluctuations associated
with highly anticipated cash flows and certain firm commitments, such as the purchase of plant and equipment. We also
enter into forward exchange contracts to hedge the cash flow exposure on intercompany loans and third-party debt.
This portfolio of forward exchange contracts consists primarily of Euros and U.S. Dollars. The maximum remaining term
of any forward exchange contract currently outstanding and designated as a cash flow hedge at 30 September 2020 is
2.8 years.
Forward exchange contracts are also used to hedge the value of investments in certain foreign subsidiaries and
affiliates by creating a liability in a currency in which we have a net equity position. The primary currency pair in this
portfolio of forward exchange contracts is Euros and U.S. Dollars.
82
Table of Contents
We also utilize forward exchange contracts that are not designated as hedges. These contracts are used to
economically hedge foreign currency-denominated monetary assets and liabilities, primarily working capital. The
primary objective of these forward exchange contracts is to protect the value of foreign currency-denominated
monetary assets and liabilities from the effects of volatility in foreign exchange rates that might occur prior to their
receipt or settlement. This portfolio of forward exchange contracts consists of many different foreign currency pairs, with
a profile that changes from time to time depending on business activity and sourcing decisions.
The table below summarizes our outstanding currency price risk management instruments:
2020 2019
30 SeptemberUS$
NotionalYears
Average
MaturityUS$
NotionalYears
Average
Maturity
Forward Exchange Contracts
Cash flow hedges $2,842.1 0.5 $2,418.2 0.5
Net investment hedges 636.6 3.8 830.8 0.9
Not designated 1,685.2 0.3 1,053.5 0.6
Total Forward Exchange Contracts $5,163.9 0.8 $4,302.5 0.6
The increase in the notional value of cash flow hedges from 30 September 2019 to 30 September 2020 is primarily due
to the addition of a forward exchange contract that hedges the repayment of our Eurobond maturing in fiscal year 2021.
The increase in the notional value of our forward exchange contracts that are not designated is primarily due to the
origination of forward exchange contracts that offset other forward exchange contracts previously designated as net
investment hedges or cash flow hedges that were de-designated during fiscal year 2020.
We also use foreign currency-denominated debt to hedge the foreign currency exposures of our net investment in
certain foreign subsidiaries. The designated foreign currency-denominated debt and related accrued interest was
€1,288.7 million ($1,510.8) at 30 September 2020 and €951.3 million ($1,036.9) at 30 September 2019. The
designated foreign currency-denominated debt is presented within "Long-term debt" on the consolidated balance
sheets.
Debt Portfolio Management
It is our policy to identify, on a continuing basis, the need for debt capital and to evaluate the financial risks inherent in
funding the Company with debt capital. Reflecting the result of this ongoing review, our debt portfolio and hedging
program are managed with the intent to (1) reduce funding risk with respect to borrowings made by us to preserve our
access to debt capital and provide debt capital as required for funding and liquidity purposes, and (2) manage the
aggregate interest rate risk and the debt portfolio in accordance with certain debt management parameters.
Interest Rate Management Contracts
We enter into interest rate swaps to change the fixed/variable interest rate mix of our debt portfolio in order to maintain
the percentage of fixed- and variable-rate debt within the parameters set by management. In accordance with these
parameters, the agreements are used to manage interest rate risks and costs inherent in our debt portfolio. Our interest
rate management portfolio generally consists of fixed-to-floating interest rate swaps (which are designated as fair value
hedges), pre-issuance interest rate swaps and treasury locks (which hedge the interest rate risk associated with
anticipated fixed-rate debt issuances and are designated as cash flow hedges), and floating-to-fixed interest rate swaps
(which are designated as cash flow hedges). As of 30 September 2020, the outstanding interest rate swaps were
denominated in U.S. Dollars. The notional amount of the interest rate swap agreements is equal to or less than the
designated debt being hedged. When interest rate swaps are used to hedge variable-rate debt, the indices of the
swaps and the debt to which they are designated are the same. It is our policy not to enter into any interest rate
management contracts which lever a move in interest rates on a greater than one-to-one basis.
Cross Currency Interest Rate Swap Contracts
We enter into cross currency interest rate swap contracts when our risk management function deems necessary. These
contracts may entail both the exchange of fixed- and floating-rate interest payments periodically over the life of the
agreement and the exchange of one currency for another currency at inception and at a specified future date. The
contracts are used to hedge either certain net investments in foreign operations or non-functional currency cash flows
related to intercompany loans. The current cross currency interest rate swap portfolio consists of fixed-to-fixed
83
Table of Contents
swaps primarily between U.S. Dollars and Chinese Renminbi, U.S. Dollars and Indian Rupee, and U.S. Dollars and
Chilean Pesos.
The following table summarizes our outstanding interest rate management contracts and cross currency interest rate
swaps:
2020 2019
30 SeptemberUS$
NotionalAverage
Pay %Average
Receive
%Years
Average
MaturityUS$
NotionalAverage
Pay %Average
Receive
%Years
Average
Maturity
Interest rate swaps
(fair value hedge) $200.0  LIBOR 2.76 % 1.1 $200.0  LIBOR 2.76 % 2.1
Cross currency interest rate
swaps (net investment hedge) $201.6  4.27 % 3.12 % 3.2 $216.8  4.80 % 3.31 % 3.5
Cross currency interest rate
swaps (cash flow hedge) $1,057.9  4.83 % 2.98 % 2.5 $1,129.3  4.92 % 3.04 % 2.3
Cross currency interest rate
swaps (not designated) $12.8 5.39 % 3.54 % 3.2 $6.1 2.55 % 3.72 % 4.5
The table below provides the amounts recorded on the consolidated balance sheet related to cumulative basis
adjustments for fair value hedges:
Carrying amounts of hedged itemCumulative hedging adjustment, included in
carrying amount
30 September 2020 2019 2020 2019
Long-term debt $405.4  $404.7  $5.7 $5.2 
The table below summarizes the fair value and balance sheet location of our outstanding derivatives:
30 September Balance Sheet
Location 2020 2019 Balance Sheet
Location 2020 2019
Derivatives Designated as
Hedging Instruments:
Forward exchange contractsOther receivables
and current assets $51.1 $79.0 Payables and
accrued liabilities $22.5 $53.8 
Interest rate management
contractsOther receivables
and current assets 14.7 24.8 Payables and
accrued liabilities 0.4 1.1 
Forward exchange contractsOther noncurrent
assets 0.8 11.9 Other noncurrent
liabilities 33.0 0.7 
Interest rate management
contractsOther noncurrent
assets 44.3 60.9 Other noncurrent
liabilities 1.7 0.7 
Total Derivatives Designated
as Hedging Instruments $110.9  $176.6  $57.6 $56.3 
Derivatives Not Designated
as Hedging Instruments:
Forward exchange contractsOther receivables
and current assets $31.7 $38.7 Payables and
accrued liabilities $28.0 $36.3 
Forward exchange contractsOther noncurrent
assets — 8.4 Other noncurrent
liabilities — 19.8 
Interest rate management
contractsOther noncurrent
assets 0.7 0.5 Other noncurrent
liabilities — — 
Total Derivatives Not
Designated as Hedging
Instruments $32.4 $47.6 $28.0 $56.1 
Total Derivatives $143.3  $224.2  $85.6 $112.4  
Refer to Note 14, Fair Value Measurements, which defines fair value, describes the method for measuring fair value,
and provides additional disclosures regarding fair value measurements.
84
Table of Contents
The tables below summarize gains (losses) recognized in other comprehensive income during the period related to our
net investment and cash flow hedging relationships:
2020 2019
Net Investment Hedging Relationships
Forward exchange contracts ($15.9) $51.5 
Foreign currency debt (100.2) 65.3 
Cross currency interest rate swaps 1.9 12.6 
Total Amount Recognized in OCI (114.2) 129.4 
Tax effects 28.2 (30.9)
Net Amount Recognized in OCI ($86.0) $98.5 
2020 2019
Derivatives in Cash Flow Hedging Relationships
Forward exchange contracts $116.6 ($30.3)
Forward exchange contracts, excluded components (15.2) (16.1)
Other (34.2) 0.8 
Total Amount Recognized in OCI 67.2 (45.6)
Tax effects (23.7) 1.5 
Net Amount Recognized in OCI $43.5 ($44.1)
Other primarily includes interest rate and cross currency interest rate swaps for which excluded components are recognized
in “Payables and accrued liabilities” and “Other receivables and current assets” as a component of accrued interest payable
and accrued interest receivable, respectively . These excluded components are recorded in “Other Non-operating income
(expense), net” over the life of the cross currency interest rate swap. Other also includes the recognition of our share of
gains and losses, net of tax, related to interest rate swaps held by our equity af filiates.(A)
(A)
85
Table of Contents
The table below summarizes the location and amounts recognized in income related to our cash flow and fair value
hedging relationships by contract type:
Sales Cost of SalesOther Income
(Expense), Net Interest ExpenseOther Non-
Operating Income
(Expense), Net
2020 2019 2020 2019 2020 2019 2020 2019 2020 2019
Total Amounts Presented in the
Consolidated Income Statement
in which the Effects of Cash Flow
and Fair Value Hedges are
Recorded $8,856.3 $8,918.9 $5,858.1 $5,975.5 $65.4 $49.3 $109.3 $137.0 $30.7 $66.7 
(Gain) Loss Effects of Cash Flow
Hedging:
Forward Exchange Contracts:
Amount reclassified from OCI
into income ($0.2) $0.5 ($1.0) $0.3 $— $28.5 $— $16.0 ($117.9) $— 
Amount excluded from
effectiveness testing
recognized in earnings based
on amortization approach — — — — — — — — 17.0 — 
Other:
Amount reclassified from OCI
into income — — — — — (32.4) 4.2 3.9 22.5 — 
Total (Gain) Loss Reclassified
from OCI to Income (0.2) 0.5 (1.0) 0.3 — (3.9) 4.2 19.9 (78.4) — 
Tax effects — (0.1) 0.2 (0.1) — 0.9 (1.4) (5.2) 18.9 — 
Net (Gain) Loss Reclassified from
OCI to Income ($0.2) $0.4 ($0.8) $0.2 $— ($3.0) $2.8 $14.7 ($59.5) $— 
(Gain) Loss Effects of Fair Value
Hedging:
Other:
Hedged items $— $— $— $— $— $— $0.5 $4.3 $— $— 
Derivatives designated as
hedging instruments — — — — — — (0.5) (4.3) — — 
Total (Gain) Loss Recognized in
Income $— $— $— $— $— $— $— $— $— $— 
Net amount excluded from effectiveness testing recognized in interest expense for fiscal year 2019, see Note 2, New Accounting
Guidance, for additional details.
Other primarily includes interest rate and cross currency interest rate swaps for which excluded components are recognized in “Payables
and accrued liabilities” and “Other receivables and current assets” as a component of accrued interest payable and accrued interest
receivable, respectively. These excluded components are recorded in “Other Non-operating income (expense), net” over the life of the
cross currency interest rate swap.
The table below summarizes the location and amounts recognized in income related to our derivatives not designated
as hedging instruments by contract type:
Other Income (Expense),
NetOther Non-Operating
Income (Expense), Net
2020 2019 2020 2019
The Effects of Derivatives Not Designated as Hedging Instruments:
Forward Exchange Contracts ($1.5) $1.3 $1.1 $— 
Other — (2.0) 0.7 — 
Total (Gain) Loss Recognized in Income ($1.5) ($0.7) $1.8 $— 
The amount of unrealized gains and losses related to cash flow hedges as of 30 September 2020 that are expected to
be reclassified to earnings in the next twelve months is not material.
The cash flows related to all derivative contracts are reported in the operating activities section of the consolidated
statements of cash flows.(A)
(A)
(B)
(A)
(B)
86
Table of Contents
Credit Risk-Related Contingent Features
Certain derivative instruments are executed under agreements that require us to maintain a minimum credit rating with
both Standard & Poor’s and Moody’s. If our credit rating falls below this threshold, the counterparty to the derivative
instruments has the right to request full collateralization on the derivatives’ net liability position. The net liability position
of derivatives with credit risk-related contingent features was $30.0 and $30.1 as of 30 September 2020 and 2019,
respectively. Because our current credit rating is above the various pre-established thresholds, no collateral has been
posted on these liability positions.
Counterparty Credit Risk Management
We execute financial derivative transactions with counterparties that are highly rated financial institutions, all of which
are investment grade at this time. Some of our underlying derivative agreements give us the right to require the
institution to post collateral if its credit rating falls below the pre-established thresholds with Standard & Poor’s or
Moody’s. The collateral that the counterparties would be required to post was $76.5 and $157.1 as of 30 September
2020 and 2019, respectively. No financial institution is required to post collateral at this time, as all have credit ratings at
or above threshold.
14. FAIR V ALUE MEASUREMENTS
Fair value is defined as an exit price, or the price that would be received to sell an asset or paid to transfer a liability in
an orderly transaction between market participants at the measurement date.
The fair value hierarchy prioritizes the inputs to valuation techniques used to measure fair value into three broad levels
as follows:
•Level 1—Quoted prices (unadjusted) in active markets for identical assets or liabilities.
•Level 2—Inputs that are observable for the asset or liability, either directly or indirectly through market
corroboration, for substantially the full term of the asset or liability.
•Level 3—Inputs that are unobservable for the asset or liability based on our own assumptions about the
assumptions market-participants would use in pricing the asset or liability.
The methods and assumptions used to measure the fair value of financial instruments are as follows:
Short-term Investments
Short-term investments primarily include time deposits with original maturities greater than three months and less than
one year. We estimated the fair value of our short-term investments, which approximates carrying value as of the
balance sheet date, using Level 2 inputs within the fair value hierarchy. Level 2 measurements were based on current
interest rates for similar investments with comparable credit risk and time to maturity.
Derivatives
The fair value of our interest rate management contracts and forward exchange contracts are quantified using the
income approach and are based on estimates using standard pricing models. These models consider the value of
future cash flows as of the balance sheet date, discounted to a present value using discount factors that match both the
time to maturity and currency of the underlying instruments. These standard pricing models utilize inputs that are
derived from or corroborated by observable market data such as interest rate yield curves as well as currency spot and
forward rates; therefore, the fair value of our derivatives is classified as a Level 2 measurement. On an ongoing basis,
we randomly test a subset of our valuations against valuations received from the transaction’s counterparty to validate
the accuracy of our standard pricing models. Counterparties to these derivative contracts are highly rated financial
institutions.
Refer to Note 13, Financial Instruments, for a description of derivative instruments, including details related to the
balance sheet line classifications.
87
Table of Contents
Long-term Debt, Including Related Party
The fair value of our debt is based on estimates using standard pricing models that consider the value of future cash
flows as of the balance sheet date, discounted to a present value using discount factors that match both the time to
maturity and currency of the underlying instruments. These standard valuation models utilize observable market data
such as interest rate yield curves and currency spot rates; therefore, the fair value of our debt is classified as a Level 2
measurement. We generally perform the computation of the fair value of these instruments.
The carrying values and fair values of financial instruments were as follows:
2020 2019
30 September Carrying Value Fair Value Carrying Value Fair Value 
Assets
Derivatives
Forward exchange contracts $83.6 $83.6 $138.0 $138.0 
Interest rate management contracts 59.7 59.7 86.2 86.2 
Liabilities
Derivatives
Forward exchange contracts $83.5 $83.5 $110.6 $110.6 
Interest rate management contracts 2.1 2.1 1.8 1.8 
Long-term debt, including current portion
and related party 7,900.1 8,278.4 3,267.8 3,350.9 
The carrying amounts reported on the consolidated balance sheets for cash and cash items, short-term investments,
trade receivables, payables and accrued liabilities, accrued income taxes, and short-term borrowings approximate fair
value due to the short-term nature of these instruments. Accordingly, these items have been excluded from the above
table.
The following table summarizes assets and liabilities on the consolidated balance sheets that are measured at fair
value on a recurring basis:
2020 2019
30 September TotalLevel 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 
Assets at Fair Value
Derivatives
Forward exchange
contracts $83.6 $— $83.6 $— $138.0 $— $138.0 $— 
Interest rate
management
contracts 59.7 — 59.7 — 86.2 — 86.2 — 
Total Assets at Fair
Value $143.3 $— $143.3 $— $224.2 $— $224.2 $— 
Liabilities at Fair
Value
Derivatives
Forward exchange
contracts $83.5 $— $83.5 $— $110.6 $— $110.6 $— 
Interest rate
management
contracts 2.1 — 2.1 — 1.8 — 1.8 — 
Total Liabilities at Fair
Value $85.6 $— $85.6 $— $112.4 $— $112.4 $— 
88
Table of Contents
15. DEBT
In fiscal year 2020, Air Products issued U.S. Dollar- and Euro-denominated fixed-rate notes in multiple tranches with
aggregate principal amounts of $3.8 billion and €1.0 billion ($1.2 billion as of 30 September 2020), respectively. The
U.S. Dollar-denominated notes were issued on 30 April 2020, and the Euro-denominated notes were issued on 5 May
2020. The proceeds from these notes were reduced by deferred financing charges and discounts of approximately $45,
which are being amortized over the life of the underlying bonds. We intend to use the majority of the proceeds to fund
growth projects and repay debt maturities through 2021. In August 2020, we repaid a 2.0% Eurobond of €300.0 million
that had been previously reflected as long-term debt due to our intent to refinance as of 30 September 2019.
Total Debt
The table below summarizes our total outstanding debt as reflected on our consolidated balance sheets as of 30
September 2020 and 2019:
30 September 2020 2019
Short-term borrowings $7.7 $58.2 
Current portion of long-term debt 470.0 40.4 
Long-term debt 7,132.9 2,907.3 
Long-term debt – related party 297.2 320.1 
Total Debt $7,907.8 $3,326.0 
Includes bank obligations with weighted average interest rates of 1.6% and 3.7% as of 30 September 2020 and 2019,
respectively .
Our related party debt resulted from the 2018 acquisition of gasification and syngas clean-up assets from our joint venture
partner , Lu'An, who partially funded the acquisition with a loan to the joint venture.
Includes current portions of long-term debt owed to Lu'An of $ 41.3 and $ 37.8 as of 30 September 2020 and 2019, respectively .
Long-term Debt
The coupon interest rates, maturities, and carrying amounts of our long-term debt as of 30 September 2020 and 2019
are summarized in the table below:
30 SeptemberFiscal Year
Maturities 2020 2019
Payable in U.S. Dollars
Debentures
8.75% 2021 $18.4 $18.4 
Medium-term Notes (weighted average rate)
Series E 7.6% 2026 17.2 17.2 
Senior Notes
Note 3.0% 2022 400.0 400.0 
Note 2.75% 2023 400.0 400.0 
Note 3.35% 2024 400.0 400.0 
Note 1.50% 2026 550.0 — 
Note 1.85% 2027 650.0 — 
Note 2.05% 2030 900.0 — 
Note 2.70% 2040 750.0 — 
Note 2.80% 2050 950.0 — 
Other (weighted average rate)
Variable-rate industrial revenue bonds 0.1% 2035 to 2050 631.9 631.9 (A)
(B)(C)
(B)
(A)
(B)
(C)
89
Table of Contents
30 SeptemberFiscal Year
Maturities 2020 2019
Payable in Other Currencies
Eurobonds 2.0% 2020 — 327.0 
Eurobonds 0.375% 2021 410.3 381.5 
Eurobonds 1.0% 2025 351.7 327.0 
Eurobonds 0.50% 2028 586.2 — 
Eurobonds 0.80% 2032 586.2 — 
Other 2023 0.6 3.8 
Related Party
Chinese Renminbi 5.5% 2021 to 2027 338.5 357.9 
Capital Lease Obligations (weighted average rate)
Foreign 10.9% 2021 to 2036 9.2 10.1 
Total Principal Amount 7,950.2 3,274.8 
Less: Unamortized discount and debt issuance costs (55.8) (12.2)
Less: Fair value hedge accounting adjustments 5.7 5.2 
Total Long-term Debt 7,900.1 3,267.8 
Less: Current portion of long-term debt (470.0) (40.4)
Less: Long-term debt – related party (297.2) (320.1)
Long-term Debt $7,132.9 $2,907.3 
We have entered into LIBOR-based interest rate swap arrangements with various counterparty financial institutions on the
3.0% Senior Note maturing in fiscal year 2022. These interest rate swaps have been designated as fair value hedges of the
Note. Refer to Note 13, Financial Instruments , for additional information.
Maturities of long-term debt, including principal amounts owed to related parties, in each of the next five years and
thereafter are as follows:
2021 $470.4 
2022 441.7 
2023 456.3 
2024 456.4 
2025 415.8 
Thereafter 5,709.6 
Total $7,950.2 
Various debt agreements to which we are a party include financial covenants and other restrictions, including
restrictions pertaining to the ability to create property liens and enter into certain sale and leaseback transactions. As of
30 September 2020, we are in compliance with all the financial and other covenants under our debt agreements.
There were no additional commitments maintained by our foreign subsidiaries as of 30 September 2020.
Cash paid for interest, net of amounts capitalized, was $67.2, $155.9, and $123.1 in fiscal years 2020, 2019, and 2018,
respectively.
Credit Agreement
We have a $2,300 five-year revolving credit agreement maturing 31 March 2022 with a syndicate of banks (the “Credit
Agreement”). Under the Credit Agreement, senior unsecured debt is available to us and certain of our subsidiaries. The
Credit Agreement provides us a source of liquidity and supports our commercial paper program. Our only financial
covenant under the Credit Agreement is a maximum ratio of total debt to total capitalization, or total debt plus total
equity, no greater than 70%. No borrowings were outstanding under the Credit Agreement as of 30 September 2020.(A)
(A)
90
Table of Contents
16. RETIREMENT BENEFITS
We and certain of our subsidiaries sponsor defined benefit pension plans and defined contribution plans that cover a
substantial portion of our worldwide employees. The principal defined benefit pension plans are the U.S. salaried
pension plan and the U.K. pension plan. These plans were closed to new participants in 2005, after which defined
contribution plans were offered to new employees. The principal defined contribution plan is the Retirement Savings
Plan, in which a substantial portion of the U.S. employees participate. A similar plan is offered to U.K. employees. We
also provide other postretirement benefits consisting primarily of healthcare benefits to U.S. retirees who meet age and
service requirements.
Defined Benefit Pension Plans
Pension benefits earned are generally based on years of service and compensation during active employment. The
components of net periodic benefit cost for our defined benefit pension plans for fiscal years 2020, 2019, and 2018
were as follows:
2020 2019 2018
Year Ended 30 September U.S.International U.S.International U.S.International
Service cost $23.4 $23.3 $21.4 $19.3 $25.5 $25.5 
Interest cost 91.2 24.8 113.4 35.8 107.2 37.3 
Expected return on plan assets (188.7) (77.4) (172.5) (75.1) (201.6) (81.7)
Prior service cost amortization 1.2 — 1.1 — 1.6 — 
Actuarial loss amortization 83.7 19.5 65.3 10.9 87.4 40.2 
Settlements 5.0 0.2 6.2 0.2 45.0 3.5 
Special termination benefits — — 0.7 0.1 0.4 — 
Other — 0.8 — 0.8 — 1.5 
Net Periodic (Benefit) Cost $15.8 ($8.8) $35.6 ($8.0) $65.5 $26.3 
Our service costs are primarily included within "Cost of sales" and "Selling and administrative" on our consolidated
income statements. The amount of service costs capitalized in fiscal years 2020, 2019 and 2018 were not material. The
non-service related costs, including pension settlement losses, are presented outside operating income within "Other
non-operating income (expense), net."
During the fourth quarter of fiscal year 2018, we recognized a pension settlement loss of $43.7 primarily in connection
with the transfer of certain pension assets and payment obligations for our U.S. salaried and hourly plans to an insurer
through the purchase of an irrevocable, nonparticipating group annuity contract. The transaction does not change the
amount of the monthly pension benefits received by affected retirees.
Certain of our pension plans provide for a lump sum benefit payment option at the time of retirement, or for corporate
officers, six months after their retirement date. A participant’s vested benefit is considered settled upon cash payment of
the lump sum. We recognize pension settlement losses when cash payments exceed the sum of the service and
interest cost components of net periodic benefit cost of the plan for the fiscal year. We recognized pension settlement
losses of $5.0, $6.2 and $5.2 in fiscal years 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively, to accelerate recognition of a portion of
actuarial losses deferred in accumulated other comprehensive loss, primarily associated with the U.S. supplementary
pension plan.
91
Table of Contents
We calculate net periodic benefit cost for a given fiscal year based on assumptions developed at the end of the
previous fiscal year. The following table sets forth the weighted average assumptions used in the calculation of net
periodic benefit cost:
 2020 2019 2018
  U.S.International U.S. International U.S. International
Discount rate – Service cost 3.3 % 1.5 % 4.3 % 2.5 % 3.9 % 2.6 %
Discount rate – Interest cost 2.9 % 1.3 % 4.0 % 2.2 % 3.3 % 2.2 %
Expected return on plan
assets 7.0 % 5.0 % 7.0 % 5.3 % 7.5 % 5.8 %
Rate of compensation
increase 3.5 % 3.3 % 3.5 % 3.5 % 3.5 % 3.6 %
The projected benefit obligation ("PBO") is the actuarial present value of benefits attributable to employee service
rendered to date, including the effects of estimated future salary increases. The following table sets forth the weighted
average assumptions used in the calculation of the PBO:
2020 2019
U.S. International U.S. International
Discount rate 2.7 % 1.5 % 3.2 % 1.5 %
Rate of compensation increase 3.5 % 3.3 % 3.5 % 3.3 %
The following tables reflect the change in the PBO and the change in the fair value of plan assets based on the plan
year measurement date, as well as the amounts recognized in the consolidated balance sheets:
2020 2019
U.S.International U.S. International
Change in Projected Benefit Obligation
Obligation at beginning of year $3,281.6 $1,864.0 $2,922.8 $1,660.5 
Service cost 23.4 23.3 21.4 19.3 
Interest cost 91.2 24.8 113.4 35.8 
Amendments 1.6 — 1.1 4.7 
Actuarial loss (gain) 190.5 (11.6) 380.3 300.2 
Settlements (11.7) (0.9) (12.2) (1.6)
Special termination benefits — — 0.7 0.1 
Participant contributions — 1.2 — 1.3 
Benefits paid (152.5) (49.8) (146.2) (47.7)
Currency translation and other (0.3) 98.7 0.3 (108.6)
Obligation at End of Year $3,423.8 $1,949.7 $3,281.6 $1,864.0 
2020 2019
U.S.International U.S. International
Change in Plan Assets
Fair value at beginning of year $2,832.4 $1,672.4 $2,684.9 $1,588.2 
Actual return on plan assets 364.6 (3.1) 289.9 208.0 
Company contributions 15.5 22.0 16.0 24.2 
Participant contributions — 1.2 — 1.3 
Benefits paid (152.5) (49.8) (146.2) (47.7)
Settlements (11.7) (0.9) (12.2) (1.6)
Currency translation and other — 85.0 — (100.0)
Fair Value at End of Year $3,048.3 $1,726.8 $2,832.4 $1,672.4 
Funded Status at End of Year ($375.5) ($222.9) ($449.2) ($191.6)
92
Table of Contents
2020 2019
U.S.International U.S. International
Amounts Recognized
Noncurrent assets $26.5 $— $17.3 $11.4 
Accrued liabilities 10.5 0.2 18.3 — 
Noncurrent liabilities 391.5 222.7 448.2 203.0 
Net Liability Recognized $375.5 $222.9 $449.2 $191.6 
The changes in plan assets and benefit obligation that have been recognized in other comprehensive income on a
pretax basis during fiscal years 2020 and 2019 consist of the following:
2020 2019
U.S.International U.S. International
Net actuarial loss arising during the period $14.6 $68.9 $262.9 $161.5 
Amortization of net actuarial loss (88.7) (19.7) (71.5) (11.1)
Prior service cost arising during the period 1.6 — 1.1 4.7 
Amortization of prior service cost (1.2) — (1.1) — 
Total ($73.7) $49.2 $191.4 $155.1 
The net actuarial loss represents the actual changes in the estimated obligation and plan assets that have not yet been
recognized in the consolidated income statements and are included in accumulated other comprehensive loss.
Actuarial losses arising during fiscal year 2020 are primarily attributable to lower discount rates, partially offset by
higher than expected return on plan assets. Accumulated actuarial gains and losses that exceed a corridor are
amortized over the average remaining service period of U.S. participants, which was approximately seven years as of
30 September 2020. For U.K. participants, accumulated actuarial gains and losses that exceed a corridor are amortized
over the average remaining life expectancy, which was approximately twenty-five years as of 30 September 2020.
The components recognized in accumulated other comprehensive loss on a pretax basis at 30 September consisted of
the following:
2020 2019
U.S.International U.S. International
Net actuarial loss $797.7 $643.2 $871.8 $594.0 
Prior service cost (credit) 7.0 3.6 6.6 3.6 
Net transition liability — 0.4 — 0.4 
Total $804.7 $647.2 $878.4 $598.0 
The accumulated benefit obligation ("ABO") is the actuarial present value of benefits attributed to employee service
rendered to a particular date, based on current salaries. The ABO for all defined benefit pension plans was $5,166.5
and $4,931.6 as of 30 September 2020 and 2019, respectively.
93
Table of Contents
The following table provides information on pension plans where the benefit liability exceeds the value of plan assets:
2020 2019
30 September U.S.International U.S.International
Pension Plans with PBO in Excess of Plan Assets:
PBO $3,202.2 $1,949.7 $3,069.2 $521.1 
Fair value of plan assets 2,800.3 1,726.7 2,602.8 318.0 
PBO in excess of plan assets $401.9 $223.0 $466.4 $203.1 
Pension Plans with ABO in Excess of Plan Assets:
ABO $3,081.4 $475.8 $2,941.2 $413.3 
Fair value of plan assets 2,800.3 324.4 2,602.8 266.5 
ABO in excess of plan assets $281.1 $151.4 $338.4 $146.8 
The tables above include several pension arrangements that are not funded because of jurisdictional practice. The
ABO and PBO related to these plans as of 30 September 2020 were $86.6 and $91.7, respectively. As of 30
September 2019, the U.K. pension plan had plan assets in excess of both PBO and ABO and was therefore not
included in the table above. As of 30 September 2020, the PBO of this plan exceeded the fair value of plan assets,
resulting in an increase to the International balances.
Pension Plan Assets
Our pension plan investment strategy is to invest in diversified portfolios to earn a long-term return consistent with
acceptable risk in order to pay retirement benefits and meet regulatory funding requirements while minimizing company
cash contributions over time. De-risking strategies are also employed for closed plans as funding improves, generally
resulting in higher allocations to long duration bonds. The plans invest primarily in passive and actively managed equity
and debt securities. Equity investments are diversified geographically and by investment style and market
capitalization. Fixed income investments include sovereign, corporate and asset-backed securities generally
denominated in the currency of the plan.
Asset allocation targets are established based on the long-term return, volatility and correlation characteristics of the
asset classes, the profiles of the plans’ liabilities, and acceptable levels of risk. Assets are routinely rebalanced through
contributions, benefit payments, and otherwise as deemed appropriate. The actual and target allocations at the
measurement date are as follows:
2020 Target Allocation 2020 Actual Allocation 2019 Actual Allocation
U.S. International U.S. International U.S. International
Asset Category
Equity securities 42 - 57% 40 - 49% 51 % 43 % 38 % 42 %
Debt securities 35 - 50% 51 - 60% 43 % 56 % 56 % 57 %
Real estate and
other — - 10% — % 5 % — % 6 % — %
Cash — % — % 1 % 1 % — % 1 %
Total 100 % 100 % 100 % 100 %
In fiscal year 2020, the 7.0% expected return for U.S. plan assets was based on a weighted average of estimated long-
term returns of major asset classes and the historical performance of plan assets. The estimated long-term return for
equity, debt securities, and real estate is 7.6%, 5.1%, and 6.5%, respectively. In determining asset class returns, we
take into account historical long-term returns and the value of active management, as well as other economic and
market factors.
In fiscal year 2020, the 5.0% expected rate of return for international plan assets was based on a weighted average
return for plans outside the U.S., which vary significantly in size, asset structure and expected returns. The expected
asset return for the U.K. plan, which represents over 80% of the assets of our International plans, is 5.7% and was
derived from expected equity and debt security returns of 7.3% and 1.8%, respectively.
94
Table of Contents
The following table summarizes pension plan assets measured at fair value by asset class (see Note 14, Fair Value
Measurements, for definition of the levels):
2020 2019
30 September TotalLevel 1 Level 2Level 3 TotalLevel 1 Level 2Level 3
U.S. Qualified Pension Plans
Cash and cash equivalents $16.9 $16.9 $— $— $13.7 $13.7 $— $— 
Equity securities 573.9 573.9 — — 401.1 401.1 — — 
Equity mutual funds 213.1 213.1 — — 152.9 152.9 — — 
Equity pooled funds 762.0 — 762.0 — 524.8 — 524.8 — 
Fixed income:
Bonds (government
and corporate) 1,312.7 — 1,312.7 — 1,572.1 — 1,572.1 — 
Total U.S. Qualified Pension
Plans at Fair Value $2,878.6 $803.9 $2,074.7 $— $2,664.6 $567.7 $2,096.9 $— 
Real estate pooled funds 169.7 167.8 
Total U.S. Qualified Pension
Plans $3,048.3 $2,832.4 
International Pension Plans
Cash and cash equivalents $13.9 $13.9 $— $— $13.4 $13.4 $— $— 
Equity pooled funds 746.8 — 746.8 — 711.3 — 711.3 — 
Fixed income pooled funds 694.1 — 694.1 — 679.9 — 679.9 — 
Other pooled funds 15.5 — 15.5 — 13.7 — 13.7 — 
Insurance contracts 256.5 — — 256.5 254.1 — — 254.1 
Total International Pension
Plans $1,726.8 $13.9 $1,456.4 $256.5 $1,672.4 $13.4 $1,404.9 $254.1 
Real estate pooled funds consist of funds that invest in properties. These funds generally allow for quarterly redemption with 30
days' notice. Timing for redemption could be delayed based on the priority of our request and the availability of funds. Interests
in these funds are valued using the net asset value ("NA V") per share practical expedient and are not classified in the fair value
hierarchy .
The following table summarizes changes in fair value of the pension plan assets classified as Level 3, which comprised
of investments in insurance contracts:
Balance at 30 September 2018 $217.7 
Actual return on plan assets:
Assets held at end of year 38.1 
Purchases, sales, and settlements, net (1.7)
Balance at 30 September 2019 $254.1 
Actual return on plan assets:
Assets held at end of year 2.4 
Balance at 30 September 2020 $256.5 (A)
(A)
95
Table of Contents
The descriptions and fair value methodologies for the U.S. and International pension plan assets are as follows:
Cash and Cash Equivalents
The carrying amounts of cash and cash equivalents approximate fair value due to the short-term maturity.
Equity Securities
Equity securities are valued at the closing market price reported on a U.S. or international exchange where the security
is actively traded and are therefore classified as Level 1 assets.
Equity Mutual and Pooled Funds
Shares of mutual funds are valued at the NAV of the fund and are classified as Level 1 assets. Units of pooled funds
are valued at the per unit NAV determined by the fund manager based on the value of the underlying traded holdings
and are classified as Level 2 assets.
Corporate and Government Bonds
Corporate and government bonds are classified as Level 2 assets, as they are either valued at quoted market prices
from observable pricing sources at the reporting date or valued based upon comparable securities with similar yields
and credit ratings.
Other Pooled Funds
Other pooled funds classified as Level 2 assets are valued at the NAV of the shares held at year end, which is based
on the fair value of the underlying investments.
Insurance Contracts
Insurance contracts are classified as Level 3 assets, as they are carried at contract value, which approximates the
estimated fair value. The estimated fair value is based on the fair value of the underlying investment of the insurance
company and discount rates that require inputs with limited observability.
Contributions and Projected Benefit Payments
Pension contributions to funded plans and benefit payments for unfunded plans for fiscal year 2020 were $37.5.
Contributions for funded plans resulted primarily from contractual and regulatory requirements. Benefit payments to
unfunded plans were due primarily to the timing of retirements. We anticipate contributing $45 to $55 to the defined
benefit pension plans in fiscal year 2021. These contributions are anticipated to be driven primarily by contractual and
regulatory requirements for funded plans and benefit payments for unfunded plans, which are dependent upon timing of
retirements.
Projected benefit payments, which reflect expected future service, are as follows:
U.S. International
2021 $163.7 $52.0 
2022 165.2 52.8 
2023 169.8 56.9 
2024 174.0 60.2 
2025 177.9 59.9 
2026-2030 932.6 334.4 
These estimated benefit payments are based on assumptions about future events. Actual benefit payments may vary
significantly from these estimates.
U.K. Lloyds Equalization Ruling
On 26 October 2018, the United Kingdom High Court issued a ruling related to the equalization of pension plan
participants’ benefits for the gender effects of Guaranteed Minimum Pensions. As a result of this ruling, we estimated
the impact of retroactively increasing benefits in our U.K. plan in accordance with the High Court ruling. We treated the
additional benefits as a prior service cost, which resulted in an increase to our projected benefit obligation and
accumulated other comprehensive loss of $4.7 during the first quarter of fiscal year 2019. We are amortizing this cost
over the average remaining life expectancy of the U.K. participants.
96
Table of Contents
Defined Contribution Plans
We maintain a non-leveraged employee stock ownership plan ("ESOP") which forms part of the Air Products and
Chemicals, Inc. Retirement Savings Plan ("RSP"). The ESOP was established in May of 2002. The balance of the RSP
is a qualified defined contribution plan including a 401(k) elective deferral component. A substantial portion of U.S.
employees are eligible and participate.
We treat dividends paid on ESOP shares as ordinary dividends. Under existing tax law, we may deduct dividends which
are paid with respect to shares held by the plan. Shares of our common stock in the ESOP totaled 2,001,152 as of 30
September 2020.
Our contributions to the RSP include a Company core contribution for certain eligible employees who do not receive
their primary retirement benefit from the defined benefit pension plans, with the core contribution based on a
percentage of pay that is dependent on years of service. For the RSP, we also make matching contributions on overall
employee contributions as a percentage of the employee contribution and include an enhanced contribution for certain
eligible employees that do not participate in the defined benefit pension plans. Worldwide contributions expensed to
income in fiscal years 2020, 2019, and 2018 were $45.6, $40.6, and $34.2, respectively.
Other Postretirement Benefits
We provide other postretirement benefits consisting primarily of healthcare benefits to certain U.S. retirees who meet
age and service requirements. The healthcare benefit is a continued medical benefit until the retiree reaches age 65.
Healthcare benefits are contributory, with contributions adjusted periodically. The retiree medical costs are capped at a
specified dollar amount, with the retiree contributing the remainder. The cost of these benefits were not material in fiscal
years 2020, 2019, and 2018. Accumulated postretirement benefit obligations as of the end of fiscal years 2020 and
2019 were $38.6 and $43.7, respectively, of which $7.2 and $7.7 were current obligations, respectively.
We recognize changes in other postretirement benefit plan obligations in other comprehensive income on a pretax
basis. In fiscal years 2020 and 2019, we recognized gains that arose during the period of $1.3 and $6.1, respectively.
There was no net actuarial loss amortization in fiscal years 2020 and 2019 as the corridor for the plan was not
exceeded.
The net actuarial gain/loss recognized in accumulated other comprehensive loss on a pretax basis was a net gain of
$3.0 and $1.7 as of 30 September 2020 and 2019, respectively.
17. COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
Litigation
We are involved in various legal proceedings, including commercial, competition, environmental, intellectual property,
regulatory, product liability, and insurance matters. In September 2010, the Brazilian Administrative Council for
Economic Defense ("CADE") issued a decision against our Brazilian subsidiary, Air Products Brasil Ltda., and several
other Brazilian industrial gas companies for alleged anticompetitive activities. CADE imposed a civil fine of R$179.2
million (approximately $32 at 30 September 2020) on Air Products Brasil Ltda. This fine was based on a
recommendation by a unit of the Brazilian Ministry of Justice, whose investigation began in 2003, alleging violation of
competition laws with respect to the sale of industrial and medical gases. The fines are based on a percentage of our
total revenue in Brazil in 2003.
We have denied the allegations made by the authorities and filed an appeal in October 2010 with the Brazilian courts.
On 6 May 2014, our appeal was granted and the fine against Air Products Brasil Ltda. was dismissed. CADE has
appealed that ruling and the matter remains pending. We, with advice of our outside legal counsel, have assessed the
status of this matter and have concluded that, although an adverse final judgment after exhausting all appeals is
possible, such a judgment is not probable. As a result, no provision has been made in the consolidated financial
statements. We estimate the maximum possible loss to be the full amount of the fine of R$179.2 million (approximately
$32 at 30 September 2020) plus interest accrued thereon until final disposition of the proceedings.
We do not currently believe there are any legal proceedings, individually or in the aggregate, that are reasonably
possible to have a material impact on our financial condition, results of operations, or cash flows.
97
Table of Contents
Environmental
In the normal course of business, we are involved in legal proceedings under the Comprehensive Environmental
Response, Compensation, and Liability Act ("CERCLA," the federal Superfund law), Resource Conservation and
Recovery Act ("RCRA"), and similar state and foreign environmental laws relating to the designation of certain sites for
investigation or remediation. Presently, there are 31 sites on which a final settlement has not been reached where we,
along with others, have been designated a potentially responsible party by the Environmental Protection Agency or are
otherwise engaged in investigation or remediation, including cleanup activity at certain of our current and former
manufacturing sites. We continually monitor these sites for which we have environmental exposure.
Accruals for environmental loss contingencies are recorded when it is probable that a liability has been incurred and the
amount of loss can be reasonably estimated. The consolidated balance sheets at 30 September 2020 and 2019
included an accrual of $84.7 and $68.9, respectively, primarily as part of other noncurrent liabilities. The environmental
liabilities will be paid over a period of up to 30 years. We estimate the exposure for environmental loss contingencies to
range from $84 to a reasonably possible upper exposure of $98 as of 30 September 2020.
Actual costs to be incurred at identified sites in future periods may vary from the estimates, given inherent uncertainties
in evaluating environmental exposures. Using reasonably possible alternative assumptions of the exposure level could
result in an increase to the environmental accrual. Due to the inherent uncertainties related to environmental
exposures, a significant increase to the reasonably possible upper exposure level could occur if a new site is
designated, the scope of remediation is increased, a different remediation alternative is identified, or a significant
increase in our proportionate share occurs. We do not expect that any sum we may have to pay in connection with
environmental matters in excess of the amounts recorded or disclosed above would have a material adverse impact on
our financial position or results of operations in any one year.
Pace
At 30 September 2020, $42.2 of the environmental accrual was related to the Pace facility.
In 2006, we sold our Amines business, which included operations at Pace, Florida, and recognized a liability for
retained environmental obligations associated with remediation activities at Pace. We are required by the Florida
Department of Environmental Protection ("FDEP") and the United States Environmental Protection Agency
("USEPA") to continue our remediation efforts. We recognized a before-tax expense of $42 in fiscal year 2006 in results
from discontinued operations and recorded an environmental accrual of $42 in continuing operations on the
consolidated balance sheets.
During the second quarter of fiscal year 2020, we completed an updated cost review of the environmental remediation
status at the Pace facility. The review was completed in conjunction with requirements to maintain financial assurance
per the Consent Order issued by the FDEP and the USEPA discussed below. Based on our review, we expect ongoing
activities to continue for 30 years. Additionally, we will require near-term spending to install new groundwater recovery
wells and piping, in addition to future capital to consider the extended time horizon for remediation at the site. As a
result of these changes, we increased our environmental accrual for this site by $19 in continuing operations on the
consolidated balance sheets and recognized a pre-tax expense of $19 in results from discontinued operations in the
second quarter of fiscal year 2020.
We have implemented many of the remedial corrective measures at the Pace facility required under 1995 Consent
Orders issued by the FDEP and the USEPA. Contaminated soils have been bioremediated, and the treated soils have
been secured in a lined on-site corrective action management unit. Several groundwater recovery systems have been
installed to contain and remove contamination from groundwater. We completed an extensive assessment of the site to
determine the efficacy of existing measures, what additional corrective measures may be needed, and whether newer
remediation technologies that were not available in the 1990s might be suitable to more quickly and effectively
remediate groundwater. Based on assessment results, we completed a focused feasibility study that has identified
alternative approaches that may more effectively remove contaminants. We continue to review alternative remedial
approaches with the FDEP and have started additional field work to support the design of an improved groundwater
recovery network with the objective of targeting areas of higher contaminant concentration and avoiding areas of high
groundwater iron which has proven to be a significant operability issue for the project. In the first quarter of 2015, we
entered into a new Consent Order with the FDEP requiring us to continue our remediation efforts at the Pace facility,
along with the completion of a cost review every 5 years. In the second quarter of fiscal year 2020, we completed an
updated cost review which resulted in a change in assumptions regarding future operating costs as discussed above.
The costs we are incurring based on the fiscal year 2020 review are higher than our previous estimates.
98
Table of Contents
Piedmont
At 30 September 2020, $13.3 of the environmental accrual was related to the Piedmont site.
On 30 June 2008, we sold our Elkton, Maryland, and Piedmont, South Carolina, production facilities and the related
North American atmospheric emulsions and global pressure sensitive adhesives businesses. In connection with the
sale, we recognized a liability for retained environmental obligations associated with remediation activities at the
Piedmont site. This site is under active remediation for contamination caused by an insolvent prior owner.
We are required by the South Carolina Department of Health and Environmental Control ("SCDHEC") to address both
contaminated soil and groundwater. Numerous areas of soil contamination have been addressed, and contaminated
groundwater is being recovered and treated. The SCDHEC issued its final approval to the site-wide feasibility study on
13 June 2017 and the Record of Decision for the site on 27 June 2018. Field work has started to support the remedial
design, and in the fourth quarter of fiscal year 2018, we signed a Consent Agreement Amendment memorializing our
obligations to complete the cleanup of the site. We estimate that source area remediation and groundwater recovery
and treatment will continue through 2029. Thereafter, we expect this site to go into a state of monitored natural
attenuation through 2047.
We recognized a before-tax expense of $24 in 2008 as a component of income from discontinued operations and
recorded an environmental liability of $24 in continuing operations on the consolidated balance sheets. There have
been no significant changes to the estimated exposure.
Pasadena
At 30 September 2020, $11.5 of the environmental accrual was related to the Pasadena site.
During the fourth quarter of 2012, management committed to permanently shutting down our polyurethane
intermediates ("PUI") production facility in Pasadena, Texas. In shutting down and dismantling the facility, we have
undertaken certain obligations related to soil and groundwater contaminants. We have been pumping and treating
groundwater to control off-site contaminant migration in compliance with regulatory requirements and under the
approval of the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality ("TCEQ"). We estimate that the pump and treat system
will continue to operate until 2042.
We plan to perform additional work to address other environmental obligations at the site. This additional work includes
remediating, as required, impacted soils, investigating groundwater west of the former PUI facility, performing post
closure care for two closed RCRA surface impoundment units, and establishing engineering controls. In 2012, we
estimated the total exposure at this site to be $13. There have been no significant changes to the estimated exposure.
99
Table of Contents
Asset Retirement Obligations
Our asset retirement obligations are primarily associated with long-term on-site supply contracts under which we have
built a facility on land owned by the customer and are obligated to remove the facility at the end of the contract term.
The retirement of assets includes the contractually required removal of a long-lived asset from service and
encompasses the sale, removal, abandonment, recycling, or disposal of the assets as required at the end of the
contract term. These obligations are primarily reflected within "Other noncurrent liabilities" on the consolidated balance
sheets. The timing and/or method of settlement of these obligations are conditional on a future event that may or may
not be within our control.
Changes to the carrying amount of our asset retirement obligations were as follows:
Balance at 30 September 2018 $190.4 
Additional accruals 14.7 
Liabilities settled (2.1)
Accretion expense 8.7 
Currency translation adjustment (3.5)
Balance at 30 September 2019 $208.2 
Additional accruals 22.0 
Liabilities settled (2.8)
Accretion expense 9.5 
Currency translation adjustment 4.5 
Balance at 30 September 2020 $241.4 
Guarantees and Warranties
We guaranteed the repayment of our 25% share of an equity bridge loan that has been provided to fund equity
commitments to a joint venture arrangement with ACWA Holding in Saudi Arabia. ACWA also guarantees their share of
the loan. Our maximum exposure under the guarantee, which expires in 2021, is approximately $100. As of 30
September 2020, our consolidated balance sheets included $94.4 reflected within "Payables and accrued liabilities" for
our obligation to make future equity contributions in 2021 based on our proportionate share of the advances received
by the joint venture under the loan.
Air Products has also entered into a long-term sale of equipment contract with the joint venture to engineer, procure,
and construct the industrial gas facilities that will supply gases to Saudi Aramco. We provided bank guarantees to the
joint venture to support our performance under the contract. As of 30 September 2020, our maximum potential
payments were $247. Exposures under the guarantees will be extinguished after completion of the project.
We are party to an equity support agreement and operations guarantee related to an air separation facility constructed
in Trinidad for a venture in which we own 50%. At 30 September 2020, maximum potential payments under joint and
several guarantees were $25.0. Exposures under the guarantees decline over time and will be completely extinguished
by 2024.
To date, no equity contributions or payments have been made since the inception of these guarantees. The fair value of
the above guarantees is not material.
We, in the normal course of business operations, have issued product warranties related to equipment sales. Also,
contracts often contain standard terms and conditions which typically include a warranty and indemnification to the
buyer that the goods and services purchased do not infringe on third-party intellectual property rights. The provision for
estimated future costs relating to warranties is not material to the consolidated financial statements.
We do not expect that any sum we may have to pay in connection with guarantees and warranties will have a material
adverse effect on our consolidated financial condition, liquidity, or results of operations.
100
Table of Contents
Unconditional Purchase Obligations
We are obligated to make future payments under unconditional purchase obligations as summarized below:
2021 $1,460 
2022 460 
2023 450 
2024 455 
2025 454 
Thereafter 6,277 
Total $9,556 
Approximately $7.9 billion of our unconditional purchase obligations relate to helium and rare gases. The majority of
these obligations occur after fiscal year 2025. Helium purchases include crude feedstock supply to helium refining
plants in North America as well as refined helium purchases from sources around the world. As a rare byproduct of
natural gas production in the energy sector, these helium sourcing agreements are medium- to long-term and contain
take-if-tendered provisions. The refined helium is distributed globally and sold as a merchant gas, primarily under
medium-term requirements contracts. While contract terms in our helium sourcing contracts are generally longer than
our customer sales contracts, helium is a rare gas used in applications with few or no substitutions because of its
unique physical and chemical properties.
We estimate our maximum obligation for future purchases of plant and equipment to be approximately $1.0 billion
based on open purchase orders as of 30 September 2020. Although open purchase orders are considered enforceable
and legally binding, the terms generally allow us the option to reschedule, cancel, or otherwise modify based on our
business needs. We have disclosed this obligation in fiscal year 2021; however, timing of actual satisfaction of the
obligation may vary.
Our unconditional purchase obligations also include commitments for power and natural gas supply as well as
feedstock supply or numerous HyCO (hydrogen, carbon monoxide, and syngas) facilities. Our long-term sales
contracts to customers are generally matched to the term of these obligations and provide recovery of price increases.
As a result, we do not believe these purchase obligations would have a material effect on our financial condition or
results of operations.
18. CAPIT AL STOCK
Common Stock
Authorized common stock consists of 300 million shares with a par value of $1 per share. As of 30 September 2020,
249 million shares were issued, with 221 million outstanding.
On 15 September 2011, the Board of Directors authorized the repurchase of up to $1.0 billion of our outstanding
common stock. We repurchase shares pursuant to Rules 10b5-1 and 10b-18 under the Securities Exchange Act of
1934, as amended, through repurchase agreements established with several brokers. We did not purchase any of our
outstanding shares during fiscal year 2020. At 30 September 2020, $485.3 in share repurchase authorization remains.
A summary of the changes in common shares in fiscal year 2020 is presented below:
Year Ended 30 September 2020 2019 2018
Number of common shares outstanding, beginning of year 220,415,262 219,515,245 218,346,074 
Issuance of treasury shares for stock option and award plans 602,197 900,017 1,169,171 
Number of common shares outstanding, end of year 221,017,459 220,415,262 219,515,245 
Preferred Stock
Authorized preferred stock consisted of 25 million shares with a par value of $1 per share, of which 2.5 million were
designated as Series A Junior Participating Preferred Stock. There were no preferred shares issued or outstanding as
of 30 September 2020 and 2019.
101
Table of Contents
19. SHARE-BASED COMPENSA TION
We have various share-based compensation programs, which include deferred stock units, stock options, and
restricted stock. During the fiscal year ended 30 September 2020, we granted market-based and time-based deferred
stock units. Under all programs, the terms of the awards are fixed at the grant date. We issue shares from treasury
stock upon the payout of deferred stock units, the exercise of stock options, and the issuance of restricted stock
awards. As of 30 September 2020, there were 4,341,614 shares available for future grant under our Long-Term
Incentive Plan ("LTIP"), which is shareholder approved.
Share-based compensation cost recognized in the consolidated income statements is summarized below:
2020 2019 2018
Before-tax share-based compensation cost $55.8 $41.2 $38.8 
Income tax benefit (13.0) (9.7) (9.1)
After-tax share-based compensation cost $42.8 $31.5 $29.7 
Before-tax share-based compensation cost is primarily included in "Selling and administrative expense" on our
consolidated income statements. The amount of share-based compensation cost capitalized in fiscal years 2020, 2019,
and 2018 was not material.
Before-tax share-based compensation cost by type of program was as follows:
2020 2019 2018
Deferred stock units $55.8 $41.1 $38.3 
Stock options — — 0.2 
Restricted stock — 0.1 0.3 
Before-tax share-based compensation cost $55.8 $41.2 $38.8 
Deferred Stock Units
We have granted deferred stock units to executives, selected employees, and outside directors. These deferred stock
units entitle the recipient to one share of common stock upon vesting, which is conditioned, for employee recipients, on
continued employment during the deferral period and may be conditioned on achieving certain performance targets.
We grant deferred stock unit awards with a two- to five-year deferral period that is subject to payout upon death,
disability, or retirement. Deferred stock units issued to outside directors are paid after service on the Board of Directors
ends at the time elected by the director (not to exceed 10 years after service ends). We generally expense the grant-
date fair value of these awards on a straight-line basis over the vesting period; however, expense recognition is
accelerated for retirement eligible individuals who meet the requirements for vesting upon retirement. We have elected
to account for forfeitures as they occur, rather than to estimate them. Forfeitures have not been significant historically.
Market-based deferred stock units vest as long as the employee continues to be employed by the Company and upon
the achievement of the performance target. The performance target, which is approved by the Compensation
Committee, is our share price appreciation and dividends paid, or "total shareholder return," in relation to a defined
peer group over a three-year performance period beginning 1 October of the fiscal year of grant. We granted 80,215,
114,929, and 105,268 market-based deferred stock units in fiscal years 2020, 2019, and 2018, respectively.
102
Table of Contents
The fair value of market-based deferred stock units was estimated using a Monte Carlo simulation model as these
equity awards are tied to a market condition. The model utilizes multiple input variables that determine the probability of
satisfying the market condition stipulated in the grant and calculates the fair value of the awards. We generally expense
the grant-date fair value of these awards on a straight-line basis over the vesting period. The estimated grant-date fair
value of market-based deferred stock units was $275.19, $229.61, and $202.50 per unit in fiscal years 2020, 2019, and
2018, respectively. The calculation of the fair value of these market-based deferred stock units used the following
assumptions:
2020 2019 2018
Expected volatility 17.8 % 17.5 % 18.7 %
Risk-free interest rate 1.6 % 2.8 % 1.9 %
Expected dividend yield 2.4 % 2.6 % 2.6 %
In addition, we granted 123,448 time-based deferred stock units at a weighted average grant-date fair value of $230.92.
In fiscal years 2019 and 2018, we granted 169,666 and 143,379 time-based deferred stock units at a weighted average
grant-date fair value of and $168.68 and $162.11, respectively.
A summary of deferred stock unit activity in fiscal year 2020 is presented below:
Shares (000)Weighted Average
Grant-
Date Fair Value
Deferred stock units outstanding at 30 September 2019 976 $156.31 
Granted 203 252.53 
Paid out (300) 141.08 
Forfeited/adjustments 47 131.35 
Deferred stock units outstanding at 30 September 2020 926 $181.14 
Cash payments made for deferred stock units totaled $4.8, $1.9, and $2.2 in fiscal years 2020, 2019, and 2018,
respectively. As of 30 September 2020, there was $52.7 of unrecognized compensation cost related to deferred stock
units. This cost is expected to be recognized over a weighted average period of 2.0 years. The total fair value of
deferred stock units paid out during fiscal years 2020, 2019, and 2018, including shares vested in prior periods, was
$65.4, $19.2, and $38.5, respectively.
Stock Options
We have granted awards of options to purchase common stock to executives and selected employees. The exercise
price of stock options equals the market price of our stock on the date of the grant. Options generally vest incrementally
over three years and remain exercisable for ten years from the date of grant. We have not issued stock option awards
since fiscal year 2015. As of 30 September 2020, there was no unrecognized compensation cost as all stock option
awards were fully vested.
A summary of stock option activity in fiscal year 2020 is presented below:
Shares (000)Weighted Average
Exercise Price
Stock options outstanding and exercisable at 30 September 2019 1,344 $93.75 
Exercised (403) 86.28 
Forfeited — — 
Stock options outstanding and exercisable at 30 September 2020 941 $96.95 
The weighted average remaining contractual term of stock options outstanding and exercisable at 30 September 2020
was 2.7 years. The aggregate intrinsic value of these stock options was $189, which represents the amount by which
our closing stock price of $297.86 as of 30 September 2020 exceeds the exercise price multiplied by the number of in-
the-money options outstanding or exercisable. The intrinsic value of stock options exercised during fiscal years 2020,
2019, and 2018 was $65.7, $87.2, and $90.4, respectively.
103
Table of Contents
Compensation cost is generally recognized over the stated vesting period consistent with the terms of the arrangement,
which is either on a straight-line or graded-vesting basis. Expense recognition is accelerated for retirement-eligible
individuals who would meet the requirements for vesting of awards upon their retirement.
Cash received from option exercises during fiscal year 2020 was $34.1. The total tax benefit realized from stock option
exercises in fiscal year 2020 was $15.4, of which $14.2 was the excess tax benefit.
Restricted Stock
The grant-date fair value of restricted stock is estimated on the date of grant based on the closing price of the stock,
and compensation cost is generally amortized to expense on a straight-line basis over the vesting period during which
employees perform related services. Expense recognition is accelerated for retirement-eligible individuals who would
meet the requirements for vesting of awards upon their retirement. We have elected to account for forfeitures as they
occur rather than to estimate them. Historically, forfeitures have not been significant.
We have issued shares of restricted stock to certain officers. Participants are entitled to cash dividends and to vote
their respective shares. Restrictions on shares lift in one to four years or upon the earlier of retirement, death, or
disability. The shares are nontransferable while subject to forfeiture.
A summary of restricted stock activity in fiscal year 2020 is presented below:
Shares (000)Weighted Average
Grant-
Date Fair Value
Restricted stock outstanding at 30 September 2019 26 $138.00 
Vested (26) 138.00 
Restricted stock outstanding at 30 September 2020 — $— 
As of 30 September 2020, there was no unrecognized compensation cost as all restricted stock awards were fully
vested. The total fair value of restricted stock vested during fiscal years 2020, 2019, and 2018 was $6.1, $2.6, and
$2.2, respectively.
104
Table of Contents
20. ACCUMULA TED OTHER COMPREHENSIVE LOSS
The table below summarizes changes in accumulated other comprehensive loss ("AOCL"), net of tax, attributable to Air
Products:
Derivatives
qualifying
as hedgesForeign
currency
translation
adjustmentsPension and
postretirement
benefits Total
Balance at 30 September 2017 ($53.1) ($787.1) ($1,007.2)($1,847.4)
Other comprehensive income (loss) before
reclassifications 45.9 (244.6) 179.4 (19.3)
Amounts reclassified from AOCL (30.4) 3.1 133.1 105.8 
Net current period other comprehensive income (loss) $15.5 ($241.5) $312.5 $86.5 
Amount attributable to noncontrolling interests — (18.8) (0.2) (19.0)
Balance at 30 September 2018 ($37.6) ($1,009.8) ($694.5)($1,741.9)
Other comprehensive loss before reclassifications (44.1) (356.2) (326.2) (726.5)
Amounts reclassified from AOCL 12.3 (2.6) 63.2 72.9 
Net current period other comprehensive loss ($31.8) ($358.8) ($263.0) ($653.6)
Amount attributable to noncontrolling interest (8.0) (11.7) (0.2) (19.9)
Balance at 30 September 2019 ($61.4) ($1,356.9) ($957.3)($2,375.6)
Other comprehensive income (loss) before
reclassifications 43.5 233.4 (68.2) 208.7 
Amounts reclassified from AOCL (57.7) — 82.5 24.8 
Net current period other comprehensive income (loss) ($14.2) $233.4 $14.3 $233.5 
Amount attributable to noncontrolling interest (21.1) 19.3 (0.2) (2.0)
Balance at 30 September 2020 ($54.5) ($1,142.8) ($942.8)($2,140.1)
The table below summarizes the reclassifications out of AOCL and the affected line item on the consolidated income
statements:
Year Ended 30 September 2020 2019 2018
(Gain) Loss on Cash Flow Hedges, net of tax
Sales/Cost of sales ($1.0) $0.6 $7.1 
Other income (expense), net — (3.0) (42.6)
Interest expense 2.8 14.7 5.1 
Other non-operating income (expense), net (59.5) — — 
Total (Gain) Loss on Cash Flow Hedges, net of tax ($57.7) $12.3 ($30.4)
Currency Translation Adjustment $— ($2.6) $3.1 
Pension and Postretirement Benefits, net of tax $82.5 $63.2 $133.1 
The fiscal year 2020 impact includes amortization of the excluded component and the ef fective portion of the related hedges.
The fiscal year 2019 impact relates to a net gain on the exchange of two equity af filiates with a joint venture partner . Refer to
Note 3, Acquisitions , for additional information. The fiscal year 2018 impact relates to an equipment sale resulting from the
termination of a contract in the Industrial Gases – Asia segment during the first quarter .
The components of net periodic benefit cost reclassified out of AOCL  include items such as prior service cost amortization,
actuarial loss amortization, and settlements and are included in “Other non-operating income (expense), net” on the
consolidated income statements. Refer to Note 16, Retirement Benefits , for additional information.(A)
(B)
(C)
(A)
(B)
(C)
105
Table of Contents
21. EARNINGS PER SHARE
The table below details the computation of basic and diluted earnings per share ("EPS"):
Year Ended 30 September 2020 2019 2018
Numerator
Net income from continuing operations $1,901.0 $1,760.0 $1,455.6 
Net (loss) income from discontinued operations (14.3) — 42.2 
Net Income Attributable to Air Products $1,886.7 $1,760.0 $1,497.8 
Denominator (in millions)
Weighted average common shares — Basic 221.2 220.3 219.3 
Effect of dilutive securities
Employee stock option and other award plans 1.1 1.3 1.5 
Weighted average common shares — Diluted 222.3 221.6 220.8 
Per Share Data*
Basic EPS from continuing operations $8.59 $7.99 $6.64 
Basic EPS from discontinued operations (0.06) — 0.19 
Basic EPS Attributable to Air Products $8.53 $7.99 $6.83 
Diluted EPS from continuing operations $8.55 $7.94 $6.59 
Diluted EPS from discontinued operations (0.06) — 0.19 
Diluted EPS Attributable to Air Products $8.49 $7.94 $6.78 
*EPS is calculated independently for each component and may not sum to total EPS due to rounding.
Diluted EPS attributable to Air Products reflects the potential dilution that could occur if stock options or other share-
based awards were exercised or converted into common stock. The dilutive effect is computed using the treasury stock
method, which assumes all share-based awards are exercised, and the hypothetical proceeds from exercise are used
by the Company to purchase common stock at the average market price during the period. To the extent they would
have been dilutive, the incremental shares, or the difference between shares assumed to be issued versus purchased,
are included in the denominator of the diluted EPS calculation. There were no antidilutive outstanding share-based
awards in fiscal years 2020 and 2019. Outstanding share-based awards of 0.1 million shares were antidilutive and
therefore excluded from the computation of diluted EPS for fiscal year 2018.
22. INCOME T AXES
The following table summarizes the income of U.S. and foreign operations before taxes:
2020 2019 2018
United States income $943.7 $723.3 $688.5 
Foreign income 1,215.3 1,350.8 1,151.7 
Equity affiliates' income 264.8 215.4 174.8 
Income from Continuing Operations Before Taxes $2,423.8 $2,289.5 $2,015.0 
On 22 December 2017, the United States enacted the U.S. Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (the “Tax Act” or "Tax Reform"),
which significantly changed existing U.S. tax laws, including a reduction in the federal corporate income tax rate from
35% to 21%, a deemed repatriation tax on unremitted foreign earnings, as well as other changes. Our consolidated
income statements reflect a discrete net income tax expense of $43.8 and $180.6 in fiscal years 2019 and 2018,
respectively, related to impacts of the Tax Act.
106
Table of Contents
In fiscal year 2019, our income tax expense reflects the reversal of a non-recurring $56.2 benefit recorded in fiscal year
2018 related to the U.S. taxation of deemed foreign dividends. This was partially offset by a benefit of $12.4 to reduce
the total expected costs of the deemed repatriation tax. The non-recurring benefit recorded in fiscal year 2018 was
eliminated by regulations issued in fiscal year 2019.
In fiscal year 2018, our consolidated income statements reflect a discrete net income tax expense of $180.6 and a
$28.5 reduction to equity affiliates' income for the impacts of the Tax Act. The income tax expense of $180.6 included a
cost of $392.4, which included $322.1 for the deemed repatriation tax and $70.3 primarily for additional foreign taxes on
the repatriation of foreign earnings. This cost was partially offset by a $211.8 benefit primarily from the re-measurement
of our net U.S. deferred tax liabilities at the lower corporate tax rate. The deemed repatriation tax of $322.1 included
the $56.2 non-recurring benefit related to the U.S. taxation of deemed foreign dividends that was eliminated in 2019.
We have historically asserted our intention to indefinitely reinvest foreign earnings in certain foreign subsidiaries. We
reevaluated our historic assertions as a result of enactment of the Tax Act and adjusted our position relative to the
indefinitely reinvested earnings of various foreign subsidiaries. The impact of these changes is included in the $70.3 for
additional foreign taxes on the repatriation of foreign earnings recorded in fiscal year 2018.
As of 30 September 2020, the remaining balance of the deemed repatriation tax obligation is $211.4, $190.9 of which is
presented on our consolidated balance sheets in noncurrent liabilities. We are paying the obligation in installments over
six remaining years.
While our accounting for the provisions of the Tax Act is not provisional, further adjustments to the deemed repatriation
tax could result from future U.S. or foreign tax examinations of the years impacted by the calculation or from the
issuance of additional federal or state guidance.
As a fiscal year-end taxpayer, certain provisions of the Tax Act became effective in our fiscal year 2018 while other
provisions did not become effective until fiscal year 2019. The corporate tax rate reduction was effective as of 1
January 2018 and, accordingly, reduced our 2018 fiscal year U.S. federal statutory rate to a blended rate of
approximately 24.5%. The 21.0% federal tax rate applied to our fiscal year ended 30 September 2019 and each year
thereafter.
The following table details the components of the provision for income taxes:
2020 2019 2018
Current Tax Provision
Federal $26.9 $163.7 $305.1 
State 23.8 23.3 17.7 
Foreign 262.7 235.5 256.9 
Total Current Tax Provision 313.4 422.5 579.7 
Deferred Tax Provision
Federal 108.8 9.7 (121.7)
State (3.6) 2.4 12.5 
Foreign 59.8 45.5 53.8 
Total Deferred Tax Provision 165.0 57.6 (55.4)
Total Income Tax Provision $478.4 $480.1 $524.3 
Total company income tax payments, net of refunds, were $379.9, $324.3, and $372.0 in fiscal years 2020, 2019, and
2018, respectively.
107
Table of Contents
The effective tax rate equals the income tax provision divided by income from continuing operations before taxes. A
reconciliation of the differences between the United States federal statutory tax rate and the effective tax rate is as
follows:
(Percent of income before taxes) 2020 2019 2018
U.S. federal statutory tax rate 21.0 % 21.0 % 24.5 %
State taxes, net of federal benefit 0.6 1.0 1.0 
Income from equity affiliates (2.3) (2.0) (2.1)
Foreign tax differentials 0.1 1.0 (1.0)
Tax on foreign repatriated earnings 0.9 0.1 (0.4)
Share-based compensation (0.8) (0.6) (1.0)
Tax reform repatriation — 1.9 19.5 
Tax reform rate change and other — — (11.1)
Tax restructuring benefit — — (1.8)
Domestic production activities — — (0.4)
Other 0.2 (1.4) (1.2)
Effective Tax Rate 19.7 % 21.0 % 26.0 %
Foreign tax differentials represent the differences between foreign earnings subject to foreign tax rates that are different
than the U.S. federal statutory rate and include tax holidays and incentives. As a result of the Tax Act, our effective non-
U.S. tax rates in fiscal years 2020 and 2019 are higher than our statutory rate of 21.0% in those years. Our income tax
holidays relate to operations in jurisdictions that provide reduced income tax rates for certain qualifying activities and
are conditional upon us meeting certain operating thresholds. The impact of these tax holidays decreased income tax
expense by $26.9 ($0.12 per share) in fiscal year 2020, primarily related to a preferential tax rate in China that is
effective until 31 December 2030. This includes the impact of remeasurement of the deferred tax assets and liabilities
due to an extension of the holiday period in China. The impact of tax holidays in fiscal years 2019 and 2018 were not
material.
Tax on foreign repatriated earnings includes benefits and costs related to U.S. and additional foreign taxation on the
current and future repatriation of foreign earnings and a U.S. benefit for related foreign tax credits. The enactment of
the India Finance Act 2020, increased income tax expense by $20.3 and increased equity affiliate income by $33.8 for
changes in the future tax costs of repatriated earnings. In addition, the Tax Act included new provisions related to the
taxation of foreign operations, known as Global Intangible Low Tax Income (“GILTI”). We have elected as an accounting
policy to account for GILTI as a period cost when incurred. This and various other provisions of the Tax Act did not
become effective until fiscal year 2019 and did not impact our tax provision in fiscal year 2018.
The Tax Act repealed the domestic production activities deduction, effective for our fiscal 2019 tax year.
Share-based compensation reflects the impact from recognition of $20.0, $14.6, and $21.5 of excess tax benefits in our
provision for income taxes during fiscal years 2020, 2019, and 2018, respectively.
In fiscal year 2018, we recognized a tax benefit of $35.7, net of reserves for uncertain tax positions, and a
corresponding decrease to net deferred tax liabilities resulting from the restructuring of several foreign subsidiaries.
108
Table of Contents
The significant components of deferred tax assets and liabilities are as follows:
30 September 2020 2019
Gross Deferred Tax Assets
Retirement benefits and compensation accruals $209.0 $227.1 
Tax loss carryforwards 112.6 140.6 
Tax credits and other tax carryforwards 40.3 31.1 
Reserves and accruals 67.0 69.6 
Currency losses 30.4 — 
Other 64.6 57.7 
Valuation allowance (95.0) (92.1)
Deferred Tax Assets 428.9 434.0 
Gross Deferred Tax Liabilities
Plant and equipment 1,110.9 954.6 
Currency gains — 23.9 
Unremitted earnings of foreign entities 58.7 31.0 
Partnership and other investments 19.3 14.8 
Intangible assets 83.6 80.0 
Other 3.9 8.3 
Deferred Tax Liabilities 1,276.4 1,112.6 
Net Deferred Income Tax Liability $847.5 $678.6 
Deferred tax assets and liabilities are included within the consolidated balance sheets as follows:
2020 2019
Deferred Tax Assets
Other noncurrent assets $115.1 $115.2 
Deferred Tax Liabilities
Deferred income taxes 962.6 793.8 
Net Deferred Income Tax Liability $847.5 $678.6 
Deferred tax liabilities related to plant and equipment increased due to the impact of accelerated tax depreciation
deductions in excess of book depreciation primarily in the United States. The deferred tax component for currency
transactions moved into an overall deferred tax asset position due primarily to currency movements on hedging
transactions as several foreign based currencies strengthened against the U.S. dollar in fiscal year 2020. We also
realized a deferred tax liability related to the unrealized foreign exchange gain for a euro denominated financial
instrument. Unremitted earnings of foreign entities increased primarily as a result of the enactment of the India Finance
Act 2020 which increased the future tax costs of repatriated earnings.
As of 30 September 2020, we had the following deferred tax assets for certain tax credits:
Jurisdiction Gross Tax Asset Expiration Period
U.S. State $2.0 2021 - 2034
U.S. Federal 14.1 2027 - 2030
Foreign 28.6 2021 - 2025; Indefinite
Of the $28.6 foreign tax credits, $13.3 have indefinite carryforward periods.
109
Table of Contents
As of 30 September 2020, we had the following loss carryforwards:
Jurisdiction Gross Loss Carryforward Expiration Period
U.S. State Net Operating Loss $323.2 2021 - 2040
U.S. Federal Capital Loss 24.4 2025
Foreign Net Operating Loss 236.6 2021 - 2030; Indefinite
Foreign Capital Loss 274.8 Indefinite
In fiscal year 2020, the U.S. Federal capital losses increased by $22.6 primarily due to the recognition of a capital loss
for the liquidation of a foreign subsidiary. Of the $236.6 of foreign net operating loss carryforwards, $83.1 have
indefinite carryforward periods. Foreign net operating losses decreased by $116.0 in fiscal year 2020 primarily due to
utilization in China and a tax election in India that reduced tax loss carryforwards and decreased plant and equipment
net deferred tax liabilities.
The valuation allowance was $95.0 and $92.1 as of 30 September 2020 and 2019, respectively. As of 30 September
2020, the balance primarily related to $40.3 of foreign credits and loss carryforwards as well as $52.2 related to foreign
capital losses that were generated from the loss recorded on the exit from the Energy-from-Waste project in 2016. If
events warrant the reversal of the valuation allowance, it would result in a reduction of tax expense. We believe it is
more likely than not that future earnings and reversal of deferred tax liabilities will be sufficient to utilize our deferred tax
assets, net of existing valuation allowance, as of 30 September 2020.
As a result of the Tax Act, we recorded $373.2 of federal income tax from the deemed repatriation tax on approximately
$5.8 billion of previously undistributed earnings from our foreign subsidiaries and corporate joint ventures. These
earnings are now eligible to be repatriated to the U.S. with reduced U.S. tax impacts. However, such earnings may be
subject to foreign withholding and other taxes. We record foreign and U.S. income taxes on the undistributed earnings
of our foreign subsidiaries and corporate joint ventures unless those earnings are indefinitely reinvested. The
cumulative undistributed earnings that are considered to be indefinitely reinvested in foreign subsidiaries and corporate
joint ventures are included in retained earnings on the consolidated balance sheets and amounted to $4.7 billion as of
30 September 2020. An estimated $454.4 in additional foreign withholding and other income taxes would be due if
these earnings were remitted as dividends.
A reconciliation of the beginning and ending amount of the unrecognized tax benefits is as follows:
2020 2019 2018
Unrecognized tax benefits balance at beginning of year $231.7 $233.6 $146.4 
Additions for tax positions of the current year 7.6 7.8 26.4 
Additions for tax positions of prior years 17.7 14.2 119.2 
Reductions for tax positions of prior years (4.1) (14.7) (41.3)
Settlements (1.2) (1.5) (14.2)
Statute of limitations expiration (14.0) (3.9) (2.6)
Foreign currency translation (0.7) (3.8) (0.3)
Unrecognized tax benefits balance at end of year $237.0 $231.7 $233.6 
As of 30 September 2020 and 2019, we had $237.0 and $231.7 of unrecognized tax benefits, excluding interest and
penalties, respectively. Of these benefits, $86.1 and $75.0 as of 30 September 2020 and 2019, respectively, would
impact the effective tax rate from continuing operations if recognized.
Interest and penalties related to unrecognized tax benefits are recorded as a component of income tax expense and
totaled $6.1, $12.0, and ($2.4) in fiscal years 2020, 2019, and 2018, respectively. Our accrued balance for interest and
penalties was $25.2 and $19.5 as of 30 September 2020 and 2019, respectively.
110
Table of Contents
In fiscal year 2018, $119.2 in additions for tax positions of prior years related primarily to uncertain state tax filing
positions taken related to the sale of our former Performance Materials Division in fiscal year 2017. Additions for tax
positions of the current year in fiscal year 2018 of $26.4 included uncertain tax positions related to the restructuring of
foreign subsidiaries and reserves for ongoing transfer pricing uncertainties.
In fiscal year 2018, we received a final audit settlement agreement that resolved uncertainties related to unrecognized
tax benefits of $43.1, including interest. This settlement primarily related to tax positions taken in conjunction with the
disposition of our Homecare business in 2012. As a result, we recorded an income tax benefit of $25.6, including
interest, in income from discontinued operations during 2018. The settlement also resulted in an income tax benefit of
approximately $9.1, including interest, in continuing operations for the release of tax reserves on other matters.
We are currently under examination in a number of tax jurisdictions, some of which may be resolved in the next twelve
months. As a result, it is reasonably possible that a change in the unrecognized tax benefits may occur during the next
twelve months. However, quantification of an estimated range cannot be made as of the date of this report.
We generally remain subject to examination in the following major tax jurisdictions for the years indicated below:
Major Tax Jurisdiction Open Tax Years
North America
United States – Federal 2017 - 2020
United States – State 2012 - 2020
Canada 2015 - 2020
Europe
France 2017 - 2020
Germany 2017 - 2020
Netherlands 2016 - 2020
Spain 2015 - 2020
United Kingdom 2016 - 2020
Asia
China 2015 - 2020
South Korea 2010 - 2020
Taiwan 2015 - 2020
Latin America
Chile 2017 - 2020
111
Table of Contents
23. SUPPLEMENT AL INFORMA TION
Other Receivables and Current Assets
30 September 2020 2019
Contract assets $55.9 $64.3 
Contract fulfillment costs 109.9 64.5 
Derivative instruments 97.5 142.5 
Current lease receivables 86.7 90.9 
Other 132.9 115.5 
Other receivables and current assets $482.9 $477.7 
Other Noncurrent Assets
30 September 2020 2019
Operating lease right-of-use assets $376.8 $— 
Deferred tax assets 115.1 115.2 
Derivative instruments 45.8 81.7 
Noncurrent customer receivable — 118.0 
Prepaid tax 19.3 17.0 
Pension benefits 26.5 28.7 
Long-term deposits on plant and equipment 100.0 — 
Other 259.6 243.5 
Other noncurrent assets $943.1 $604.1 
Payables and Accrued Liabilities
30 September 2020 2019
Trade creditors $546.2 $528.2 
Contract liabilities 313.8 247.4 
Dividends payable 296.2 255.7 
Accrued payroll and employee benefits 196.8 186.1 
Obligation for future contribution to an equity affiliate 94.4 94.4 
Current lease obligations 70.7 — 
Derivative instruments 50.9 91.2 
Pension and postretirement benefits 17.9 26.0 
Other 246.3 206.7 
Payables and accrued liabilities $1,833.2 $1,635.7 
112
Table of Contents
Other Noncurrent Liabilities
30 September 2020 2019
Pension benefits $614.2 $651.2 
Postretirement benefits 31.4 36.0 
Operating lease liabilities 335.8 — 
Asset retirement obligations 236.2 201.9 
Long-term accrued income taxes related to U.S. tax reform 190.9 215.4 
Contingencies related to uncertain tax positions 138.6 123.3 
Environmental liabilities 73.6 59.1 
Contract liabilities 57.9 49.2 
Derivative instruments 34.7 21.2 
Noncurrent customer liability — 118.0 
Obligations associated with Energy-from-Waste — 57.8 
Other 202.7 179.3 
Other noncurrent liabilities $1,916.0 $1,712.4 
In connection with our adoption of the new lease guidance, the presentation of our lease liability associated with our former
Energy-from-W aste project has been recorded in aggregate with our other operating lease liabilities ef fective 1 October 2019.
Company Headquarters Relocation Income (Expense)
During the second quarter of fiscal year 2020, we sold property at our current corporate headquarters located in
Trexlertown, Pennsylvania, for net proceeds of $44.1. The sale was completed in anticipation of relocating our U.S.
headquarters and resulted in a gain of $33.8. This gain is reflected on our consolidated income statements as
"Company headquarters relocation income (expense)" for the fiscal year ended 30 September 2020 and has been
excluded from the results of the Corporate and other segment.
Facility Closure
In December 2018, one of our customers was subject to a government enforced shutdown due to environmental
reasons. As a result, we recognized a charge of $29.0 during the first quarter of fiscal year 2019 primarily related to the
write-off of onsite assets. This charge was reflected as “Facility closure” on our consolidated income statements for the
fiscal year ended 30 September 2019 and was not recorded in segment results.
Related Party Transactions
We have related party sales to some of our equity affiliates and joint venture partners as well as other income primarily
from fees charged for use of Air Products' patents and technology. Sales to and other income from related parties
totaled approximately $335, $410, and $360 for the fiscal years ended 30 September 2020, 2019, and 2018,
respectively. Sales agreements with related parties include terms that are consistent with those that we believe would
have been negotiated at an arm’s length with an independent party. As of 30 September 2020 and 2019, our
consolidated balance sheets include related party trade receivables of approximately $95 and $130, respectively.(A)
(A)
(A)
113
Table of Contents
24. SUMMAR Y BY QUARTER (UNAUDITED)
The tables below provide unaudited selected financial data and weighted average share information for each quarter of
fiscal years 2020 and 2019:
2020 Q1 Q2 Q3 Q4 Total
Sales $2,254.7  $2,216.3  $2,065.2  $2,320.1  $8,856.3  
Gross profit 768.1  756.2  720.3  753.6  2,998.2  
Company headquarters relocation income
(expense) (See Note 23) — 33.8 — — 33.8 
Operating income 561.0  577.2  539.2  560.2  2,237.6  
Equity af filiates' income 58.2 88.2 51.2 67.2 264.8  
Income tax provision 120.7  148.5  109.3  99.9 478.4  
Income from continuing operations 488.9  504.7  457.1  494.7  1,945.4  
Loss from discontinued operations, net of tax (See
Note 6) — (14.3) — — (14.3)
Net income 488.9  490.4  457.1  494.7  1,931.1  
Net Income Attributable to Air Products
Net income from continuing operations $475.6  $492.1  $446.5  $486.8  $1,901.0  
Net loss from discontinued operations — (14.3) — — (14.3)
Net Income Attributable to Air Products $475.6  $477.8  $446.5  $486.8  $1,886.7  
Per Share Data*
Basic EPS from continuing operations $2.15 $2.22 $2.02 $2.20 $8.59 
Basic EPS from discontinued operations — (0.06) — — (0.06)
Basic EPS Attributable to Air Products $2.15 $2.16 $2.02 $2.20 $8.53 
Diluted EPS from continuing operations $2.14 $2.21 $2.01 $2.19 $8.55 
Diluted EPS from discontinued operations — (0.06) — — (0.06)
Diluted EPS Attributable to Air Products $2.14 $2.15 $2.01 $2.19 $8.49 
Weighted Average Common Shares (in
millions)
Basic 220.9  221.2  221.2  221.3  221.2  
Diluted 222.2  222.3  222.4  222.6  222.3  
Dividend Information
Dividends declared per common share $1.16 $1.34 $1.34 $1.34 $5.18 
* EPS is calculated independently for each component and may not sum to total EPS due to rounding.
Includes the impact of the enactment of India Finance Act 2020, which increased equity affiliates' income by $33.8 and our income tax provision
by $20.3. Refer to Note 22, Income Taxes, for additional information.(A) (A)
(A) (A)
(A)
114
Table of Contents
2019 Q1 Q2 Q3 Q4 Total
Sales $2,224.0  $2,187.7  $2,224.0  $2,283.2  $8,918.9  
Gross profit 651.0  713.0  758.0  792.4  2,914.4  
Cost reduction actions (See Note 5) — — 25.5 — 25.5 
Gain on exchange of equity af filiate investments
(See Note 3) — — 29.1 — 29.1 
Operating income 455.0  516.5  569.7  603.2  2,144.4  
Equity af filiates' income 52.9 46.2 56.4 59.9 215.4  
Pension settlement loss (See Note 16) — 5.0 — — 5.0 
Income tax provision 132.1  107.5  109.3  131.2  480.1  
Income from continuing operations 357.0  433.5  500.2  518.7  1,809.4  
Income from discontinued operations, net of tax — — — — — 
Net income 357.0  433.5  500.2  518.7  1,809.4  
Net Income Attributable to Air Products
Net income from continuing operations $347.5  $421.3  $488.0  $503.2  $1,760.0  
Net income from discontinued operations — — — — — 
Net Income Attributable to Air Products $347.5  $421.3  $488.0  $503.2  $1,760.0  
Per Share Data*
Basic EPS from continuing operations $1.58 $1.91 $2.21 $2.28 $7.99 
Basic EPS from discontinued operations — — — — — 
Basic EPS Attributable to Air Products $1.58 $1.91 $2.21 $2.28 $7.99 
Diluted EPS from continuing operations $1.57 $1.90 $2.20 $2.27 $7.94 
Diluted EPS from discontinued operations — — — — — 
Diluted EPS Attributable to Air Products $1.57 $1.90 $2.20 $2.27 $7.94 
Weighted Average Common Shares (in
millions)
Basic 219.9  220.2  220.6  220.7  220.3  
Diluted 221.0  221.4  221.9  222.1  221.6  
Dividend Information
Dividends declared per common share $1.10 $1.16 $1.16 $1.16 $4.58 
* EPS is calculated independently for each component and may not sum to total EPS due to rounding.
Includes the impact of a facility closure charge of $29.0 resulting from the government enforced shutdown of a customer in December 2018.
Refer to Note 23, Supplemental Information, for additional information.
Includes a discrete net income tax expense of $43.8, primarily recorded in the first quarter of fiscal year 2019 to finalize our estimates of the
impacts of the U.S. Tax Cuts and Jobs Act. Refer to Note 22, Income Taxes, for additional information.(A) (A)
 
(B) (B) (B)
(A)
(B)
115
Table of Contents
25. BUSINESS SEGMENT AND GEOGRAPHIC INFORMA TION
Our reporting segments reflect the manner in which our chief operating decision maker reviews results and allocates
resources. Except in the Industrial Gases – EMEA and Corporate and other segments, each reporting segment meets
the definition of an operating segment and does not include the aggregation of multiple operating segments. Our
Industrial Gases – EMEA and Corporate and other segment each include the aggregation of two operating segments
that meet the aggregation criteria under GAAP.
Our reporting segments are:
•Industrial Gases – Americas;
•Industrial Gases – EMEA (Europe, Middle East, and Africa);
•Industrial Gases – Asia;
•Industrial Gases – Global; and
•Corporate and other
Industrial Gases – Regional
The regional Industrial Gases segments (Americas, EMEA, and Asia) include the results of our regional industrial gas
businesses, which produce and sell atmospheric gases, such as oxygen, nitrogen, and argon; process gases, such as
hydrogen, helium, carbon dioxide (CO), carbon monoxide, and syngas (a mixture of hydrogen and carbon monoxide);
and specialty gases. The industrial gases business also develops, builds, and operates equipment for the production or
processing of gases, such as air separation units and non-cryogenic generators.
We supply gases to diversified customers in many industries, including those in refining, chemical, gasification, metals,
electronics, manufacturing, and food and beverage. We distribute gases to our customers through a variety of supply
modes including liquid or gaseous bulk supply delivered by tanker or tube trailer and, for smaller customers, packaged
gases delivered in cylinders and dewars or small on-sites (cryogenic or non-cryogenic generators). For large-volume
customers, we construct an on-site plant adjacent to or near the customer’s facility or deliver product from one of our
pipelines.
Electricity is the largest cost component in the production of atmospheric gases. Steam methane reformers utilize
natural gas as the primary raw material and gasifiers use liquid and solid hydrocarbons as the principal raw material for
the production of hydrogen, carbon monoxide, and syngas. We mitigate energy, natural gas, and hydrocarbon price
fluctuations contractually through pricing formulas, surcharges, and cost pass-through and tolling arrangements.
The regional Industrial Gases segments also include our share of the results of several joint ventures accounted for by
the equity method. The largest of these joint ventures operate in China, India, Italy, Mexico, Saudi Arabia, South Africa,
and Thailand.
Each of the regional Industrial Gases segments competes against global industrial gas companies as well as regional
competitors. Competition is based primarily on price, reliability of supply, and the development of industrial gas
applications. We derive a competitive advantage in locations where we have pipeline networks, which enable us to
provide reliable and economic supply of products to larger customers.
Industrial Gases – Global
The Industrial Gases – Global segment includes activity related to the sale of cryogenic and gas processing equipment
for air separation. The equipment is sold worldwide to customers in a variety of industries, including chemical and
petrochemical manufacturing, oil and gas recovery and processing, and steel and primary metals processing. The
Industrial Gases – Global segment also includes centralized global costs associated with management of all the
Industrial Gases segments. These costs include Industrial Gases global administrative costs, product development
costs, and research and development costs. We compete with a large number of firms for all the offerings included in
the Industrial Gases – Global segment. Competition in the equipment business is based primarily on technological
performance, service, technical know-how, price, and performance guarantees.2
116
Table of Contents
Corporate and other
The Corporate and other segment includes our liquefied natural gas, turbo machinery equipment and services, and
distribution sale of equipment businesses as well as our corporate support functions that benefit all segments.
Competition for the sale of equipment businesses is based primarily on technological performance, service, technical
know-how, price, and performance guarantees.
The results of the Corporate and other segment also include income and expense that is not directly associated with
the other segments, such as foreign exchange gains and losses.
In addition to assets of the global businesses included in this segment, other assets include cash, deferred tax assets,
and financial instruments.
Customers
We do not have a homogeneous customer base or end market, and no single customer accounts for more than 10% of
our consolidated revenues.
Accounting Policies
The accounting policies of the segments are the same as those described in Note 1, Major Accounting Policies. We
evaluate the performance of segments based upon reported segment operating income.
Business Segment Information
Industrial
Gases–
AmericasIndustrial
Gases–
EMEAIndustrial
Gases–
AsiaIndustrial
Gases–
GlobalCorporate
and other Total
2020
Sales $3,630.7 $1,926.3 $2,716.5 $364.9 $217.9 $8,856.3 
Operating income (loss) 1,012.4 473.3 870.3 (40.0) (112.2) 2,203.8 
Depreciation and amortization 559.5 195.9 399.4 9.6 20.6 1,185.0 
Equity affiliates' income 84.3 74.8 61.0 10.9 — 231.0 
Expenditures for long-lived assets 1,264.7 327.6 690.3 35.3 191.1 2,509.0 
Investments in net assets of and
advances to equity affiliates310.9 535.2 539.7 46.4 — 1,432.2 
Total assets 6,610.1 3,917.0 6,842.9 397.8 7,400.7 25,168.5 
2019
Sales $3,873.5 $2,002.5 $2,663.6 $261.0 $118.3 $8,918.9 
Operating income (loss) 997.7 472.4 864.2 (11.7) (152.8) 2,169.8 
Depreciation and amortization 505.2 189.5 361.5 8.6 18.0 1,082.8 
Equity affiliates' income 84.8 69.0 58.4 3.2 — 215.4 
Expenditures for long-lived assets 545.8 216.3 1,105.5 33.8 88.3 1,989.7 
Investments in net assets of and
advances to equity affiliates301.6 493.4 445.5 35.7 — 1,276.2 
Total assets 5,832.2 3,250.8 6,240.6 325.7 3,293.5 18,942.8 
2018
Sales $3,758.8 $2,193.3 $2,458.0 $436.1 $84.0 $8,930.2 
Operating income (loss) 927.9 445.8 689.9 53.9 (176.0) 1,941.5 
Depreciation and amortization 485.3 198.6 265.8 8.1 12.9 970.7 
Equity affiliates' income 82.0 61.1 58.3 1.9 — 203.3 
Expenditures for long-lived assets 546.5 163.1 791.9 17.3 49.6 1,568.4 
The sales information noted above relates to external customers only . All intersegment sales are eliminated in consolidation.
Intersegment sales are generally transacted at market pricing. W e generally do not have intersegment sales from our regional
industrial gases businesses. Equipment manufactured for our regional industrial gases segments are generally transferred at
cost and are not reflected as an intersegment sale.
Refer to the Reconciliations to Consolidated Results  section below .(A)
(B)
(B)
(A)
(B)
(B)
(A)
(B)
(B)
(A)
(B)
117
Table of Contents
Reconciliations to Consolidated Results
Operating Income
The table below reconciles total operating income disclosed in the table above to consolidated operating income as
reflected on our consolidated income statements:
Year Ended 30 September 2020 2019 2018
Total $2,203.8 $2,169.8 $1,941.5 
Change in inventory valuation method — — 24.1 
Facility closure — (29.0) — 
Cost reduction actions — (25.5) — 
Gain on exchange of equity affiliate investments — 29.1 — 
Company headquarters relocation income (expense) 33.8 — — 
Consolidated Operating Income $2,237.6 $2,144.4 $1,965.6 
Equity Affiliates' Income
The table below reconciles total equity affiliates' income disclosed in the table above to consolidated equity affiliates'
income as reflected on our consolidated income statements:
Year Ended 30 September 2020 2019 2018
Total $231.0 $215.4 $203.3 
India Finance Act 2020 33.8 — — 
Tax reform repatriation - equity method investment — — (28.5)
Consolidated Equity Affiliates' Income $264.8 $215.4 $174.8 
Geographic Information
Sales to External Customers
Year Ended 30 September 2020 2019 2018
United States $3,359.6 $3,351.8 $3,149.6 
China 1,719.7 1,730.2 1,585.7 
Other foreign operations 3,777.0 3,836.9 4,194.9 
Total $8,856.3 $8,918.9 $8,930.2 
Long-Lived Assets
30 September 2020 2019 2018
United States $4,633.9 $3,721.3 $3,512.7 
China 3,719.4 3,302.6 3,066.6 
Other foreign operations 3,611.4 3,313.7 3,344.4 
Total $11,964.7 $10,337.6 $9,923.7 
Long-lived assets represents plant and equipment, net.
Geographic information is based on country of origin.
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements With Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure.
Not applicable.(A)
(A)
118
Table of Contents
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures.
Disclosure Controls and Procedures
We maintain a comprehensive set of disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rules 13a-15 (e) and 15d-15(e)
under the Exchange Act). Under the supervision of the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, our
management conducted an evaluation of the effectiveness of our disclosure controls and procedures as of 30
September 2020. Based on that evaluation, the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer concluded that, as
of 30 September 2020, the disclosure controls and procedures were effective.
Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
Our management is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting (as
defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f) under the Exchange Act). Management has evaluated the effectiveness of its
internal control over financial reporting as of 30 September 2020 based on criteria established in Internal Control—
Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission
("COSO"). Based on that evaluation, management concluded that, as of 30 September 2020, our internal control over
financial reporting was effective. Management’s Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting is provided under
Part II, Item 8, of this Form 10-K.
There was no change in our internal control over financial reporting during the fourth quarter of fiscal year 2020 that
has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal control over financial reporting.
Deloitte & Touche LLP, our independent registered public accounting firm, has audited our internal control over financial
reporting as of 30 September 2020. The Report of the Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm is provided
under Part II, Item 8, of this Form 10-K.
Item 9B. Other Information.
On 19 November 2020, Margaret G. McGlynn informed the Company of her retirement from the Company’s Board of
Directors, effective 23 November 2020. Ms. McGlynn indicated that her decision to retire was not a result of any
disagreement with the Company.
PART III
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance.
The information required by this item relating to our directors and nominees is incorporated herein by reference to the
section captioned “The Board of Directors” in the Proxy Statement for the Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be held
on 28 January 2021. The information required by this item relating to our executive officers is set forth in Item 1 of Part I
of this report.
The information required by this item relating to our Audit and Finance Committee and our Audit and Finance
Committee Financial Expert is incorporated herein by reference to the sections captioned “Board Structure–Standing
Committees of the Board” in the Proxy Statement for the Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be held on 28 January
2021.
The information required by this item relating to our procedures regarding the consideration of candidates
recommended by shareholders and a procedure for submission of such candidates is incorporated herein by reference
to the section captioned “The Board of Directors–Selection of Directors” in the Proxy Statement for the Annual Meeting
of Shareholders to be held on 28 January 2021.
The information required by the item relating to Section 16(a) Beneficial Ownership Reporting Compliance is
incorporated herein by reference to the section captioned “Section 16(a) Beneficial Ownership Reporting” in the Proxy
Statement for the Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be held on 28 January 2021.
We have adopted a Code of Conduct that applies to all employees, including the Chief Executive Officer, the Chief
Financial Officer, and the Principal Accounting Officer. The Code of Conduct can be found at our website at
www.airproducts.com/company/governance/code-of-conduct.
119
Table of Contents
Item 11. Executive Compensation.
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the sections captioned “Executive
Compensation” and “Compensation of Directors” in the Proxy Statement for the Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be
held on 28 January 2021.
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder
Matters.
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the sections captioned "Information About
Stock Ownership" and “Equity Compensation Plan Information” in the Proxy Statement for the Annual Meeting of
Shareholders to be held on 28 January 2021.
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence.
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the sections captioned “The Board of
Directors–Director Independence” and “Board Practices, Processes and Policies–Transactions with Related Persons”
in the Proxy Statement for the Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be held on 28 January 2021.
Item 14. Principal Accountant Fees and Services.
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the section captioned “Fees of Independent
Registered Public Accounting Firm” in the Proxy Statement for the Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be held on 28
January 2021.
PART IV
Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules.
(a) The documents below are filed as a part of this report:
   (1)Financial Statements. The following is a list of the Consolidated Financial Statements of Air Products and
Chemicals, Inc. and its subsidiaries included in Item 8 of Part II of this report:
Report of Deloitte & Touche LLP, Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 52
Report of KPMG LLP, Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 55
Consolidated Income Statements – Years Ended 30 September 2020, 2019, and 2018 56
Consolidated Comprehensive Income Statements – Years Ended 30 September 2020, 2019, and 2018 57
Consolidated Balance Sheets – 30 September 2020 and 2019 58
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows – Years Ended 30 September 2020, 2019, and 2018 59
Consolidated Statements of Equity – Years Ended 30 September 2020, 2019, and 2018 60
   (2)Financial Statement Schedules. Financial statement schedules are omitted as they are either not required
or the information is otherwise included in the consolidated financial statements or notes thereto.
   (3)Exhibits. The exhibits filed as a part of this report as required by Item 601 of Regulation S-K are listed in
the Index to Exhibits located on page 121 of this report.
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary.
None.
120
Table of Contents
INDEX T O EXHIBITS
Exhibit No.Description
(3) Articles of Incorporation and Bylaws.
3.1 Restated Certificate of Incorporation of the Company. (Filed as Exhibit 3.2 to the Company’s Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended 30 September 1987.)*
3.2 Amendment to the Restated Certificate of Incorporation of the Company dated 25 January 1996.
(Filed as Exhibit 3.3 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended
30 September 1996.)*
3.3 Amendment to the Restated Certificate of Incorporation of the Company dated 28 January 2014.
(Filed as Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
30 June 2014.)*
3.4 Amended and Restated Bylaws of the Company. (Filed as Exhibit 3.1 to the Company’s Current
Report on Form 8-K dated 26 November 2019.)*
(4) Instruments defining the rights of security holders, including indentures. Upon request of the
Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company hereby undertakes to furnish copies of the
instruments with respect to its long-term debt.
4.1 Indenture, dated as of January 10, 1995, between the Company and The Bank of New York Trust,
N.A. (formerly Wachovia Bank, National Association and initially First Fidelity Bank Company,
National Association), as Trustee. (Filed as Exhibit 4(a) to the Company’s Registration Statement on
Form S-3 filed January 19, 1995, File No. 033-57357.)*
4.2 Indenture, dated as of April 30, 2020, between the Company and The Bank of New York Trust
Company, N.A., as Trustee (Filed as Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed
April 30, 2020).*
4.3 Description of Securities
(10) Material Contracts
10.1 1990 Deferred Stock Plan of the Company, as amended and restated effective 1 October 1989. (Filed
as Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended
30 September 1989.)*†
10.2 Annual Incentive Plan as Amended and Restated effective 1 October 2008. (Filed as Exhibit 10.7 to
the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended 31 March 2009.)*†
10.3 Stock Incentive Program of the Company effective 1 October 1996. (Filed as Exhibit 10.21 to the
Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended 30 September 2002.)*†
10.4 Deferred Compensation Program for Directors, effective 7 October 2019. (Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the
Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for quarter ended 31 December 2019.)*†
10.5 Amended and Restated Long-Term Incentive Plan of the Company effective 1 October 2014. (Filed
as Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on 23 September 2014.)*†
10.5(a) Form of Performance Share Award Agreement under the Long-Term Incentive Plan of the Company,
used for FY2019 awards. (Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for
the quarter ended 31 December 2018.)*†
10.5(b) Form of Performance Share Award Agreement under the Long-Term Incentive Plan of the Company,
used for FY2019 awards. (Filed as Exhibit 10.2 to the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for
the quarter ended 31 December 2018.)*†
10.5(c) Restricted Stock Unit Retention Award Agreement dated 3 December 2018 under the Long-Term
Incentive Plan of the Company. (Filed as Exhibit 10.3 to the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-
Q for the quarter ended 31 December 2018.)*†
10.5(d) Form of Restricted Stock Award Agreement under the Long-Term Incentive Plan of the Company,
used for FY2020 awards. (Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for
the quarter ended 31 March 2020.)*†
10.5(e) Form of Performance Share Award Agreement under the Long-Term Incentive Plan of the Company,
used for FY2020 awards. (Filed as Exhibit 10.2 to the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for
the quarter ended 31 March 2020.)*†
121
Table of Contents
INDEX T O EXHIBITS
Exhibit No.Description
10.6 Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. Retirement Savings Plan as amended and restated effective 1
November 2017 with provisions effective 1 January 2018. (Filed as Exhibit 10.4 to the Company's
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended 31 December 2017.)*†
10.6(a) Amendment No. 1 to the Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. Retirement Savings Plan as amended and
restated effective 1 November 2017 with provisions effective 1 January 2018. (Filed as Exhibit 10.6(a)
to the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended 30 September 2018). *†
10.6(b) Amendment No. 2 to the Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. Retirement Savings Plan as amended and
restated effective 1 January 2019. (Filed as Exhibit 10.4 to the Company's Quarterly Report on Form
10-Q for the quarter ended 31 December 2018.)*†
10.6(c) Amendment No. 3 to the Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. Retirement Savings Plan as amended and
restated effective 1 January 2019. (Filed as Exhibit 10.5 to the Company's Quarterly Report on Form
10-Q for the quarter ended 31 December 2018.)*†
10.6(d) Amendment No. 4 to the Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. Retirement Savings Plan as amended and
restated effective 1 August 2019. (Filed as Exhibit 10.6D to the Company's Annual Report on Form
10-K for the fiscal year ended 30 September 2019.).*†
10.6(e) Amendment No. 5 to the Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. Retirement Savings Plan as amended and
restated effective 1 August 2019. (Filed as Exhibit 10.6E to the Company's Annual Report on Form
10-K for the fiscal year ended 30 September 2019.)*†
10.7 Supplementary Pension Plan of Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. as Amended and Restated effective
August 1, 2014. (Filed as Exhibit 10.10 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal
year ended 30 September 2014.)*†
10.7(a) Amendment No. 1 dated as of 30 September 2015 to the Supplementary Pension Plan of Air
Products and Chemicals, Inc. as Amended and Restated effective 1 August 2014. (Filed as Exhibit
10.10(a) to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended 30 September
2015.)*†
10.7(b) Amendment No. 2 dated as of 30 September 2016 to the Supplementary Pension Plan of Air
Products and Chemicals, Inc. as Amended and Restated effective 1 August 2014. (Filed as Exhibit
10.7(b) to the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for fiscal year ended 30 September 2016.)*†
10.7(c) Amendment No. 3 dated as of 26 July 2017 to the Supplementary Pension Plan of Air Products and
Chemicals, Inc. as Amended and Restated effective 1 August 2017.(Filed as Exhibit 10.7(c) to the
Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended 30 September 2017.)*†
10.8 Deferred Compensation Plan as Amended and Restated effective 1 January 2018. (Filed as Exhibit
10.5 to the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended 31 December 2017.)*†
10.9 Revolving Credit Facility dated as of 31 March 2017 for $2,500,000,000. (Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the
Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended 31 March 2017.)*
10.9(a) Amendment and Appointment of Successor Administrative Agent dated 28 September 2018 to the
Revolving Credit Agreement dated 31 March 2017. (Filed as Exhibit 10.9(a) to the Company's Annual
Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended 30 September 2018.) *
10.10 Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. Executive Separation Program as amended effective as of 20 July
2018. (Filed as Exhibit 10.10 to the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended
30 September 2018.)*†
10.11 Form of Change in Control Severance Agreement for an Executive Officer. (filed as Exhibit 10.2 of the
Company's Current Report on Form 8-K dated 23 September 2014.)*†
10.12 Compensation Program for Non-Employee Directors effective 1 July 2017. (Filed as Exhibit 10.2 to
the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended 30 June 2017.)*†
122
Table of Contents
INDEX T O EXHIBITS
Exhibit No.Description
10.13 Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. Corporate Executive Committee Retention Agreements effective as
of 10 January 2014. (Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated
15 January 2014.)*†
10.14 Amended and Restated Employment Agreement dated 14 November 2017, between the Company
and Seifollah Ghasemi. (Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed 14
November 2017.)*†
10.15 Amendment to Employment Agreement, dated May 21, 2020, between Air Products and Chemicals,
Inc. and Seifollah Ghasemi. (Filed as Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed
May 21, 2020.)*†
10.16 Senior Management Severance and Summary Plan Description effective as of 1 October 2017. (Filed
as Exhibit 10.16 to the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended 30
September 2017.)*†
10.17 Compensation Programs for Nonemployee Directors effective 26 November 2019. (Filed as Exhibit
10.2 to the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended 31 December 2019.)*†
(16) Letter re change in certifying accountant
16.1 Letter from KPMG LLP (Filed as Exhibit 16.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K dated 26
July 2018).*
21 Subsidiaries of the registrant.
(23) Consents of Experts and Counsel.
23.1 Consent of Deloitte & Touche LLP, Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm.
23.2 Consent of KPMG LLP, Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm.
24 Power of Attorney.
(31) Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a) Certifications.
31.1 Certification by the Principal Executive Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) or Rule 15d-14(a) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of
2002.
31.2 Certification by the Principal Financial Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) or Rule 15d-14(a) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of
2002.
(32) Section 1350 Certifications.
32.1 Certification by the Principal Executive Officer and Principal Financial Officer pursuant to 18 U.S.C.
Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.††
(101) Interactive Data Files
101.INS Inline XBRL Instance Document. The XBRL Instance Document does not appear in the Interactive
Data File because its XBRL tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL document.
101.SCH Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document.
101.CAL Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase Document.
101.LAB Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase Document.
101.PRE Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase Document.
101.DEF Inline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase Document.
104 Cover Page Interactive Data File, formatted in Inline XBRL (included in Exhibit 101).
123
Table of Contents
* Previously filed as indicated and incorporated herein by reference. Exhibits incorporated by reference are located in SEC File
No. 001-04534 unless otherwise indicated.
† Indicated management contract or compensatory arrangement.
†† The certification attached as Exhibit 32.1 that accompanies this Annual Report on Form 10-K, is not deemed filed with the SEC
and is not to be incorporated by reference into any filing of Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. under the Securities Act of 1933,
as amended, or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, whether made before or after the date of this Form 10-K,
irrespective of any general incorporation language contained in such filing.
124
Table of Contents
SIGNA TURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly
caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
AIR PRODUCTS AND CHEMICALS, INC.
(Registrant)
By: /s/ M. Scott Crocco
M. Scott Crocco
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
(Principal Financial Officer)
Date:19 November 2020
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this Report has been signed below by the
following persons on behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.
Signature and Title Date
/s/ Seifi Ghasemi 19 November 2020
(Seifi Ghasemi)
Director, Chairman, President, and
Chief Executive Officer
(Principal Executive Officer)
/s/ Russell A. Flugel 19 November 2020
(Russell A. Flugel)
Senior Vice President, Corporate Controller, and
Principal Accounting Officer
* 19 November 2020
(Susan K. Carter)
Director
* 19 November 2020
(Charles I. Cogut)
Director
* 19 November 2020
(Lisa A. Davis)
Director
* 19 November 2020
(Chad C. Deaton)
Director
125
Table of Contents
Signature and Title Date
* 19 November 2020
(David H. Y. Ho)
Director
* 19 November 2020
(Margaret G. McGlynn)
Director
* 19 November 2020
(Edward L. Monser)
Director
* 19 November 2020
(Matthew H. Paull)
Director
*Sean D. Major, Executive Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary, by signing his name hereto, does sign
this document on behalf of the above noted individuals, pursuant to a power of attorney duly executed by such
individuals, which is filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission herewith.
/s/ Sean D. Major
Sean D. Major
Executive Vice President, General Counsel and
Secretary
Date:19 November 2020
126
